Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ________ to ________
Commission
File
NumberExact name of registrants as specified in their
charters, address of principal executive offices and
registrants' telephone numberIRS Employer
Identification
Number
1-8841 NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. 59-2449419
2-27612 FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY 59-0247775
700 Universe Boulevard
Juno Beach, Florida 33408
(561) 694-4000
State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization:  Florida
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Registrants Title of each class Trading Symbol(s)Name of each exchange
on which registered
NextEra Energy, Inc. Common Stock, $0.01 Par Value NEE New York Stock Exchange
4.872% Corporate Units NEE.PRO New York Stock Exchange
5.279% Corporate Units NEE.PRP New York Stock Exchange
6.219% Corporate Units NEE.PRQ New York Stock Exchange
Florida Power & Light Company None
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are well-known seasoned issuers, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act of 1933.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrants are not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☐  No ☑                                                                     Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☐     No ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants (1) have filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months,
and (2) have been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants have submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S‑T during the
preceding 12 months.
NextEra Energy, Inc.    Yes ☑  No ☐                                                                      Florida Power & Light Company    Yes ☑    No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company.
NextEra Energy, Inc. Large Accelerated Filer ☑ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☐ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
Florida Power & Light Company Large Accelerated Filer ☐ Accelerated Filer ☐ Non-Accelerated Filer ☑ Smaller Reporting Company ☐ Emerging Growth Company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrants have elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting
standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether each registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting
under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☑
Indicate by check mark whether the registrants are shell companies (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).  Yes ☐    No ☑
Aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity of NextEra Energy, Inc. held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2021 (based on the closing market price on the Composite
Tape on June 30, 2021) was $143,450,834,024.
There was no voting or non-voting common equity of Florida Power & Light Company held by non-affiliates at June 30, 2021.
Number of shares of NextEra Energy, Inc. common stock, $0.01 par value, outstanding at January 31, 2022: 1,962,744,998
Number of shares of Florida Power & Light Company common stock, without par value, outstanding at January 31, 2022, all of which were held, beneficially and of record, by NextEra
Energy, Inc.: 1,000
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of NextEra Energy, Inc.'s Proxy Statement for the 2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference in Part III hereof.
__________________________________
This combined Form 10-K represents separate filings by NextEra Energy, Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company. Information contained herein relating to an individual registrant is filed
by that registrant on its own behalf. Florida Power & Light Company makes no representations as to the information relating to NextEra Energy, Inc.'s other operations.
Florida Power & Light Company meets the conditions set forth in General Instruction I.(1)(a) and (b) of Form 10-K and is therefore filing this Form with the reduced disclosure format.
Table of Contents
DEFINITIONS
Acronyms and defined terms used in the text include the following:
Term Meaning
AFUDC – equity equity component of allowance for funds used during construction
Bcf billion cubic feet
CAISO California Independent System Operator
capacity clause capacity cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
DOE U.S. Department of Energy
Duane Arnold Duane Arnold Energy Center
environmental clause environmental cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
ERCOT Electric Reliability Council of Texas
FERC U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Florida Southeast Connection Florida Southeast Connection, LLC, a wholly owned NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary
FPL the legal entity, Florida Power & Light Company; beginning January 1, 2022, an operating segment of NEE
FPL segmentthrough December 31, 2021, FPL, excluding Gulf Power, related purchase accounting adjustments and eliminating entries, and an operating
segment of NEE and FPL
FPSC Florida Public Service Commission
fuel clause fuel and purchased power cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
GAAP generally accepted accounting principles in the U.S.
Gulf Power through December 31, 2021, an operating segment of NEE and an operating division and operating segment of FPL
ISO independent system operator
ISO-NE ISO New England Inc.
ITC investment tax credit
kW kilowatt
kWh kilowatt-hour(s)
Management's Discussion Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
MISO Midcontinent Independent System Operator
MMBtu One million British thermal units
mortgage mortgage and deed of trust dated as of January 1, 1944, from FPL to Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as supplemented and amended
MW megawatt(s)
MWh megawatt-hour(s)
NEE NextEra Energy, Inc.
NEECH NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc.
NEER an operating segment comprised of NextEra Energy Resources and NEET
NEET NextEra Energy Transmission, LLC
NEP NextEra Energy Partners, LP
NEP OpCo NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP
NERC North American Electric Reliability Corporation
net capacity net ownership interest in pipeline(s) capacity
net generating capacity net ownership interest in plant(s) capacity
net generation net ownership interest in plant(s) generation
Note __ Note __ to consolidated financial statements
NextEra Energy Resources NextEra Energy Resources, LLC
NRC U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission
NYISO New York Independent System Operator
O&M expenses other operations and maintenance expenses in the consolidated statements of income
OEB Ontario Energy Board
OTC over-the-counter
OTTI other than temporary impairment
PJM PJM Interconnection, LLC
PMI NextEra Energy Marketing, LLC
Point Beach Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant
PTC production tax credit
PUCT Public Utility Commission of Texas
regulatory ROE return on common equity as determined for regulatory purposes
RPS renewable portfolio standards
RTO regional transmission organization
Sabal Trail Sabal Trail Transmission, LLC, an entity in which a NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary has a 42.5% ownership interest
Seabrook Seabrook Station
SEC U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
storm protection plan storm protection plan cost recovery clause, as established by the FPSC
U.S. United States of America
NEE, FPL, NEECH, NextEra Energy Resources and NEET each has subsidiaries and affiliates with names that may include NextEra Energy, FPL, NextEra Energy Resources, NextEra
Energy Transmission, NextEra, FPL Group, FPL Energy, FPLE, NEP and similar references. For convenience and simplicity, in this report the terms NEE, FPL, NEECH, NextEra Energy
Resources, NEET and NEER are sometimes used as abbreviated references to specific subsidiaries, affiliates or groups of subsidiaries or affiliates. The precise meaning depends on the
context.
2
Table of Contents
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page No.
Definitions 2
Forward-Looking Statements 3
PART I
Item 1. Business 4
Item 1A. Risk Factors 21
Item 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 33
Item 2. Properties 33
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 33
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 33
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrants' Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 34
Item 6. Reserved 34
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 35
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 55
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 56
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 112
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 112
Item 9B. Other Information 112
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 112
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 113
Item 11. Executive Compensation 113
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 113
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 113
Item 14. Principal Account ant Fees and Services 114
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits  and Financial Statement Schedules 115
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 122
Signatures 123
FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This report includes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Any statements that
express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, strategies, future events or performance (often, but
not always, through the use of words or phrases such as may result, are expected to, will continue, is anticipated, believe, will, could, should,
would, estimated, may, plan, potential, future, projection, goals, target, outlook, predict and intend or words of similar meaning) are not
statements of historical facts and may be forward looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions and uncertainties.
Accordingly , any such statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, important factors included in Part I, Item
1A. Risk Factors (in addition to any assumption s and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements)
that could have a significant impact on NEE's and/or FPL's operations and financial results, and could cause NEE's and/or FPL's actual results to
differ materia lly from those contained or implied in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of NEE and/or FPL in this combined Form
10-K, in presentations, on their respective websites, in response to questions or otherwise.
Any forward -looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and NEE and FPL undertake no obligation to update
any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances, including, but not limited to, unanticipated events, after the date on which such
statement is made, unles s otherwise required by law. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of
such factors , nor can it assess the impact of each such factor on the business or the extent to which any factor , or combination of factors, may
cause actual results to dif fer materially from those contained or implied in any forward-looking statement.
3
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
OVERVIEW
NEE is one of the largest electric power and energy infrastructure companies in North America  and a leader in the renewable energy industry .
NEE has two principal businesses, FPL and NEER. FPL is the largest electric utility in the state of Florida and one of the largest electric utilities in
the U.S. FPL’s strategic focus is centered on investing in generation, transmission and distribution facilities to deliver on its value proposition of
low customer bills, high reliability , outstanding customer service and clean energy solutions for the benefit of its more than 5.7 million customers.
NEER is the world's largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and sun, as well as a world leader in battery storage. NEER’ s strategic
focus is centered on the development, construction and operation of long-term contracted assets throughout the U.S. and Canada, primarily
consisting of clean energy solutions such as renewable generation facilities and battery storage projects, and electric transmission facilities.
In January 2019, NEE acquired Gulf Power Company , a rate-regulated electric utility engaged in the generation, transmission, distribution and
sale of electric energy in northwest Florida. On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity .
However , during 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power . The
FPL segment and Gulf Power continued to be separate operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL, through 2021. Effective January 1, 2022,
FPL became regulated as one ratemaking entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one operating segment of NEE (see FPL –
FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025). For purposes of
discussion herein, the use of the term "FPL" represents FPL the legal entity and beginning January 1, 2022, an operating segment of NEE.
Through December 31, 2021, "FPL  segment" represents FPL, excluding Gulf Power , and "Gulf Power" represents an operating division of FPL,
each operating segments of NEE and FPL.
As described in more detail in the following sections, NEE seeks to create value in its two princ ipal businesses by meeting its customers' needs
more economically and more reliably than its competitors. NEE's strategy has resulted in profitable growth over sustained periods at both FPL
and NEER. Management seeks to grow each  business in a manner consistent with the varying opportunities available to it; however ,
management believes that the diversification and balance represented by FPL and NEER is a valuable characteristic of the enterprise and
recognizes that each business contributes to NEE's financial strength in different ways. FPL and NEER share a common platform with the
objective of lowering costs and creating efficiencies for their businesses. NEE and its subsidiarie s, with employees totaling approximately 15,000
as of December 31, 2021, continue to develop and implement enterprise-wide initiatives focused  on improving productivity , process effectiveness
and quality .
As of Janua ry 1, 2022, NEE's segments for financial reporting purposes are FPL and NEER. NEECH, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEE, owns
and provide s funding for NEE's operating subs idiaries, other than FPL and its subsidiaries. NEP, an affiliate of NextEra Energy Resources,
acquires, manages and owns contracted clean energy projects with stable, long-term cash flows . See NEER section below for further discussion
of NEP . The following diagram depicts NEE's simplified ownership structure:
4
Table of Contents
FPL
FPL is a rate-regulated electric utility engaged primarily in the generation, transmission, distribut ion and sale of electric energy in Florida. FPL is
the largest electric utility in the state of Florida and one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S. At December 31, 2021, the FPL segment had
approximately 28,450 MW of net generating capacity , approximately 77,000  circuit miles of transmission and distribution lines and 696
substations. FPL provides service to its electric customers through integrated transmission and distribution systems that link its generation
facilities to its customer s. FPL also owns a retail gas business, which serves approximately 117,000 residential and commercial natural gas
customers in four counties throughout southern Florida with 3,750 miles of natural gas distribution pipelines.
On January  1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity. However , during 2021, FPL continued to be
regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power . The FPL segment and Gulf Power continued to
be separate operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL, through 2021. Effective January 1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one ratemaking
entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one operating segment of NEE. See FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate
Regulation – Base Rate s – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025 below . FPL serves more than 11 million people through
more than 5.7 million customer accounts. The following map shows FPL's service areas and plant locations, which cover most of the east and
lower west coasts of Florida and are in eight counties throughout northwest Florida (see FPL  Sources of Generation below).
5
Table of Contents
CUSTOMERS AND REVENUE
FPL's prima ry source of operating revenues is from its retail customer base; it also serves a limited number of wholesale customers within
Florida. The percentage of the FPL  segment's operating revenues and customer accounts  by customer class were as follows:
For both retail and wholesale customers, the prices (or rates) that FPL may charge are approved by regulatory bodies, by the FPSC in the case
of retail customers and by the FERC in the case  of wholesale customers. In general, under U.S. and Florida law, regulated rates are intended to
cover the cost of provid ing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital . Since the regulatory bodies have authority to
determine the relevant cost of providing service and the appropriate rate of return on capital employed, there can be no guarantee that FPL will
be able to earn any particular rate of return or recover all of its costs through regulated rates. See FPL  Regulation below .
FPL seeks to maintain attractive rates for its customers. Since rates are largely cost-based, main taining low rates requires a strategy focused on
developing and maintaining a low-cost position, including the implementation of ideas generated from cost savings initiatives. A common
benchmark used in the electric power industry for comparing rates across companies is the price of 1,000 kWh of consumption per month for a
residential customer . The FPL segment's 2021 average bill for 1,000 kWh of monthly residen tial usage was well below both the average of
reporting electric utilities within Florida and the July 2021 national average (the latest date for which this data is available) as indicated below:
6
Table of Contents
FRANCHISE AGREEMENTS AND COMPETITION
FPL's service to its electric retail customers is provided primarily under franchise agreements negotiated with municipalities or counties. During
the term of a franchise agreement, which is typically 30 years, the municipality or county agrees  not to form its own utility , and FPL has the right
to offer electric service to residents. At December 31, 2021, the FPL segment held 192 franchise agreements with various municipalities and
counties in Florida with varying expiration dates through 2051. These franchise agreements covered approximately 88% of the FPL segment's
retail customer base in Florida. At December 31, 2021, the FPL segment also provided service to customers in 11 other municipalities and to 23
unincorporated areas within its service area without franchise agreements pursuant to the general obligation to serve as a public utility . FPL relies
upon Florida law for access to public rights of way .
Because any customer may elect to provide his/her own electric services, FPL effectively must compete for an individual customer's business. As
a practical matter , few customers provide their own service at the present time since FPL's cost of service is lower than the cost of self-generation
for the vast majority of customers. Changing technology , economic conditions and other factors could alter the favorable relative cost position that
FPL currently enjoys; however , FPL seeks as a matter of strategy to ensure that it delivers superior value, in the form of low customer bills, high
reliability , outstanding customer service and clean energy solutions.
In addition to self-gener ation by residential, commercial and industrial customers, FPL also faces competition from other suppliers of electrical
energy to wholesale customers and from alternative energy sources. In each of 2021, 2020 and 2019, operating revenues from wholesale and
industrial electric customers combined represented approximately five percent of the FPL  segment's total operating revenues.
For the building of new steam and solar generating capacity of 75 MW or greater , the FPSC requires investor-owned electric utilities, including
FPL, to issue a request for proposal (RFP) except when the FPSC determines that an exception from the RFP process is in the public interest.
The RFP process allows independent power producers and others to bid to supply the new generating capacity . If a bidder has the most cost-
effective alternative, meets other criteria such as financial viability and demonstrates adequa te expertise and experience in building and/or
operating generating capacity of the type proposed, the investor-owned electric utility would seek to negotiate a purchased power agreement with
the selected bidder and request that the FPSC approve the terms of the purchased power agreement and, if appropriate, provide the required
authorization for the construction of the bidder's generating capacity .
FPL SOURCES OF GENERATION
At Decembe r 31, 2021, the FPL segment's resou rces for serving load consisted of approximately  28,564 MW of net generating capacity , of which
28,450  MW were from FPL-owne d facilities and 114 MW were available through purchased power agreements. FPL owned and operated 30
units with generating capacity  of 22,008 MW that primarily use natural gas and 41 solar generation facilities with generating capacity totaling
2,940 MW. In addition, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated 4 nuclear units with net generating capacity totaling 3,502 MW
(see Nuclear Operations below). FPL also develops and constructs battery storage projects, which when combined with its solar projects, serve
to enhance its ability to meet customer needs for a nearly firm generation source. At December 31, 2021, the FPL segment had 483 MW of
battery stora ge capacity . FPL customer usage  and operating revenues are typically higher during the summer months, largely due to the
prevalent use of air conditioning in its service area. Occasionally , unusually cold temperature s during the winter months result in significant
increases in electricity usage for short periods of time.
FPL is in the process of modernizing two generation units at its Lauderdale facility to a high-ef ficiency , clean-burning natural gas unit (Dania
Beach Clean Energy Center). The Dania Beach Clean Energy Center is expected to provide approximately 1,200 MW of generating capacity and
to be in service by mid-2022. Through 2025, FPL plans to add new solar generation with cost recovery mechanisms through base rates, a Solar
Base Rate Adjustment (SoBRA) and SolarT ogether  (a voluntar y communit y solar program that gives certain FPL electric customers an
opportunity to participate directly in the expansion of solar energy and receive credits on their related monthly customer bill). FPL placed
approximately 450 MW of solar generating capa city in service in January 2022 and is currently in the process of constructing an additional 1,190
MW of solar generating capacity , which is expected to be placed in service in 2023 (see FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base
Rates – Base Rates Ef fective January 2022 through December 2025 below).TM
7
Table of Contents
Fuel Sources
FPL relies upon a mix of fuel sources for its generation facilities, the ability of some of its generation facilities to operate on both natural gas and
oil, and on purchased power to maintain the flexibility to achieve a more economical fuel mix in order to respond to market and industry
developments.
*approximately 71% has dual fuel capability
Significant Fuel and T ransportation Contracts.  At December 31, 2021, FPL  had the following significant fuel and transportation contracts in place:
•firm transportation contracts with six different transportation suppliers for natural gas pipeline capacity for an aggregate maximum
delivery quantity of 2,916,000 MMBtu/day with expiration dates through 2042  (see Note 15 – Contracts);
•several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel with expiration dates through
2037; and
•short- and medium-term natural gas supply contracts to provide a portion of FPL's anticipated needs for natural gas. The remainder of
FPL's natural gas requirements is purchased in the spot market.
Nuclear Operations
At December 31, 2021, FPL owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated the four nuclear units in Florida discussed below . FPL's nuclear
units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages, including inspections, repairs and
certain other modifications. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed from service for variable lengths of time.
FacilityFPL's Ownership
(MW)Beginning of Next
Scheduled Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
St. Lucie Unit No. 1 981 September 2022 2036
St. Lucie Unit No. 2    840 February 2023 2043
Turkey Point Unit No. 3 837 April 2023 2052
Turkey Point Unit No. 4 844 March 2022 2053
______________________
(a)    In 2021, FPL filed an application with the NRC to renew both St. Lucie operating licenses for an additional 20 years. License renewals are pending.
(b)    Excludes 147 MW operated by FPL but owned by non-affiliates.
NRC regulat ions require FPL to submit a plan for decontamination and decommissioning five years before the projected end of plant operation. If
the license renewals are approved by the NRC, FPL's plans provide for St. Lucie Unit No. 1 to be shut down in 2056 with decommissioning
activities to be integrated with the dismantlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 commencing in 2063. Current plans provide for the dismantlement of
Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4 with decommissioning activities commencing in 2052 and 2053, respectively .(a)
(b) (a)
8
Table of Contents
FPL's nuclear facilities use both on-site storage pools and dry storage casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities, which are
expected to provide sufficient storage of spent nuclear fuel that is generated at these facilities through license expiration, as well as through any
pending license extensions.
FPL ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING
FPL's Energ y Marketing & Trading division (EMT) buys and sells wholesale energy commoditie s, such as natural gas, oil and electricity . EMT
procures natural gas and oil for FPL's use in power generation and sells excess natural gas, oil and electricity . EMT  also uses derivative
instruments (primarily swaps, options and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in the purchase and sale of fuel and
electricity . Substantially all of the results of EMT's activities are passed through to customers in the fuel or capacity clauses. See Management's
Discussion – Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity and Note 3.
FPL REGULATION
FPL's operations are subject to regulation by a number of federal, state and other organizations, including, but not limited to, the following:
•the FPSC, which has jurisdiction over retail rates , service area, issuances of securities, planning, siting and construction of facilities, among
other things;
•the FERC, which overs ees the acquisition and disposition of generation, transmission and other facilities, transmission of electricity and
natural gas in interstate  commerce, proposals to build and operate interstate natural gas pipelines and storage facilities, and wholesale
purchases and sales of electric energy , among other things;
•the NERC, which, throug h its regional entities, establishes and enforces mandatory reliability standards, subject to approval by the FERC, to
ensure the reliability of the U.S. electric transmission and generation system and to prevent major system blackouts;
•the NRC, which has jurisdiction over the operatio n of nuclear power plants through the issuance of operating licenses, rules, regulations and
orders; and
•the EPA, which has the responsibility to mainta in and enforce national standards under a variety of environmental laws, in some cases
delegating authority to state agencies. The EPA also works with industries and all levels of government, including federal and state
governments, in a wide variety of voluntary pollution prevention programs and energy conservation ef forts.
FPL Electric Rate Regulation
The FPSC sets rates at a level that is intended to allow the utility the opportunity to collect  from retail customers total revenues (revenue
requirements) equal to its cost of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital. To accomplish this, the FPSC uses
various ratemaking mechanisms, including, among other things, base rates and cost recovery clauses. Although FPL and Gulf Power Company
merged effective January 1, 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate rate making entities until January 1, 2022 when new unified
rates and tariffs became  effective for the combined utility system (including the former Gulf Power service area). See Base Rates Effective
January 2022 through December 2025 below .
Base Rates. In general, the basic costs of providing electric service, other than fuel and certain other costs , are recovered through base rates,
which are designed to recover the costs of constructing, operating and maintaining the utility system. These basic costs include O&M expenses,
depreciation and taxes, as well as a return on investment in assets used and useful in providing electric service (rate base). At the time base
rates are established, the allowed rate of return on rate base approximates the FPSC's determination of the utility's estimated weighted-average
cost of capital, which includes its costs for outstanding debt and an allowed return on common equity . The FPSC monitors the utility's actual
regulatory ROE through a surveillance report that is filed monthly with the FPSC. The FPSC does not provide assurance that any regulatory ROE
will be achieved. Base rates are determined in rate proceedings or through negotiated settlements of those procee dings. Proceedings can occur
at the initiative of the utility or upon action by the FPSC. Existing base rates remain in ef fect until new base rates are approved by the FPSC.
Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025  – In Decem ber 2021, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and
settlement between FPL  and several intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2021 rate agreement).
Key elements of the 2021 rate agreement, which is effective from January 2022 through at least December 2025, include, among other things,
the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were established for the combined utility system (including the former Gulf Power service area) resulting
in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$692 million beginning January 1, 2022, and
◦$560 million beginning January 1, 2023.
•In addition, FPL is eligible to receive, subject to conditions specified in the 2021 rate agreeme nt, base rate increases associated with the
addition of up to 894 MW annually of new solar generation through the SoBRA  mechanism in each of
9
Table of Contents
2024 and 2025, and may carry forward any unused MW in 2024 to 2025. FPL has agreed to an installed cost cap of $1,250 per kW and will
be required to demonstrate that these proposed solar facilities are cost ef fective.
•FPL's authorized regulatory ROE is 10.60%, with a range of 9.70% to 11.70%. If FPL's earned regulatory ROE falls below 9.70%, FPL may
seek retail base rate relief. If the earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.70%, any party with standing may seek a review of FPL's retail base
rates. If the average 30-year U.S. Treasury rate is 2.49% or greater over a consecutive six-mont h period, the authorized regulatory ROE will
increase to 10.80% with a range of 9.80% to 11.80%. If triggered, the increase in the authorized regulatory ROE will not result in an
incremental general base rate increase, but will apply for all other regulatory purposes, including the SoBRA  mechanism.
•Subject to certain conditions, FPL may amortize, over the term of the 2021 rate agreement, up to $1.45 billion of depreciation reserve
surplus, provided that in any year of the 2021 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve amount to maintain its minimum
authorized regulatory ROE and also may not amortize any reserve amount that would result in an earned regulatory ROE in excess of its
maximum authorized regulatory ROE. FPL is limited to the amortization of $200 million of deprec iation reserve surplus during the first year of
the 2021 rate agreement.
•FPL is authorized to expand SolarT ogether™ by constructing an additional 1,788 MW of solar generation from 2022 through 2025, such that
the total capacity of SolarT ogether™ would be 3,278 MW .
•Future storm restoration costs would be recove rable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery petition, but
capped at an amount that produces a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000 kWh of usage on residential bills during the first 12
months of cost recovery . Any additional costs would be eligible for recovery in subsequent years. If storm restoration costs exceed $800
million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increase to the $4 surcharge. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm
Cost Recovery .
•If federal or state permanent corporate income tax changes become effective during the term of the 2021 rate agreement, FPL will be able to
prospectively adjust base rates after a review by the FPSC.
In December 2021, Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group in January 2022, Florida Rising, Inc., Environmental Confederation
of Southwes t Florida, Inc., and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida filed notices of appeal challenging the FPSC's final order
approving the 2021 rate agreement, which notices of appeal are pending before the Florida Supreme Court.
Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 – In December 2016, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and
settlement between FPL and several interven ors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2016 rate agreement). Key elements of the 2016 rate
agreement, which became ef fective in January 2017, provided for , among other things, the following:
•new retail base rates and charges which resulted in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$400 million beginning January 1, 2017;
◦$211 million beginning January 1, 2018; and
◦$200 million beginning April 1, 2019 for a new approximately 1,720 MW natural gas-fired comb ined-cycle unit in Okeechobee
County , Florida (Okeechobee Clean Energy Center) that achieved commercial operation on March 31, 2019;
•additional base rate increases in 2018 through  2020 associated with the addition of approxi mately 1,200 MW of new solar generating
capacity that became operational during that timeframe;
•a regulatory ROE of 10.55% with a range of 9.60% to 11.60%;
•subject to certain conditi ons, the right to reduce depreciation expense up to $1.25 billion (reserve ), provided that in any year of the 2016 rate
agreement FPL  was required to amortize enough reserve to maintain an earned regulatory ROE within the range of 9.60% to 11.60%; and
•an interim cost recovery mechanism for storm restoration costs. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery .
Cost Recovery Clauses . Cost recovery clauses are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return on certain assets
allowed to be recovered  through various clauses. Cost recovery clause costs are recovered through levelized monthly charges per kWh or kW,
depending on the customer's rate class. These cost recovery clause charges are calculated annually based on estimated costs and estimated
customer usage for the following year, plus or minus true-up adjustments to reflect the estimate d over or under recovery of costs for the current
and prior periods. An adjustment to the levelized  charges may be approved during the course of a year to reflect revised estimates. FPL recovers
costs from customers through the following clauses:
•Fuel – primarily fuel costs, the most significant of the cost recovery clauses in terms of operating revenues (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation);
•Storm Protection Plan – costs associated with an FPSC-approved transmission and distribution storm protection plan, which includes costs
for hardening of overhead transmission and distribution lines, undergrounding of certain distribution lines and vegetation management;
•Capacity – primarily certain costs associated with the acquisition of several electric generation facilities (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation);
•Energy Conservation – costs associated with implementing energy conservation programs; and
10
Table of Contents
•Environmental – certain costs of complying with federal, state and local environmental regulations enacted after April 1993 and costs
associated with three of FPL's solar facilities placed in service prior to 2016.
The FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs that it considers excessive or imprud ently incurred. These costs may include, among
others, fuel and O&M expenses, the cost of replacing power lost when generation units are unavailable, storm restoration costs and costs
associated with the construction or acquisition of new facilities.
FERC
The Federal Power Act grants the FERC exclus ive ratemaking jurisdiction over wholesale sales  of electricity and the transmission of electricity
and natural gas in interstate commerce. Pursuant to the Federal Power Act, electric utilities must maintain tariffs and rate schedules on file with
the FERC which govern  the rates, terms and conditions for the provision of FERC-jurisdictional wholesale power and transmission services. The
Federal Power Act also gives the FERC authority to certify and oversee an electric reliability organization with authority to establish and
independently enforce mandatory reliability standards applicable to all users, owners and operat ors of the bulk-power system. See NERC below .
Electric utilities are subject to accounting, record-keeping and reporting requirements administered by the FERC. The FERC also places certain
limitations on transactions between electric utilities and their af filiates.
NERC
The NERC has been certified by the FERC as an electric reliability organization. The NERC's mandate is to ensure the reliability and security of
the North American bulk-power system through the establishment and enforcement of reliability standards approved by FERC. The NERC's
regional entities also enforce reliability standards approved by the FERC. FPL is subject to these reliability standards and incurs costs to ensure
compliance with continually heightened requirements, and can incur significant penalties for failing to comply with them.
FPL Environmental Regulation
FPL is subject to environmental laws and regulations as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . FPL expects to seek
recovery through the environmental clause for compliance costs associated with any new environmental laws and regulations.
FPL HUMAN CAPITAL
FPL had approximately 9,700 employees at December 31, 2021, with approximately 31% of these employees represented by the International
Brotherhood of Electrical Workers  (IBEW), substantially all of which are under collective bargaining agreements that have approximately three-
year terms expiring in April 2022 and January 2025.
GULF POWER
Gulf Power became a part of FPL's rate-regulate d electric utility system beginning January 1, 2021, but continued to be regulated as a separate
ratemaking entity until January 1, 2022 when new unified rates and tariffs became effective for the combined utility system (see FPL – FPL
Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025). Prior to January 1,
2022, Gulf Power operated under a separate base rate settlement agreement that provided for an allowed regulatory ROE of 10.25%, with a
range of 9.25% to 11.25%. As of December 31, 2021, Gulf Power served approximately 481,000 customers in eight counties throughout
northwest Florida and had approximately 3,500 MW of electric net generating capacity and 9,500  miles of transmission and distribution lines
located primarily in Florida, and was subject to similar regulations described in FPL  – FPL  Regulation above.
On January 1, 2019, NEE completed the acquis ition of all of the outstanding common shares of Gulf Power Company under a stock purchase
agreement with The Southern Company dated  May 20, 2018, as amended, for approximate ly $4.44 billion in cash consideration and the
assumption of approximately $1.3 billion of Gulf Power debt. On January 1, 2021, Gulf Power Company and FPL merged, with FPL as the
surviving entity . The FPL segment and Gulf Power continued to be separate operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL, through 2021. See Note
6 – Gulf Power Company and – Merger of FPL  and Gulf Power Company for further discussion.
11
Table of Contents
NEER
NEER,  comprised of NEE's competitive energy and rate-regulated transmission businesses, is a diversi fied clean energy business with a strategy
that emphasizes the development, construction and operation of long-term contracted assets with a focus on renewable projects. NEE reports
NextEra Energy Resources and NEET , a rate-regulated transmission business, on a combined  basis for segment reporting purposes, and the
combined segment is referred to as NEER. The NEER segment currently owns, develops, const ructs, manages and operates electric generation
facilities in wholesale energy markets in the U.S. and Canada. NEER, with approximately 24,600 MW of total net generating capacity at
December 31, 2021, is one of the largest wholesale generators of electric power in the U.S., including approximately 24,070 MW of net
generating capacity across 38 states and 520 MW of net generating capacity in 4 Canadian provinces. At December 31, 2021 , NEER opera tes
facilities, in which it has ownership interests, with a total generating capacity of approximately 30,000 MW. NEER produces the majority of its
electricity from clean and renewable sources as described more fully below . In addition, NEER develops and constructs battery storage projects,
which when combined with its renewable project s, serve to enhance its ability to meet customer needs for a nearly firm generation source, or as
standalone facilities. At December 31, 2021, NEER had net ownership interest in approximately 735 MW of battery storage capacity . NEER is the
world's largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and sun based on 2021 MWh produced on a net generation basis, as well as a world
leader in battery storag e. The NEER segment also owns, develops, constructs and operate s rate-regulated transmission facilities in North
America. At December 31, 2021, NEER's rate-re gulated transmission facilities and transmission lines that connect its electric generation facilities
to the electric grid are comprised of approximately 265 substations and 2,680 circuit miles of transmission lines.
NEER also engages in energy-related commodit y marketing and trading activities, including entering into financial and physical contracts. These
contracts primarily include power and fuel commodities and their related products for the purpose of providing full energy and capacity
requirements services, primarily to distribution utilities in certain markets, and offering customized power and fuel and related risk management
services to wholesale customers, as well as to hedge the production from NEER's generation assets that is not sold under long-term power
supply agree ments. In addition, NEER participates in natural gas, natural gas liquids and oil production through operating and non-operating
ownership interests, and in pipeline infrastruct ure construction, management and operations, through either wholly owned subsidiaries or
noncontrolling or joint venture interests, hereafte r referred to as the gas infrastructure business. NEER also hedges the expected output from its
gas infrastructure production assets to protect against price movements.
NEP – NEP acquires, manage s and owns contracted clean energy projects with stable long-term cash flows through a limited partner interest in
NEP OpCo. NEP's proje cts include energy proje cts contributed by or acquired from NextEra Energy Resources, or acquired from third parties, as
well as ownership interests in contracted natural gas pipelines acquired from third parties. NextEra Energy Resources' indirect limited partnership
interest in NEP OpCo based on the number of outstanding NEP OpCo common units was appro ximately 54.7% at December 31, 2021.  NextEra
Energy Resources acco unts for its ownership interest in NEP as an equity method investment with its earnings/losses from NEP as equity in
earnings (losses) of equity method investees and accounts for its project sales to NEP as third-party sales in its consolidated financial
statements. See Note 1 – Basis  of Presentation. At December 31, 2021, NEP owned, or had an ownership interest in, a portfolio of wind, solar
and solar plus battery storage projects with energy project capacity totaling approximately 7,997 MW and contracted natural gas pipelines, all
located in the U.S. as further discussed in Generation and Other Operations.  NextEra Energy Resources operates essentially all of the energy
projects in NEP's portfolio and its ownership interest in the portfolio's capacity was approximately 3,618 MW at December 31, 2021.
GENERATION AND OTHER OPERATIONS
NEER sells products associated with its generation facilities (energy , capacity , renewable energy credits (RECs) and ancillary services) in
competitive markets in regions where those facilities are located. Customer transactions may be supplied from NEER generation facilities or from
purchases in the wholesale markets, or from a combination thereof. See Markets and Competition below .
12
Table of Contents
At December 31, 2021, NEER managed or participated in the management of essentially all of the following generation projects, natural gas
pipelines and transmission facilities that it wholly owned or in which it had an ownership interest.
Generation Assets and Other Operations
*Primarily natural gas
13
Table of Contents
Generation Assets
NEER's portfolio of generation assets primarily consist of generation facilities with long-term power sales agreements for substantially all of their
capacity and/or energy output. Information related to contracted generation assets at December 31, 2021 was as follows:
•represented approximately 22,658 MW of total net generating capacity;
•weighted-average remai ning contract term of the power sales agreements and the remaining life of the PTCs associated with repowered
wind facilitie s of approximately 16 years, based on forecasted contributions to earnings and forecasted amounts of electricity produced
by the repowered wind facilities; and
•several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel for all nuclear units with
expiration dates through 2033 (see Note 15 – Contracts).
NEER's merchant generation assets primarily consist of generation facilities that do not have long-term power sales agreements to sell their
capacity and/or energy output and therefore require active marketing and hedging. Merch ant generation assets at December 31, 2021
represented approximately 1,932 MW of total net generating capacity , including 1,102 MW from nuclear generation and 824 MW from other peak
generation facilities, and are primarily located in the Northeast region of the U.S. NEER utilizes swaps, options, futures and forwards to lock in
pricing and manage the commodity price risk inherent in power sales and fuel purchases.
NEER Generation Assets Fuel/Technology Mix
NextEra Energy Resources utilized the following mix of fuel sources for generation facilities in which it has an ownership interest:
*Primarily natural gas
Wind Facilities
•located in 20 states in the U.S. and 4 provinces in Canada;
•operated a total generating capacity of 20,531 MW at December 31, 2021;
•ownership interests in a total net generating capacity of 16,517 MW at December 31, 2021;
◦essentially all MW are from contracted wind assets located primarily throughout Texas and the West and Midwest regions of the
U.S. and Canada;
◦ added appro ximately 2,008 MW of new generating capacity  and repowered wind generati ng capacity totaling 435 MW in the
U.S. in 2021 and sold assets to NEP and third parties totaling approximately 1,500 MW (see Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests ).
Solar Facilities
•located in 29 states in the U.S.;
•operated photovoltaic, distributed generation and solar thermal facilities with a total generating capacity of 4,356 MW at December 31,
2021;
•ownership interests in solar facilities with a total net generating capacity of 3,391 MW at December 31, 2021;
◦essentially all MW are from contracted solar facilities located primarily throughout the W est and South regions of the U.S.;
14
Table of Contents
◦ added appro ximately 728 MW of generating capacity in the U.S. in 2021 and sold assets to NEP and third parties totaling
approximately 468 MW (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests ).
Nuclear Facilities
At Decembe r 31, 2021, NextEra Energy Resources owned, or had undivided interests in, and operated the three nuclear units discussed below .
NEER's nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages, including inspections,
repairs and certain other modifications. Scheduled nuclear refueling outages require the unit to be removed from service for variable lengths of
time.
Facility LocationOwnership
(MW)Portfolio
CategoryNext Scheduled
Refueling OutageOperating License
Expiration Date
Seabrook New Hampshire 1,102 Merchant April 2023 2050
Point Beach Unit No. 1 Wisconsin 595 Contracted March 2022 2030
Point Beach Unit No. 2 Wisconsin 595 Contracted March 2023 2033
______________________
(a)    Excludes 147 MW operated by NEER but owned by non-affiliates.
(b)    NEER sells all of the output of Point Beach Units Nos. 1 and 2 under long-term contracts through their current operating license expiration dates.
(c)    In 2020, NEER filed an application with the NRC to renew both Point Beach operating licenses for an additional 20 years. License renewals are pending.
NEER is responsible for all nuclear unit operations and the ultimate decommissioning of the nuclear units, the cost of which is shared on a pro-
rata basis by the joint owners for the jointly-owned units. NRC regulations require plant owners to submit a plan for decontamination and
decommissioning five years before the projected  end of plant operation. NEER's nuclear facilities use both on-site storage pools and dry storage
casks to store spent nuclear fuel generated by these facilities, which are expected to provide  sufficient storage of spent nuclear fuel that is
generated at these facilities through current license expiration, as well as through any pending license extensions.
NEER also owns an approximately 70% interest in Duane Arnold, a nuclear facility located in Iowa that ceased operations in August 2020. NEER
submitted a site-specific  cost estimate and plan for decontamination and decommissioning to the NRC. All spent nuclear fuel housed onsite is
expected to be in long-te rm dry storage within three years of plant shutdown and until the DOE is able to take possession. NEER estimates that
the cost of decommissioning Duane Arnold is fully funded and expects completion by approximately 2080.
Policy Incentives for Renewable Energy Projects
U.S. federal, state and local governments have established various incentives to support the development of renewable energy projects. These
incentives include accelerated tax depreciation , PTCs, ITCs, cash grants, tax abatements and RPS programs. Pursuant to the U.S. federal
Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery System, wind and solar projects are substantially depreciated for tax purposes over a five-year period even
though the useful life of such projects is generally much longer than five years.
Owners of utility-scale wind facilities are eligible to claim an income tax credit (the PTC, or an ITC in lieu of the PTC) upon initially achieving
commercial operation. The PTC is determined based on the amount of electricity produced by the wind facility during the first ten years of
commercial operation. This incentive was create d under the Energy Policy Act of 1992 and has been extended several times. Alternatively , an
ITC equal to 30% of the cost of a wind facility may be claimed in lieu of the PTC. Owners of solar  facilities are eligible to claim a 30% ITC for new
solar facilities. In order to qualify for the PTC (or an ITC in lieu of the PTC) for wind or an ITC for solar , construction of a facility must begin before
a spec ified date and the taxpayer must maintain a continuous program of construction or continu ous efforts to advance the project to completion.
The Internal Revenue Service (IRS) issued guidance establishing a safe harbor for the continuous efforts and continuous construction
requirements. The current guidance provides that the requirements for safe harbor will generally  be satisfied if the facility is placed in service no
more than six years after the year in which const ruction of the facility began for a facility that began construction in 2016 through 2019, five years
for a facility that began construction in 2020 and four years for a facility that begins construction in 2021 and beyond. Retrofitted wind facilities
may re-qualify for PTCs  or ITCs pursuant to the 5% safe harbor for the begin construction requirement, as long as the cost basis of the new
investment is at least 80% of the facility’ s total fair value. Tax credits for qualifying wind and solar projects are subject to the following schedule.(a)
(b) (c)
(b) (c)
15
Table of Contents
Year construction of project begins
2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 20232024 and
beyond
PTC 100 % 80 % 60 % 40 % 60 % 60 % - - -
Wind ITC 30 % 24 % 18 % 12 % 18 % 18 % - - -
Solar ITC 30 % 30 % 30 % 30 % 26 % 26 % 26 % 22 % 10 %
_________________________
(a)    To qualify for the PTC or an ITC, a project must be placed in service no more than six years after the year in which construction of the project began for a facility that began
construction in 2016 – 2019, five years for a facility that began construction in 2020 and four years for a facility that begins construction in 2021 and beyond.
(b)    Percentage of the full PTC available for wind projects that began construction during the applicable year.
(c)    Percentage of eligible project costs that can be claimed as ITC by wind projects that began construction during the applicable year.
(d)    Percentage of eligible project costs that can be claimed as ITC by solar projects that begin construction during the applicable year. ITC is limited to 10% for solar projects not placed
in service before January 1, 2026.
Other countries, including Canada, provide for incentives like feed-in-tarif fs for renewable energy projects. The feed-in-tarif fs promote renewable
energy investments by of fering long-term contracts to renewable energy producers, typically based on the cost of generation of each technology .
Other Operations
Gas Infrastructure Business – At Decem ber 31, 2021, NextEra Energy Resources had ownership interests in natural gas pipelines, the most
significant of which are discussed below , and in oil and gas shale formations located primarily in the Midwest and South regions of the U.S.
Miles
of
PipelinePipeline
Location/Route OwnershipTotal
Net Capacity
(per day)In-Service
Dates
Texas Pipelines 542 South Texas 52.8% 2.09 Bcf 1950s – 2015
Sabal Trail 517 Southwestern Alabama to Central Florida 42.5% 0.43 Bcf June 2017 – May
2020
Florida Southeast Connection 169 Central Florida to South Florida 100% 0.64 Bcf June 2017
Central Penn Line 191 Northeastern Pennsylvania to Southeastern
Pennsylvania21.3% 0.39 Bcf October 2018 –
October 2021
______________________
(a)    A NEP portfolio of seven natural gas pipelines, of which a third party owns a 10% interest in a 120-mile pipeline with a daily capacity of approximately 2.3 Bcf. Approximately 1.64 Bcf
per day of net capacity is contracted with firm ship-or-pay contracts that have expiration dates ranging from 2022 to 2035.
(b)    Ownership percentage based on NextEra Energy Resources limited partnership interest in NEP OpCo common units.
(c)    See Note 15 – Contracts for a discussion of transportation contracts with FPL.
(d)    NEP has an indirect equity method investment in the Central Penn Line (CPL) which represents an approximately 39% aggregate ownership interest in the CPL.
NEER also has a 31.9%  ownership interest in a 303-mile natural gas pipeline that is under construction in West Virginia and Virginia. Completion
of constructi on of the natural gas pipeline is subject to certain conditions, including applicable regulatory approvals and the resolution of legal
challenges. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of impairment charges in the first quarter of 2022 and in 2020
and Note 15 – Contracts for a discussion of a transportation contract with a NextEra Energy Resources subsidiary .
Rate-Regulated Transm ission – At Decem ber 31, 2021, certain entities within the NEER segment had ownership interests in rate-regulated
transmission facilities, the most significant of which are discussed below , which are located primarily in ERCOT , CAISO, Southwest Power Pool
(SPP), Independent Electricity System Operator (IESO) and NYISO jurisdictions.
Miles Substations Kilovolt LocationRate
Regulator OwnershipActual/Expected
In-Service
Dates
Operational:
Lone Star 347 9 345 Texas PUCT 100% 2013
Trans Bay Cable 53 2 200 DC California FERC 100% 2010
GridLiance 700 31 69 – 230 Illinois, Kansas, Kentucky , Missouri,
Nevada and OklahomaFERC 100% 1960 – 2021
Under Construction:
NextBridge Infrastructure 280 - 230 Ontario, Canada OEB 50% First Quarter of
2022
Empire State Line 20 2 345 New York FERC 100% December 2021 –
Mid-2022
______________________
(a)    Direct current
(b)    Comprised of three FERC-regulated transmission utilities; the assets of which are owned 100% except for a 26-mile transmission line and 5 substations, of which NEET owns a 65%
interest.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(a) (b)
(c)
(c)
(d)(b)
(a)
(b)(b)
16
Table of Contents
Customer Supply and Proprietary Power and Gas Trading – NEER provides commodities-related products to customers, engages in energy-
related commodity marketing and trading activitie s and includes the operations of a retail electricity provider . Through NextEra Energy Resources
subsidiary PMI, NEER:
•manages risk associated  with fluctuating commo dity prices and optimizes the value of NEER's power generation and gas infrastructure
production assets through the use of swaps, options, futures and forwards;
•sells output from NEER's plants that is not sold under long-term contracts and procures fuel for use by NEER's generation fleet;
•provides full energy and capacity requirements to customers; and
•markets and trades energy-related commodity products, including power , fuel, renewable attributes and carbon offsets, as well as
marketing and trading services to customers.
MARKETS AND COMPETITION
Electricity markets in the U.S. and Canada are regional and diverse in character . All are extensively regulated, and competition in these markets
is shaped and constraine d by regulation. The nature of the products offered varies based on the specifics of regulation in each region. Generally ,
in addition to the natura l constraints on pricing freedom presented by competition, NEER may also face specific constraints in the form of price
caps, or maximum allowed prices, for certain products. NEER's ability to sell the output of its generation facilities may also be constrained by
available transmission capacity , which can vary from time to time and can have a significant impact on pricing.
The degree and nature of competition is different in wholesale markets than in retail markets. The majority of NEER's revenues are derived from
wholesale electricity markets. Wholesale power generation is a capital-intensive, commodity-driven business with numerous industry participants.
NEER prima rily competes on the basis of price, but believes the green attributes of NEER's generation assets, its creditworthiness and its ability
to offer and manage reliable customized risk solutions to wholesale customers are competitive  advantages. Wholesale power generation is a
regional business that is highly fragmented relative to many other commodity industries and diverse in terms of industry structure. As such, there
is a wide variation in terms of the capabilities, resources, nature and identity of the companies NEER competes with depending on the market. In
wholesale markets, customers' needs are met through a variety of means, including long-term bilateral contracts, standardized bilateral products
such as full requirements service and customized supply and risk management services.
In general, U.S. and Canadian electricity markets encompass three classes of services: energy , capacity and ancillary services. Energy services
relate to the physical delivery of power; capacity services relate to the availability of MW capa city of a power generation asset; and ancillary
services are other services that relate to power generation assets, such as load regulation and spinning and non-spinning reserves. The exact
nature of these classes of services is defined in part by regional tariffs. Not all regions have a capacity services class, and the specific definitions
of ancillary services vary from region to region.
RTOs and ISOs exist throughout much of North  America to coordinate generation and transmission across wide geographic areas and to run
markets. NEER operates in all RTO and ISO jurisdictions. At December 31, 2021, NEER also had generation facilities with ownership interests in
a total net generating capacity of approximately 5,730 MW that fall within reliability regions that are not under the jurisdiction of an established
RTO or ISO, including 3,532 MW within the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and 2,051 MW within the SERC Reliability Corporation.
Although each RTO and ISO may have differing objectives and structures, some benefits of these entities include regional planning, managing
transmission congestion , developing larger wholesale markets for energy and capacity , maintaining reliability and facilitating competition among
wholesale electricity providers. NEER has operations that fall within the following R TOs and ISOs :
17
Table of Contents
NEER comp etes in different regions to differing degrees, but in general it seeks to enter into long-term bilateral contracts for the full output of its
generation facilities. At December 31, 2021, approximately 92% of NEER's net generating capacity was committed under long-term contracts.
Where long-term contracts are not in effect, NEER sells the output of its facilities into daily spot markets. In such cases, NEER will frequently
enter into shorter term bilateral contracts, typically of less than three years duration, to hedge the price risk associated with selling into a daily
spot market. Such bilateral contracts, which may be hedges either for physical delivery or for financial (pricing) offset, serve to protect a portion of
the revenue  that NEER expects to derive from the associated generation facility . Contracts that serve the economic purpose of hedging some
portion of the expected revenue of a generation facility but are not recorded as hedges under GAAP are referred to as “non-qualifying hedges” for
adjusted earnings purposes. See Management's Discussion – Overview – Adjusted Earnings.
Certain facilities within the NEER wind and solar generation portfolio produce RECs and other environmental attributes which are typically sold
along with the energy from the plants under long-term contracts, or may be sold separately from wind and solar generation not sold under long-
term contracts. The purchasing party is solely entitled to the reporting rights and ownership of the environmental attributes.
While the majority of NEER's revenue is derived from the output of its generation facilities, NEER is also an active competitor in several regions in
the wholesa le full requirements business and in providing structured and customized power and fuel products and services to a variety of
customers. In the full requirements service, typically , the supplier agrees to meet the customer's needs for a full range of products for every hour
of the day , at a fixed price, for a predetermined period of time, thereby assuming the risk of fluctuations in the customer's volume requirements.
Expanded competition in a frequently changing regulatory environment presents both opportun ities and risks for NEER. Opportunities exist for
the selective  acquisition of generation assets and for the construction and operation of efficient facilities that can sell power in competitive
markets. NEER seeks to reduce its market risk by having a diversified portfolio by fuel type and location, as well as by contracting for the future
sale of a significant amount of the electricity output of its facilities.
18
Table of Contents
NEER REGULATION
The energy markets in which NEER operates are subject to domestic and foreign regulation, as the case may be, including local, state and
federal regulation, and other specific rules.
At Decembe r 31, 2021 , essentially  all of NEER 's operating indep endent power projects located in the U.S. have received exempt wholesale
generator status as defined under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 2005. Exempt wholesale generators own or operate a facility
exclusively to sell electricity to wholesale custo mers. They are barred from selling electricity directly to retail customers. While projects with
exempt wholesale generator status are exempt from various restrictions, each project must still comply with other federal, state and local laws,
including, but not limited to, those regarding siting, construction, operation, licensing, pollution abatement and other environmental laws.
Additionally , most of the NEER facilities located in the U.S. are subject to FERC regulations  and market rules and the NERC's mandatory
reliability standards, all of its facilities are subject to environmental laws and the EPA's environmental regulations, and its nuclear facilities are
also subject to the jurisdiction of the NRC. See FPL – FPL Regulation for additional discussion of FERC, NERC, NRC and EPA regulations. Rates
of NEER's rate-regulate d transmission businesses are set by regulatory bodies as noted in Generation and Other Operations – Generation
Assets and Other Opera tions – Other Operation s – Rate-Regulated Transmission. With the exception of facilities located in ERCOT , the FERC
has jurisdiction over various aspects of NEER's  business in the U.S., including the oversight and investigation of competitive wholesale energy
markets, regulation of the transmission and sale of natural gas, and oversight of environmental matters related to natural gas projects and major
electricity policy initiatives. The PUCT  has jurisdiction, including the regulation of rates and services, oversight of competitive markets, and
enforcement of statutes and rules, over NEER facilities located in ERCOT .
Certain entities within the NEER segment and their affiliates are also subject to federal and provincial or regional regulations in Canada related to
energy operations, energy markets and environm ental standards. In Canada, activities related to owning and operating wind and solar projects
and participating in wholesale and retail energy markets are regulated at the provincial level. In Ontario, for example, electric generation facilities
must be licensed by the OEB and may also be required to complete registrations and maintain market participant status with the IESO, in which
case they must agree to be bound by and comply with the provisions of the market rules for the Ontario electricity market as well as the
mandatory reliability standards of the NERC.
In addition, NEER is subject to environmental laws and regulations as described in the NEE Environmental Matters section below . In order to
better anticipate potential regulatory changes, NEER continues to actively evaluate and participate in regional market redesigns of existing
operating rules for the integration of renewable energy resources and for the purchase and sale of energy commodities.
NEER HUMAN CAPITAL
NEER had approximate ly 5,200 employees at December 31, 2021. NEER has collective bargaining agreements with the IBEW , the Utility
Workers Union of Amer ica and the Security Police and Fire Professiona ls of America, which collectively represent approximately 12% of NEER's
employees. The collective bargaining agreements have approximately two- to four-year terms and expire between September 2022 and
December 2025.
NEE ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
NEE and its subsidiarie s, including FPL, are subject to environmental laws and regulation s, including extensive federal, state and local
environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to, among others, air quality , water quality and usage, waste management, wildlife
protection and historical resources, for the siting, construction and ongoing operations of their facilities. The U.S. government and certain states
and regions,  as well as the Government of Canada and its provinces, have taken and continue  to take certain actions, such as proposing and
finalizing regulations or setting targets or goals, regarding the regulation and reduction of greenhouse gas emissions and the increase of
renewable energy generation. The environment al laws in the U.S., including, among others, the Endangered Species Act, the Migratory Bird
Treaty Act, and the Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act, provide for the protection of numerous species, including endangered species and/or
their habitats , migratory birds and eagles. The environmental laws in Canada, including, among others, the Species at Risk Act, provide for the
recovery of wildlife species that are endangered or threatened and the management of species of special concern. Complying with these
environmental laws and regulations could result in, among other things, changes in the design and operation of existing facilities and changes or
delays in the location, design, construction and operation of new facilities. Failure to comply could result in fines, penalties, criminal sanctions or
injunctions. NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries expect to seek recovery for compliance costs associated with any new environmental laws and
regulations, which recovery for FPL  would be through the environmental clause.
19
Table of Contents
WEBSITE ACCESS TO SEC FILINGS
NEE and FPL make their SEC filings, including the annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K,
and any amendments to those reports, available free of charge on NEE's internet website, www.nexteraenergy .com, as soon as reasonably
practicable after those documents are electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. The inform ation and materials available on NEE's website
(or any of its subsidiaries' or af filiates' websites) are not incorporated by reference into this combined Form 10-K.
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name Age Position Effective Date
Miguel Arechabala 60 Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of NEE
Executive V ice President, Power Generation Division of FPLJanuary 1, 2014
Deborah H. Caplan 59 Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of NEE
Executive V ice President, Human Resources and Corporate Services of FPLApril 15, 2013
Robert Cof fey 58 Executive V ice President, Nuclear Division and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of NEE
Vice President and Chief Nuclear Of ficer of FPLJune 14, 2021 June 15,
2021
Paul I. Cutler 62 Treasurer of NEE
Treasurer of FPL
Assistant Secretary of NEEFebruary 19, 2003
February 18, 2003
December 10, 1997
John W . Ketchum 51 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy Resources March 1, 2019
Rebecca J. Kujawa 46 Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of NEE
Executive V ice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer of FPLMarch 1, 2019
James M. May 45 Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Of ficer of NEE March 1, 2019
Ronald R. Reagan 53 Executive V ice President, Engineering, Construction and Integrated Supply Chain of NEE
Vice President, Engineering and Construction of FPLJanuary 1, 2020
March 1, 2019
James L. Robo 59 Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer of NEE
Chairman of FPLDecember 13, 2013
May 2, 2012
Charles E. Sieving 49 Executive V ice President & General Counsel of NEE
Executive V ice President of FPLDecember 1, 2008
January 1, 2009
Eric E. Silagy 56 President and Chief Executive Of ficer of FPL May 30, 2014
______________________
(a)Information is as of February 17, 2022. Executive officers are elected annually by, and serve at the pleasure of, their respective boards of directors. Except as noted below, each
officer has held his/her present position for five years or more and his/her employment history is continuous. Mr. Coffey served as Vice President, Nuclear for FPL from May 2019 to
June 2021. He previously was Regional Vice President for FPL's southern fleet from January 2018 to May 2019 and Site Vice President at Point Beach from May 2016 to January
2018. Mr. Ketchum served as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of NEE and FPL from March 2016 to February 2019. Ms. Kujawa served as Vice
President, Business Management of NextEra Energy Resources from March 2012 to February 2019. Mr. May served as Controller of NextEra Energy Resources from April 2015 to
February 2019. Mr. Reagan served as Vice President, Engineering and Construction of NEE from November 2018 to December 2019 and Vice President, Integrated Supply Chain of
NEE from October 2012 to November 2018.
(b)The following information was announced January 25, 2022 and is effective March 1, 2022. Mr. Robo was appointed as Executive Chairman of NEE and will cease to serve as
President and Chief Executive Officer of NEE and Chairman of FPL. Mr. Ketchum was appointed President and Chief Executive Officer of NEE and will cease to serve as President
and Chief Executive Officer of NextEra Energy Resources. Mrs. Kujawa was appointed as President and Chief Executive Officer of NextEra Energy Resources and will cease to
serve as Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer of NEE and FPL. T. Kirk Crews II, age 43, was appointed Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief
Financial Officer of NEE and FPL. Mr. Crews served as Vice President, Business Management since March 2019 and was Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer of
NEE from September 2016 until March 2019. Mr. Silagy will take on the added responsibility of Chairman of FPL.(a)
(b)
(b)
(b)
(b)
20
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors
Risks Relating to NEE's and FPL's Business
The business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL are subject to a variety of risks, many of which are beyond
the control of NEE and FPL. These risks, as well as additional risks and uncertainties either not presently known or that are currently believed to
not be material to the business, may materially adversely affect the business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and
FPL and may cause actual results of NEE and FPL to differ substantially from those that NEE or FPL currently expects or seeks. In that event, the
market price  for the securities of NEE or FPL could decline. Accordingly , the risks described below should be carefully considered together with
the other information set forth in this report and in future reports that NEE and FPL  file with the SEC.
Regulatory, Legislative and Legal Risks
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected by the
extensive regulation of their business.
The operations of NEE and FPL are subject to complex and comprehensive federal, state and other regulation. This extensive regulatory
framework, portions of which are more specifically identified in the following risk factors, regulates, among other things and to varying degrees,
NEE's and FPL's indust ry, businesses, rates and cost structures, operation and licensing of nuclear power facilities, planning, construction and
operation of electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities and natural gas and oil production, natural gas, oil and other fuel
transportation, processing and storage facilities, acquisition, disposal, depreciation and amortization of facilities and other assets,
decommissioning costs and funding, service reliability , wholesale and retail competition, and commodities trading and derivatives transactions. In
their busines s planning and in the management  of their operations, NEE and FPL must address the effects of regulation on their business and
any inability or failure to do so adequately could have a material adverse effect on their busine ss, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected if they are
unable to recover in a timely manner any significant amount of costs, a return on certai n assets or a reasonable return on invested
capital through base rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory mechanisms or otherwise.
FPL operates as an electric utility and is subject to the jurisdiction of the FPSC over a wide range of business activities, including, among other
items, the retail rates charged to its customers through base rates and cost recovery clauses, the terms and conditions of its services,
procurement of electricity for its customers and fuel for its plant operations, issuances of securities, and aspects of the siting, planning,
construction and operation of its generation plants and transmission and distribution systems for the sale of electric energy . The FPSC has the
authority to disallow recovery by FPL of costs that it considers excessive or imprudently incurred and to determine the level of return that FPL is
permitted to earn on invested capital. The regulatory process, which may be adversely affected by the political, regulatory , operational and
economic environment in Florida and elsewhere,  limits or could otherwise adversely impact FPL's  earnings. The regulatory process also does not
provide any assurance as to achievement of authorized or other earnings levels, or that FPL will be permitted to earn an acceptable return on
capital inves tments it wishes to make. NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially
adversely affected if any material amount of costs, a return on certain assets or a reasonable  return on invested capital cannot be recovered
through base  rates, cost recovery clauses, other regulatory mechanisms or otherwise. Certain other subsidiaries of NEE are utilities subject to the
jurisdiction of their regulators and are subject to similar risks.
Regulatory decisions that are important to NEE and FPL may be materially adversely affected by political, regulatory , operational and
economic factors.
The local and national political, regulatory and economic environment has had, and may in the future have, an adverse effect on regulatory
decisions with negative consequences for NEE and FPL. These decisions, which may come from any level of government, may require, for
example, FPL or NEER to cancel or delay planned development activities, to reduce or delay other planned capital expenditures or to pay for
investments or otherwise incur costs that it may not be able to recover through rates or otherwis e, each of which could have a material adverse
effect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
FPL's use of derivative instruments could be subject to prudence challenges and, if found  imprudent, could result in disallowances of
cost recovery for such use by the FPSC.
The FPSC engages in an annual prudence revie w of FPL's use of derivative instruments in its risk management fuel procurement program and
should it find any such use to be imprudent, the FPSC could deny cost recovery for such use by FPL. Such an outcome could have a material
adverse ef fect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
21
Table of Contents
Any reduct ions or modifications to, or the elimination of, governmental incentives or policies that support utility scale renewable
energy , including, but not limited to, tax laws, policies and incentives, RPS and feed-in-tariffs, or the imposition of additional taxes,
tariffs, dutie s or other assessments on renewable energy or the equipment necessary to generate or deliver it, could result in, among
other items, the lack of a satisfactory market for the development and/or financing  of new renewable energy projects, NEER
abandoning the development of renewable energy projects, a loss of NEER's investments in renewable energy projects and reduced
project returns, any of which could have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEER depends heavily on government policies that support utility scale renewable energy and enhance the economic feasibility of developing
and operatin g wind and solar energy projects in regions in which NEER operates or plans to develop and operate renewable energy facilities.
The federal government, a majority of state governments in the U.S. and portions of Canada provide incentives, such as tax incentives, RPS or
feed-in-tarif fs, that support or are designed to support the sale of energy from utility scale renewable energy facilities, such as wind and solar
energy facilities. At the same time, the U.S. government generally has not taken action to materia lly burden the international supply chain that has
been important to the development of renewable energy facilities at acceptable prices. As a result of budgetary constraints, political factors or
otherwise, governments from time to time may review their laws and policies that support, or do not overly burden, the development and
operation of renewable energy facilities and, instead, consider actions that would make the laws and policies less conducive to the development
and operation of renewable energy facilities. Any reductions or modifications to, or the elimina tion of, governmental incentives or policies that
support renewable energy or the imposition of additional taxes, tariffs, duties or other assessments on renewable energy or the equipment
necessary to generate or deliver it, could result in, among other items, the lack of a satisfactory market for the development and/or financing of
new renewable energy projects, NEER abandoning the development of renewable energy projects, a loss of NEER's investments in the projects
and reduced  project returns, any of which could  have a material adverse effect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected as a result of
new or revised laws or regulations or interpretations of these laws and regulations.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess is influenced by various legislative and regulatory initiatives, including, but not limited to, new or revised laws,
including international trade laws, regulations and interpretations, constitutional ballot and regulatory initiatives regarding deregulation or
restructuring of the energy industry , regulation of the commodities trading and derivatives markets, and regulation of environmental matters, such
as regulation  of air emissions, regulation of wate r consumption and water discharges, and regulation of gas and oil infrastructure operations, as
well as associated environmental permitting. Changes in the nature of the regulation of NEE's and FPL's business could have a material adverse
effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. NEE and FPL are unable to predict future legislative
or regulatory changes, including through constitu tional ballot initiatives or changed legal or regulatory interpretations, although any such changes
may increase costs and competitive pressures on NEE and FPL, which could have a materia l adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
FPL has limited competit ion in the Florida market for retail electricity customers. Any changes in Florida law or regulation, whether through new or
modified legislation or regulation or through citizen-approved state constitutional ballot initiatives, which introduce competition in the Florida retail
electricity market, such as government incentiv es that facilitate the installation of solar genera tion facilities on residential or other rooftops at
below cost or that are otherwise subsidized by non-participants, or would permit third-party sales of electricity , could have a material adverse
effect on FPL's business , financial condition, results of operations and prospects. There can be no assurance that FPL will be able to respond
adequately to such regulatory changes, which could have a material adverse effect on FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations
and prospects.
NEER is subject to FERC rules related to transmission that are designed to facilitate competition in the wholesale market on practically a
nationwide basis by providing greater certainty , flexibility and more choices to wholesale power customers. NEE cannot predict the impact of
changing FERC rules or the effect of changes in levels of wholesale supply and demand, which are typically driven by factors beyond NEE's
control. There can be no assurance that NEER will be able to respond adequately or sufficiently quickly to such rules and developments, or to
any changes that reverse or restrict the competitive restructuring of the energy industry in those jurisdictions in which such restructuring has
occurred. Any of these events could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subject to numerous envir onmental laws, regulations and other standards that may result in capital expenditures,
increased operating costs and various liabilities, and may require NEE and FPL  to limit or eliminate certain operations.
NEE and FPL are subje ct to domestic environm ental laws, regulations and other standards, including, but not limited to, extensive federal, state
and local environmental statutes, rules and regulations relating to air quality , water quality and usage, soil quality , climate change, emissions of
greenhouse gases, including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide, waste management, hazardous wastes, marine, avian and other wildlife mortality
and habitat protection, historical artifact preservation, natural resources, health (including, but not limited to, electric and magnetic fields from
power lines and substations), safety and RPS, that could, among other things, prevent or delay  the development of power generation, power or
natural gas transmission, or other infrastructure  projects, restrict or enjoin the output of some existing facilities, limit the availability and use of
some fuels
22
Table of Contents
required for the production of electricity , require additional pollution control equipment, and otherwise increase costs, increase capital
expenditures and limit or eliminate certain operations. Certain subsidiaries of NEE are also subje ct to foreign environmental laws, regulations and
other standards and, as such, are subject to similar risks.
There are significant capital, operating and other costs associated with compliance with these environmental statutes, rules and regulations, and
those costs could be even more significant in the future as a result of new requirements and stricter or more expansive application of existing
environmental laws and regulations.
Violations of current or future laws, rules, regulations or other standards could expose NEE and FPL to regulatory and legal proceedings,
disputes with, and legal challenges by, governmental entities and third parties, and potentially significant civil fines, criminal penalties and other
sanctions, such as restrictions on how NEER develops, sites and operates wind facilities. These violations could result in, without limitation,
litigation regarding property damage, personal injury , common law nuisance and enforcement by citizens or governmental authorities of
environmental requirements. For example, the DOJ has alleged that certain NEER subsidiaries have violated the Migratory Bird Treaty Act
(MBT A) and/or the Bald and Golden Eagle Prote ction Act (BGEP A) as a result of accidental collisions of eagles into wind turbines at the NEER
subsidiaries’  wind facilities without subsidiaries  having permits under BGEP A for those activities. If NEER is unsuccessful in reaching a
satisfactory settlement of this issue with the DOJ or if additional eagles perish in collisions with wind turbines at NEER’ s facilities without NEER
having obtained permits for those activities, NEER or its subsidiaries may face criminal prosecution under these laws.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess could be negatively affected by federal or state laws or regula tions mandating new or additional limits on
the production of greenhouse gas emissions.
Federal or state laws or regulations may be adop ted that would impose new or additional limits on the emissions of greenhouse gases, including,
but not limited to, carbon dioxide and methane, from electric generation units using fuels like coal and natural gas. The potential effects of
greenhouse gas emission limits on NEE's and FPL's electric generation units are subject to significant uncertainties based on, among other
things, the timing of the implementation of any new requirements, the required levels of emission reductions, the nature of any market-based or
tax-based mechanisms adopted to facilitate reductions, the relative availability of greenhouse gas emission reduction offsets, the development of
cost-ef fective, commercial-scale carbon capture  and storage technology and supporting regulations and liability mitigation measures, and the
range of available compliance alternatives.
While NEE's and FPL's electric generation portfolio emits greenhouse gases at a lower rate of emissions than most of the U.S. electric generation
sector , the results of operations of NEE and FPL could be materially adversely affected to the extent that new federal or state laws or regulations
impose any new greenhouse gas emission limits. Any future limits on greenhouse gas emissions could:
•create substantial additional costs in the form of taxes or emissions allowances;
•make some of NEE's and FPL's electric generation units uneconomical to operate in the long term;
•require significant capital investment in carbon capture and storage technology , fuel switching, or the replacement of high-emitting generation
facilities with lower-emitting generation facilities; or
•affect the availability or cost of fuel, such as natural gas.
There can be no assura nce that NEE or FPL would be able to completely recover any such costs or investments, which could have a material
adverse ef fect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Extensive federal regulation of the operation s and businesses of NEE and FPL exposes  NEE and FPL to significant and increasing
compliance costs and may also expose them to substantial monetary penalties and other sanctions for compliance failures.
NEE's and FPL's operations and businesses are subject to extensive federal regulation, which generally imposes significant and increasing
compliance costs on their operations and busine sses. Additionally , any actual or alleged compliance failures could result in significant costs and
other potentially adverse effects of regulatory investigations, proceedings, settlements, decisions and claims, including, among other items,
potentially significant monetary penalties. As an example, under the Energy Policy Act of 2005, NEE and FPL, as owners and operators of bulk-
power transmission systems and/or electric generation facilities, are subject to mandatory reliability standards. Compliance with these mandatory
reliability standards may subject NEE and FPL to higher operating costs and may result in increased capital expenditures. If FPL or NEE is found
not to be in compliance with these standards, they may incur substantial monetary penalties and other sanctions. Both the costs of regulatory
compliance and the costs that may be imposed as a result of any actual or alleged compliance failures could have a material adverse effect on
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Changes in tax laws, guidance or policies, including but not limited to changes in corpo rate income tax rates, as well as judgments
and estimat es used in the determination of tax-related asset and liability amounts, could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
23
Table of Contents
NEE's and FPL's provis ion for income taxes and reporting of tax-related assets and liabilities require significant judgments and the use of
estimates. Amounts of tax-related assets and liabilities involve judgments and estimates of the timing and probability of recognition of income,
deductions and tax credits, including, but not limited to, estimates for potential adverse outcomes regarding tax positions that have been taken
and the ability to utilize tax benefit carryforwar ds, such as net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards. Actual income taxes could vary
significantly from estimated amounts due to the future impacts of, among other things, chang es in tax laws, guidance or policies, including
changes in corporate income tax rates, the financial condition and results of operations of NEE and FPL, and the resolution of audit issues raised
by taxing authorities. These factors, including the ultimate resolution of income tax matters, may result in material adjustments to tax-related
assets and liabilities, which could materially adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially adversely affected due to
adverse results of litigation.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be materially affected by adverse results of litigation.
Unfavorable resolution of legal or administrative proceedings in which NEE or FPL is involved or other future legal or administrative proceedings
may have a material adverse ef fect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
Development and Operational Risks
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could suffer if NEE and FPL do not proceed with
projects under development or are unable to complete the construction of, or capital improvements to, electric generation,
transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities or other facilities on schedule or within budget.
NEE's and FPL's ability to proceed with projects under development and to complete construction of, and capital improvement projects for, their
electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities and other facilities on schedule and within budget may be
adversely affected by escalating costs for materials and labor and regulatory compliance, inability to obtain or renew necessary licenses, rights-
of-way , permits or other approvals on accepta ble terms or on schedule, disputes involving contractors, labor organizations, land owners,
governmental entities, environmental groups, Native American and aboriginal groups, lessors, joint venture partners and other third parties,
negative publicity , transmission interconnection issues, supply chain disruptions and other facto rs. For example, the ability of NEE and FPL to
develop solar generation facilities is dependent on the international supply chain for solar panels and associated equipment, and regulatory
actions have  caused minor , and could in the future cause material, disruptions in the ability of NEE and FPL to acquire solar panels on time and
at acceptabl e costs. If any development project or construction or capital improvement project is not completed, is delayed or is subject to cost
overruns, certain associ ated costs may not be approved for recovery or otherwise be recovera ble through regulatory mechanisms that may be
available, and NEE and FPL could become obligated to make delay or termination payments or become obligated for other damages under
contracts, could experience the loss of tax credits or tax incentives, or delayed or diminished returns, and could be required to write off all or a
portion of their investment in the project. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL face risks related to project siting, financing, construction, permitting, governmental approvals and the negotiation of
project development agreements that may impede their development and operating activities.
NEE and FPL own, develop, construct, manage and operate electric generation and transmission  facilities and natural gas transmission facilities.
A key comp onent of NEE's and FPL's growth is their ability to construct and operate generation and transmission facilities to meet customer
needs. As part of these operations, NEE and FPL must periodically apply for licenses and permits from various local, state, federal and other
regulatory authorities and abide by their respecti ve conditions. Should NEE or FPL be unsuccess ful in obtaining necessary licenses or permits on
acceptable terms or resolving third-party challenges to such licenses or permits, should there be a delay in obtaining or renewing necessary
licenses or permits or should regulatory authorities initiate any associated investigations or enforcement actions or impose related penalties or
disallowances on NEE or FPL, NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely
affected. Any failure to negotiate successful project development agreements for new facilities with third parties could have similar results.
The operati on and maintenance of NEE's and FPL's electric generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure
facilities, retail gas distribution system in Florida and other facilities are subject to many operational risks, the consequences of which
could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's electri c generation, transmission and distribution facilities, gas infrastructure facilities, retail gas distribution system in Florida
and other facilities are subject to many operational risks. Operational risks could result in, among other things, lost revenues due to prolonged
outages, increased expe nses due to monetary penalties or fines for compliance failures or legal claims, liability to third parties for property and
personal injury damage or loss of life, a failure to perform under applicable power sales agreem ents or other agreements and associated loss of
revenues from terminated agreements or liability for liquidated
24
Table of Contents
damages under continuing agreements, and replacement equipment costs or an obligation to purchase or generate replacement power at higher
prices.
Uncertainties and risks inherent in operating and maintaining NEE's and FPL's facilities include, but are not limited to:
•risks associa ted with facility start-up operations, such as whether the facility will achieve projec ted operating performance on schedule and
otherwise as planned;
•failures in the availability , acquisition or transportation of fuel or other necessary supplies;
•the impact of unusual or adverse weather conditions and natural disasters, including, but not limited to, hurricanes, tornadoes, extreme
temperatures, icing events, floods, earthquakes and droughts;
•performance below expected or contracted levels of output or ef ficiency;
•breakdown or failure, including, but not limited to, explosions, fires, leaks or other major even ts, of equipment, transmission or distribution
systems or pipelines;
•availability of replacement equipment;
•risks of property damag e, human injury or loss of life from energized equipment, hazardous substances or explosions, fires, leaks or other
events, especially where facilities are located near populated areas;
•potential environmental impacts of gas infrastructure operations;
•availability of adequate water resources and ability to satisfy water intake and discharge requirements;
•inability to identify , manage properly or mitigate equipment defects in NEE's and FPL's facilities;
•use of new or unproven technology;
•risks associated with dependence on a specific type of fuel or fuel source, such as commodity price risk, availability of adequate fuel supply
and transportation, and lack of available alternative fuel sources;
•increased competition due to, among other factors, new facilities, excess supply , shifting demand and regulatory changes; and
•insuf ficient insurance, warranties or performance guarantees to cover any or all lost revenues or increased expenses from the foregoing.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be negatively affected by a lack of growth or
slower growth in the number of customers or in customer usage.
Growth in customer acco unts and growth of customer usage each directly influence the demand for electricity and the need for additional power
generation and power delivery facilities, as well as the need for energy-related commodities such as natural gas. Customer growth and customer
usage are affected by a number of factors outside the control of NEE and FPL, such as mand ated energy efficiency measures, demand side
management requirements, and economic and demographic conditions, such as population changes, job and income growth, housing starts, new
business formation and the overall level of economic activity . A lack of growth, or a decline, in the number of customers or in customer demand
for electricity or natural gas and other fuels may cause NEE and FPL to fail to fully realize the anticipated benefits from significant investments
and expenditures and could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's growth, business, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial conditio n, results of operations and prospects can be materially adversely affected by weather
conditions, including, but not limited to, the impact of severe weather .
Weather conditions direc tly influence the deman d for electricity and natural gas and other fuels and affect the price of energy and energy-related
commodities. In addition, severe weather and natural disasters, such as hurricanes, floods, tornadoes, droughts, extreme temperatures, icing
events and earthquakes , can be destructive and cause power outages and property damage, reduce revenue, affect the availability of fuel and
water , and require NEE and FPL to incur additional costs, for example, to restore service and repair damaged facilities, to obtain replacement
power and to access available financing sources. Furthermore, NEE's and FPL's physical plants could be placed at greater risk of damage should
changes in the global climate produce unusual variations in temperature and weather patterns, resulting in more intense, frequent and extreme
weather events, abnormal levels of precipitation and, particularly relevant to FPL, a change in sea level. FPL operates in the east and lower west
coasts of Florida and in northwest Florida, areas that historically have been prone to severe weather events, such as hurricanes. A disruption or
failure of electric generation, transmission or distribution systems or natural gas production, transmission, storage or distribution systems in the
event of a hurricane, tornado or other severe weather event, or otherwise, could prevent NEE and FPL from operating their business in the
normal course and could result in any of the adverse consequences described above. Additionally , the actions taken to address the potential for
severe weat her such as additional winterizing of critical equipment and infrastructure, modifying or alternating plant operations and expanding
load shedding options could result in significant increases in costs. Any of the foregoing could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
At FPL and other businesses of NEE where cost recovery is available, recovery of costs to restore service, to repair damaged facilities or for
other actions to address  severe weather is or may be subject to regulatory approval, and any determination by the regulator not to permit timely
and full recovery of the costs incurred could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects.
25
Table of Contents
Changes in weather can also affect the production of electricity at power generation facilities, including, but not limited to, NEER's wind and solar
facilities. For example, the level of wind resource  affects the revenue produced by wind generatio n facilities. Because the levels of wind and solar
resources are variable and difficult to predict, NEER's results of operations for individual wind and solar facilities specifically , and NEE's results of
operations generally , may vary significantly from period to period, depending on the level of available resources. To the extent that resources are
not available at planned levels, the financial results from these facilities may be less than expected.
Threats of terrorism and catastrophic events that could result from terrorism, cyberattack s, or individuals and/or groups attempting to
disrupt NEE's and FPL's business, or the businesses of third parties, may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business,
financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL are subject to the potentially adverse operating and financial effects of terrorist acts and threats, as well as cyberattacks and other
disruptive activities of individuals or groups. There have been cyberattacks within the energy industry on energy infrastructure such as
substations, gas pipelines and related assets in the past and there may be such attacks in the future. NEE's and FPL's generation, transmission
and distribut ion facilities, fuel storage facilities, information technology systems and other infrastructure facilities and systems could be direct
targets of, or otherwise be materially adversely af fected by , such activities.
Terrorist acts, cyberattacks or other similar events affecting NEE's and FPL's systems and facilities, or those of third parties on which NEE and
FPL rely, could harm NEE's and FPL's business, for example, by limiting their ability to generate, purchase or transmit power , natural gas or other
energy-related commodities, by limiting their ability to bill customers and collect and process payments, and by delaying their development and
construction of new generation, distribution or transmission facilities or capital improvements to existing facilities. These events, and
governmental actions in response, could result in a material decrease in revenues, significant additional costs (for example, to repair assets,
implement additional security requirements or maintain or acquire insurance), significant fines and penalties, and reputational damage, could
materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's operations (for example, by contributing to disruption  of supplies and markets for natural gas, oil and
other fuels), and could impair NEE's and FPL's ability to raise capital (for example, by contrib uting to financial instability and lower economic
activity). In addition, the implementation of security guidelines and measures has resulted in and is expected to continue to result in increased
costs. Such events or actions may materially adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be materially adversely
affected by international, national, state or local events and company-specific events, as well as the financial condition of insurers.
NEE's and FPL's insurance coverage does not provide protection against all significant losses.
Insurance coverage may not continue to be available or may not be available at rates or on terms similar to those presently available to NEE and
FPL. The ability of NEE and FPL to obtain insurance and the terms of any available insurance coverage could be materially adversely affected by
international, national, state or local events and company-specific events, as well as the financial condition of insurers. If insurance coverage is
not available or obtainable on acceptable terms, NEE or FPL may be required to pay costs associated with adverse future events. NEE and FPL
generally are not fully insured against all significant losses. For example, FPL is not fully insured against hurricane-related losses, but could
instead seek  recovery of such uninsured losses from customers subject to approval by the FPSC, to the extent losses exceed restricted funds set
aside to cover the cost of storm damage. A loss for which NEE or FPL is not fully insured could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and
FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE invests in gas and oil producing and transmission assets through NEER’ s gas infrastructure business. The gas infrastructure
business is exposed to fluctuating market prices of natural gas, natural gas liquids, oil and other energy commodities. A prolonged
period of low gas and oil prices could impact NEER’ s gas infrastructure business and cause NEER to delay or cancel certain gas
infrastructure projects and could result in certain projects becoming impaired, which could materially adversely affect NEE's results of
operations.
Natural gas and oil prices are affected by supp ly and demand, both globally and regionally . Factors that influence supply and demand include
operational issues, natural disasters, weather , political instability , conflicts, new discoveries, technological advances, economic conditions and
actions by major oil-producing countries. There can be significant volatility in market prices for gas and oil, and price fluctuations could have a
material effect on the financial performance of gas and oil producing and transmission assets. For example, in a low gas and oil price
environment, NEER would generate less reven ue from its gas infrastructure investments in gas and oil producing properties, and as a result
certain investments might become less profitable or incur losses. Prolonged periods of low oil and gas prices could also result in the delay or
cancellation of oil and gas production and transmission projects, could cause projects to experience lower returns, and could result in certain
projects becoming impaired, which could materially adversely af fect NEE's results of operations.
26
Table of Contents
If supply costs necess ary to provide NEER's full energy and capacity requirement services are not favorable, operating costs could
increase and materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEER provides full energy and capacity requirements  services primarily to distribution utilities, which include load-following services and various
ancillary services, to satisfy all or a portion of such utilities' power supply obligations to their customers. The supply costs for these transactions
may be affected by a number of factors, includin g, but not limited to, events that may occur after such utilities have committed to supply power ,
such as weather conditi ons, fluctuating prices for energy and ancillary services, and the ability of the distribution utilities' customers to elect to
receive service from competing suppliers. NEER may not be able to recover all of its increa sed supply costs, which could have a material
adverse ef fect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Due to the potential for significant volatility in market prices for fuel, electricity and renew able and other energy commodities, NEER's
inability or failure to manage properly or hedge effectively the commodity risks within its portfolios could materially adversely affect
NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
There can be significant volatility in market prices for fuel, electricity and renewable and other energy commodities. NEE's inability or failure to
manage properly or hedge effectively its assets or positions against changes in commodity prices, volumes, interest rates, counterparty credit risk
or other risk measures, based on factors that are either within, or wholly or partially outside of, NEE's control, may materially adversely affect
NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Reductions in the liquidity of energy markets may restrict the ability of NEE to manage its operational risks, which, in turn, could
negatively affect NEE's results of operations.
NEE is an active participant in energy markets. The liquidity of regional energy markets is an important factor in NEE's ability to manage risks in
these operations. Market liquidity is driven in part by the number of active market participants. Liquidity in the energy markets can be adversely
affected by price volatility , restrictions on the availability of credit and other factors, and any reduction in the liquidity of energy markets could have
a material adverse ef fect on NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's hedging and trading procedures and associated risk management tools may not protect against significant losses.
NEE and FPL have hedging and trading procedures and associated risk management tools, such as separate but complementary financial,
credit, operational, compliance and legal reporting systems, internal controls, management review processes and other mechanisms. NEE and
FPL are unable to assure that such procedures and tools will be effective against all potential risks, including, without limitation, employee
misconduct or severe weather or operating cond itions. If such procedures and tools are not effective, this could have a material adverse effect on
NEE's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If price movements significantly or persistently deviate from historical behavior , NEE's and FPL's risk management tools associated
with their hedging and trading procedures may not protect against significant losses.
NEE's and FPL's risk management tools and metrics associated with their hedging and trading procedures, such as daily value at risk, earnings
at risk, stop loss limits and liquidity guidelines , are based on historical price movements. Due to the inherent uncertainty involved in price
movements and potential deviation from historic al pricing behavior , NEE and FPL are unable to assure that their risk management tools and
metrics will be ef fective to protect against material adverse ef fects on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If power transmission or natural gas, nuclear  fuel or other commodity transportation facilities are unavailable or disrupted, the ability
for subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, to sell and deliver power or natural gas may be limited.
Subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL, depend upon power transmission and natural gas, nuclear fuel and other commodity transportation facilities,
many of which they do not own. Occurrences affecting the operation of these facilities that may or may not be beyond the control of subsidiaries
of NEE, including FPL, (such as severe weather or a generation or transmission facility outage, pipeline rupture, or sudden and significant
increase or decrease in wind or solar generation ) may limit or halt their ability to sell and deliver power and natural gas, or to purchase necessary
fuels and other commodities, which could materially adversely impact NEE's and FPL's busine ss, financial condition, results of operations and
prospects.
NEE and FPL  are subject to credit and performance risk from customers, hedging counterparties and vendors.
NEE and FPL are expos ed to risks associated with the creditworthiness and performance of their customers, hedging counterparties and vendors
under contracts for the supply of equipment, materials, fuel and other goods and services required for their business operations and for the
construction and operation of, and for capital improvements to, their facilities. Adverse condition s in the energy industry or the general economy ,
as well as circumstances of individual customers, hedging
27
Table of Contents
counterparties and vendors, may adversely affect the ability of some customers, hedging counterparties and vendors to perform as required
under their contracts with NEE and FPL.
If any hedging, vending or other counterparty fails to fulfill its contractual obligations, NEE and FPL may need to make arrangements with other
counterparties or vendors, which could result in material financial losses, higher costs, untimely completion of power generation facilities and
other projects, and/or a disruption of their operations. If a defaulting counterparty is in poor financial condition, NEE and FPL may not be able to
recover damages for any contract breach.
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses or a reduction in operating cash flows  if a counterparty fails to perform or make
payments in accordance with the terms of derivative contracts or if NEE or FPL is required to post margin cash collateral under
derivative contracts.
NEE and FPL use derivative instruments, such as swaps, options, futures and forwards, some  of which are traded in the OTC markets or on
exchanges, to manage their commodity and financial market risks, and for NEE to engage in trading and marketing activities. Any failures by their
counterparties to perform or make payments in accordance with the terms of those transactions could have a material adverse effect on NEE's or
FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects. Similarly , any requirement for FPL or NEE to post margin cash collateral
under its derivative contr acts could have a material adverse effect on its business, financial cond ition, results of operations and prospects. These
risks may be increased during periods of adverse market or economic conditions af fecting the industry in which NEE and FPL  participate.
NEE and FPL are highly dependent on sens itive and complex information technology systems, and any failure or breach of those
systems could have a material adverse effect on their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL operate in a highly regulated industry that requires the continuous functioning of sophisticated information technology systems and
network infrastructure. Despite NEE's and FPL's  implementation of security measures, all of their technology systems are vulnerable to disability ,
failures or unauthorized access due to such activities. If NEE's or FPL's information technology  systems were to fail or be breached, sensitive
confidential and other data could be compromised and NEE and FPL  could be unable to fulfill critical business functions.
NEE's and FPL's business is highly dependent on their ability to process and monitor , on a daily basis, a very large number of transactions, many
of which are highly complex and cross numerou s and diverse markets. Due to the size, scope, complexity and geographical reach of NEE's and
FPL's business, the development and maintena nce of information technology systems to keep track of and process information is critical and
challenging. NEE's and FPL's operating systems and facilities may fail to operate properly or become disabled as a result of events that are
either within , or wholly or partially outside of, their control, such as operator error, severe weathe r, terrorist activities or cyber incidents. Any such
failure or disabling even t could materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's ability to proces s transactions and provide services, and their
business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL add, modify and replace informat ion systems on a regular basis. Modifying existing information systems or implementing new or
replacement information  systems is costly and involves risks, including, but not limited to, integrating the modified, new or replacement system
with existing systems and processes, implementing associated changes in accounting procedures and controls, and ensuring that data
conversion is accurate and consistent. Any disruptions or deficiencies in existing information systems, or disruptions, delays or deficiencies in the
modification or implementation of new informat ion systems, could result in increased costs, the inability to track or collect revenues and the
diversion of manageme nt's and employees' attention and resources, and could negatively impact the effectiveness of the companies' control
environment, and/or the companies' ability to timely file required regulatory reports.
NEE and FPL also face the risks of operational failure or capacity constraints of third parties, including, but not limited to, those who provide
power transmission and natural gas transportation services.
NEE's and FPL's retail businesses are subject to the risk that sensitive customer data may be compromised, which could result in a
material adverse impact to their reputation and/or have a material adverse effect on the business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
NEE's and FPL's retail businesses require access to sensitive customer data in the ordinary course of business. NEE's and FPL's retail
businesses may also need to provide sensitive customer data to vendors and service providers who require access to this information in order to
provide services, such as call center services, to the retail businesses. If a significant breach occurred, the reputation of NEE and FPL could be
materially adversely affected, customer confidence could be diminished, or customer information could be subject to identity theft. NEE and FPL
would be subject to costs associated with the breach and/or NEE and FPL could be subject to fines and legal claims, any of which may have a
material adverse ef fect on the business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects of NEE and FPL.
28
Table of Contents
NEE and FPL could recognize financial losses as a result of volatility in the market values of derivative instruments and limited
liquidity in OTC markets.
NEE and FPL execute  transactions in derivative instruments on either recognized exchan ges or via the OTC markets, depending on
management's assessm ent of the most favorable credit and market execution factors. Transactions executed in OTC markets have the potential
for greater volatility and less liquidity than transactions on recognized exchanges. As a result, NEE and FPL may not be able to execute desired
OTC transactions due to such heightened volatility and limited liquidity .
In the absen ce of actively quoted market prices  and pricing information from external sources, the valuation of derivative instruments involves
management's judgment and use of estimates. As a result, changes in the underlying assumptions or use of alternative valuation methods could
affect the reported fair value of these derivative instruments and have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition,
results of operations and prospects.
NEE and FPL  may be materially adversely affected by negative publicity .
From time to time, political and public sentime nt may result in a significant amount of adverse press coverage and other adverse public
statements affecting NEE and FPL. Adverse press coverage and other adverse statements, whether or not driven by political or public sentiment,
may also result in investigations by regulators, legislators and law enforcement officials or in legal claims. Responding to these investigations and
lawsuits, regardless of the ultimate outcome of the proceeding, can divert the time and effort of senior management from NEE's and FPL's
business.
Addressing any adverse publicity , governmenta l scrutiny or enforcement or other legal proce edings is time consuming and expensive and,
regardless of the factual  basis for the assertions being made, can have a negative impact on the reputation of NEE and FPL, on the morale and
performance of their employees and on their relationships with regulators. It may also have a negative impact on their ability to take timely
advantage of various business and market opportunities. The direct and indirect effects of negative publicity , and the demands of responding to
and addressing it, may have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects may be adversely affected if FPL is unable to
maintain, negotiate or renegotiate franchise agreements on acceptable terms with municipalities and counties in Florida.
FPL may negotiate franchise agreements with municipalities and counties in Florida to provide electric services within such municipalities and
counties, and electricity sales generated pursuant to these agreements represent a very substantial portion of FPL's revenues. If FPL is unable to
maintain, negotiate or renegotiate such franchis e agreements on acceptable terms, it could contribute to lower earnings and FPL may not fully
realize the anticipated benefits from significant investments and expenditures, which could adve rsely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial
condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's busin ess, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially adversely affected by work
strikes or stoppages and increasing personnel costs.
Employee strikes or work stoppages could disrupt operations and lead to a loss of revenue and customers. Personnel costs may also increase
due to inflationary or competitive pressures on payroll and benefits costs and revised terms of collective bargaining agreements with union
employees. These consequences could have a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations
and prospects.
NEE's abilit y to successfully identify , complete and integrate acquisitions is subject to significant risks, including, but not limited to,
the effect of increased competition for acquisitions resulting from the consolidation of the energy industry .
NEE is likely  to encounter significant competition for acquisition opportunities that may become available as a result of the consolidation of the
energy industry in gener al. In addition, NEE may be unable to identify attractive acquisition oppo rtunities at favorable prices and to complete and
integrate them successfully and in a timely manner .
Nuclear Generation Risks
The operati on and maintenance of NEE's and FPL's nuclear generation facilities involve environmental, health and financial risks that
could result in fines or the closure of the facilities and in increased costs and capital expenditures.
NEE's and FPL's nuclea r generation facilities are subject to environmental, health and financial risks, including, but not limited to, those relating to
site storage of spent nuclear fuel, the disposition of spent nuclear fuel, leakage and emissions  of tritium and other radioactive elements in the
event of a nuclear accide nt or otherwise, the threat of a terrorist attack or cyber incident and other potential liabilities arising out of the ownership
or operation of the facilities. NEE and FPL maintain decommissioning funds and external insurance coverage which are intended to reduce the
financial exposure to some of these risks; however , the cost of decommissioning nuclear generation facilities could exceed the amount available
in NEE's and FPL's decommissioning funds,
29
Table of Contents
and the exposure to liability and property dama ges could exceed the amount of insurance coverage. If NEE or FPL is unable to recover the
additional costs incurred through insurance or, in the case of FPL, through regulatory mechanis ms, their business, financial condition, results of
operations and prospects could be materially adversely af fected.
In the event of an incid ent at any nuclear generation facility in the U.S. or at certain nuclear generation facilities in Europe, NEE and
FPL could be assess ed significant retrospective assessments and/or retrospective insurance premiums as a result of their
participation in a secondary financial protection system and nuclear insurance mutual companies.
Liability for accidents at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear reactor owners to the
amount of insurance available from both private sources and an industry retrospective payment plan. In accordance with this Act, NEE maintains
the maximum amount of private liability insurance obtainable, and participates in a secondary financial protection system, which provides liability
insurance coverage for an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under the secondary financial protection system, NEE is subject to
retrospective assessmen ts and/or retrospective insurance premiums, plus any applicable taxes, for an incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S.
or at certain  nuclear generation facilities in Euro pe, regardless of fault or proximity to the incident. Such assessments, if levied, could materially
adversely af fect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NRC orders or new regulations related to increased security measures and any future safety requirements promulgated by the NRC
could requi re NEE and FPL to incur substant ial operating and capital expenditures at their nuclear generation facilities and/or result in
reduced revenues.
The NRC has broad authority to impose licens ing and safety-related requirements for the operation and maintenance of nuclear generation
facilities, the addition of capacity at existing nuclear generation facilities and the construction  of new nuclear generation facilities, and these
requirements are subject to change. In the event of non-compliance, the NRC has the author ity to impose fines and/or shut down a nuclear
generation facility , depending upon the NRC's assessment of the severity of the situation, until compliance is achieved. Any of the foregoing
events could require NEE and FPL  to incur increased costs and capital expenditures, and could reduce revenues.
Any serious nuclear incident occurring at a NEE or FPL plant could result in substantial remediati on costs and other expenses. A major incident at
a nuclear facility anywhe re in the world could cause the NRC to limit or prohibit the operation or licensing of any domestic nuclear generation
facility . An incident at a nuclear facility anywhere in the world also could cause the NRC to impose additional conditions or other requirements on
the industry , or on certain types of nuclear generation units, which could increase costs, reduce revenues and result in additional capital
expenditures.
The inability to operate any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation units through the end of their respective operating licenses could
have a mater ial adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
If any of NEE's or FPL's nuclear generation facilities are not operated for any reason through the life of their respective operating licenses, NEE
or FPL may be required  to increase depreciatio n rates, incur impairment charges and accelerate future decommissioning expenditures, any of
which could materially adversely af fect their business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
NEE's and FPL's nuclear units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages,
and for other purposes . If planned outages last longer than anticipated or if there are unplanned outages, NEE's and FPL's results of
operations and financial condition could be materially adversely affected.
NEE's and FPL's nuclea r units are periodically removed from service to accommodate planned refueling and maintenance outages, including, but
not limited to, inspections, repairs and certain other modifications as well as to replace equipm ent. In the event that a scheduled outage lasts
longer than anticipated or in the event of an unplanned outage due to, for example, equipment failure, such outages could materially adversely
affect NEE's or FPL's business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Liquidity, Capital Requirements and Common Stock Risks
Disruptions, uncertain ty or volatility in the credit and capital markets, among other factors, may negatively affect NEE's and FPL's
ability to fund their liquidity and capital need s and to meet their growth objectives, and can also materially adversely affect the results
of operations and financial condition of NEE and FPL.
NEE and FPL rely on access to capital and credit markets as significant sources of liquidity  for capital requirements and other operations
requirements that are not satisfied by operating cash flows. Disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in those capital and credit markets, including, but
not limited to, the planned phase out of the London Inter-Bank Offered Rate or the reform or replacement of other benchmark rates, could
increase NEE's and FPL's cost of capital and affect their ability to fund their liquidity and capital needs and to meet their growth objectives. If NEE
or FPL is unable to access regularly the capital and credit markets on terms that are reasona ble, it may have to delay raising capital, issue
shorter-term securities and incur an unfavorable cost of
30
Table of Contents
capital, which, in turn, could adversely affect its ability to grow its business, could contribute to lower earnings and reduced financial flexibility , and
could have a material adverse ef fect on its business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects.
Although NEE's competitive energy and certain other subsidiaries have used non-recourse or limited-recourse, project-specific or other financing
in the past, market cond itions and other factors could adversely affect the future availability of such financing. The inability of NEE's subsidiaries,
including, without limitation, NEECH and its subs idiaries, to access the capital and credit markets  to provide project-specific or other financing for
electric generation or other facilities or acquisitions on favorable terms, whether because of disruptions or volatility in those markets or otherwise,
could necessitate additional capital raising or borrowings by NEE and/or NEECH in the future.
The inability of subsidiaries that have existing project-specific or other financing arrangements to meet the requirements of various agreements
relating to those financings, as well as actions by third parties or lenders, could give rise to a project-specific financing default which, if not cured
or waived, might result in the specific project, and potentially in some limited instances its parent companies, being required to repay the
associated debt or other borrowings earlier than otherwise anticipated, and if such repayment were not made, the lenders or security holders
would gener ally have rights to foreclose against the project assets and related collateral. Such an occurrence also could result in NEE expending
additional funds or incurring additional obligations over the shorter term to ensure continuing compliance with project-specific financing
arrangements based upon the expectation of improvement in the project's performance or financial returns over the longer term. Any of these
actions could materially adversely affect NEE's business, financial condition, results of operatio ns and prospects, as well as the availability or
terms of future financings for NEE or its subsidiaries.
NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's inability to maintain their current credit ratings may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's liquidity
and results of operations, limit the ability of NEE and FPL  to grow their business, and increase interest costs.
The inability of NEE, NEECH and FPL to maintain their current credit ratings could materially adversely affect their ability to raise capital or obtain
credit on favorable terms, which, in turn, could impact NEE's and FPL's ability to grow their business and service indebtedness and repay
borrowings, and would likely increase their interest costs. In addition, certain agreements and guarantee arrangements would require posting of
additional collateral in the event of a ratings downgrade. Some of the factors that can affect credit ratings are cash flows, liquidity , the amount of
debt as a component of total capitalization, NEE's overall business mix and political, legislative and regulatory actions. There can be no
assurance that one or more of the ratings of NEE, NEECH and FPL  will not be lowered or withdrawn entirely by a rating agency .
NEE's and FPL's liquidity may be impaired if their credit providers are unable to fund their credit commitments to the companies or to
maintain their current credit ratings.
The inability  of NEE's, NEECH's and FPL's credit providers to fund their credit commitments or to maintain their current credit ratings could
require NEE, NEECH or FPL, among other things, to renegotiate requirements in agreements, find an alternative credit provider with acceptable
credit ratings to meet funding requirements, or post cash collateral and could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's liquidity .
Poor market performance and other economic factors could affect NEE's defined bene fit pension plan's funded status, which may
materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations and prospects.
NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for substantially all employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. A decline in the
market value of the assets held in the defined benefit pension plan due to poor investment perfor mance or other factors may increase the funding
requirements for this obligation.
NEE's defined benefit pension plan is sensitive to changes in interest rates, since as interest rates decrease, the funding liabilities increase,
potentially increasing benefits costs and fundin g requirements. Any increase in benefits costs or funding requirements may have a material
adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity , results of operations and prospects.
Poor market performance and other econ omic factors could adversely affect the asset values of NEE's and FPL's nuclear
decommissioning funds, which may materially adversely affect NEE's and FPL's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE and FPL are required to maintain decommissioning funds to satisfy their future obligations to decommission their nuclear power plants. A
decline in the market value of the assets held in the decommissioning funds due to poor investm ent performance or other factors may increase
the funding requirement s for these obligations. Any increase in funding requirements may have  a material adverse effect on NEE's and FPL's
liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
31
Table of Contents
Certain of NEE's investments are subject to changes in market value and other risks, which may materially adversely affect NEE's
liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE holds certain investments where changes in the fair value affect NEE's financial results. In some cases there may be no observable market
values for these investm ents, requiring fair value estimates to be based on other valuation techniques. This type of analysis requires significant
judgment and the actual values realized in a sale of these investments could differ materially from those estimated. A sale of an investment below
previously estimated value, or other decline in the fair value of an investment, could result in losses or the write-of f of such investment, and may
have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's liquidity , financial condition and results of operations.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if its subsidiaries
are unable to pay upstream dividends or repay funds to NEE.
NEE is a holding compa ny and, as such, has no material operations of its own. Substantially all of NEE's consolidated assets are held by its
subsidiaries. NEE's ability to meet its financial obligations, including, but not limited to, its guarantees, and to pay dividends on its common stock
is primarily dependent on its subsidiaries' net income and cash flows, which are subject to the risks of their respective businesses, and their
ability to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds to NEE.
NEE's subsidiaries are separate legal entities and have no independent obligation to provide NEE with funds for its payment obligations. The
subsidiaries have financial obligations, including, but not limited to, payment of debt service, which they must satisfy before they can provide NEE
with funds. In addition, in the event of a subsidia ry's liquidation or reorganization, NEE's right to participate in a distribution of assets is subject to
the prior claims of the subsidiary's creditors.
The dividen d-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restrictions  which are contained in outstanding financing
agreements and which may be included in future  financing agreements. The future enactment of laws or regulations also may prohibit or restrict
the ability of NEE's subsidiaries to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds.
NEE may be unable to meet its ongoing and future financial obligations and to pay dividends on its common stock if NEE is required to
perform under guarantees of obligations of its subsidiaries.
NEE guarantees many of the obligations of its consolidated subsidiaries, other than FPL, through guarantee agreements with NEECH. These
guarantees may require NEE to provide substan tial funds to its subsidiaries or their creditors or counterparties at a time when NEE is in need of
liquidity to meet its own financial obligations. Funding such guarantees may materially adve rsely affect NEE's ability to meet its financial
obligations or to pay dividends.
NEP may not be able to access sources of capital on commercially reasonable terms, whic h would have a material adverse effect on its
ability to consummate future acquisitions and on the value of NEE’ s limited partner interest in NEP  OpCo.
Through an indirect wholly owned subsidiary , NEE owns a limited partner interest in NEP OpCo. NEP's inability to access capital on commercially
reasonable terms and effectively consummate future acquisitions could have a material adverse effect on NEP's ability to grow its cash
distributions to its common unitholders, including NEE, and on the value of NEE’ s limited partnership interest in NEP OpCo. In addition, NEP's
issuance of additional common units, securities convertible into NEP common units or other secu rities in connection with acquisitions could cause
significant common unitholder dilution and reduce cash distributions to its common unithold ers, including NEE, if the acquisitions are not
sufficiently accretive.
Disruptions, uncertain ty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may exert downward pressure on the market price of NEE's
common stock.
The market price and trading volume of NEE's common stock are subject to fluctuations as a result of, among other factors, general credit and
capital mark et condition s and changes in market sentiment regarding the operations, business and financing strategies of NEE and its
subsidiaries. As a result,  disruptions, uncertainty or volatility in the credit and capital markets may, for example, have a material adverse effect on
the market price of NEE's common stock.
Widespread public health crises and epidemics or pandemics may have material adverse impacts on NEE’ s and FPL's business,
financial condition, liquidity and results of operations.
NEE and FPL are subject to the impacts of widespread public health crises, epidemics and pandemics, including, but not limited to, impacts on
the global, national or local economy , capital and credit markets, NEE's and FPL's workforce, customers and suppliers. There is no assurance
that NEE's and FPL's businesses will be able to operate without material adverse impacts depending on the nature of the public health crisis,
epidemic or pandemic. The ultimate severity , duration and impact of public health crises, epidemics and pandemics cannot be predicted.
Additionally , there is no assurance that vaccines, or other treatments, are or will be widely availab le or effective, or that the public will be willing to
participate, in an effort to contain the spread of disease. Actions taken in response to such crises by federal, state and local government or
regulatory agencies may have a material adverse impact on NEE's and FPL's business, financial condition, liquidity and results of operations.
32
Table of Contents
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None
Item 2. Properties
See Item 1. Business – FPL and Item 1. Business – NEER for a description of principal properties.
Character of Ownership
Substantially all of FPL's  properties are subject to the lien of FPL's mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL. The majority of
FPL's real property is held in fee and is free from other encumbrances, subject to minor excepti ons which are not of a nature as to substantially
impair the usefulness to FPL of such properties. Some of FPL's electric lines are located on parcels of land which are not owned in fee by FPL
but are covered by necessary consents of gove rnmental authorities or rights obtained from owners of private property . Subsidiaries within the
NEER segment have ownership interests in entities that own generation facilities, pipeline facilities and transmission assets and a number of
those facilities and asse ts are encumbered by liens securing various financings. Additionally , the majority of NEER's generation facilities, pipeline
facilities and transmission lines are located on land under easement or leased from owners of private property . See Note 7 – FPL  and – NEER.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
With regard  to environmental proceedings to which a governmental authority is a party , NEE's and FPL's policy is to disclose any such
proceeding if it is reasonably expected to result in monetary sanctions of greater than or equal to $1 million.
The Environment and Natural Resources Division of the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) indicated to NEER during the fourth quarter of 2021
that its final position is that the act of an eagle flying into a wind turbine that results in the death of the eagle is a crime under the Migratory Bird
Treaty Act (MBT A) and Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act (BGEP A). The DOJ is investigating eagle fatalities that have occurred in proximity
to a number  of wind facilities operated by NEER, primarily in the Altamont region of California and in Wyoming, and alleges that the facilities
caused eagle fatalities without having a permit in violation of the BGEP A and/or the MBTA. NEER undertakes adaptive management practices
designed to avoid and minimize eagle impacts and is working with both the DOJ and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service toward a constructive
resolution that would resolve all prior fatalities at wind facilities operated by NEER nationwide, even though federal courts covering large portions
of the U.S. have concluded that these statutes are intended to cover only hunting, poaching and other intentional acts and do not apply to
accidental collisions with wind turbines or other structures, such as airplanes and buildings. NEE anticipates that any such resolution would not
have a material adverse impact on its business, financial condition, results of operations or prospects.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable
33
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5.  Market for Registrants' Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Common Stock Data. All of FPL's common stock is owned by NEE. NEE's common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange under
the symbol "NEE." As of January 31, 2022, there were 15,274 holders of record of NEE's common stock. The amount and timing of dividends
payable on NEE's common stock are within the sole discretion of NEE's Board of Directors. The Board of Directors reviews the dividend rate at
least annually (generally in February) to determin e its appropriateness in light of NEE's financial position and results of operations, legislative and
regulatory developments affecting the electric utility industry in general and FPL in particular , competitive conditions, change in business mix and
any other factors the Board of Directors deems relevant. In February 2022, NEE announced that it would increase its quarterly dividend on its
common stock from $0.385 per share to $0.425 per share.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities. Information regarding purchases made by NEE of its common stock during the three months
ended December 31, 2021 is as follows:
PeriodTotal
Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage
Price Paid
Per ShareTotal Number of Shares
Purchased as Part of a
Publicly Announced ProgramMaximum Number of
Shares that May Yet be
Purchased Under the
Program
10/1/21 – 10/31/21 — — — 180,000,000
11/1/21 – 11/30/21 1,350$ 87.34 — 180,000,000
12/1/21 – 12/31/21 1,306$ 90.78 — 180,000,000
Total 2,656$ 89.03 —  
______________________
(a)Includes: (1) in November 2021, shares of common stock withheld from employees to pay certain withholding taxes upon the vesting of stock awards granted to such employees
under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan; and (2) in December 2021, shares of common stock purchased as a reinvestment of
dividends by the trustee of a grantor trust in connection with NEE's obligation under a February 2006 grant under the NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated Long-Term
Incentive Plan (former LTIP) to an executive officer of deferred retirement share awards.
(b)In May 2017, NEE's Board of Directors authorized repurchases of up to 45 million shares of common stock (180 million shares after giving effect to the four-for-one stock split of NEE
common stock effective October 26, 2020) over an unspecified period.
Item 6.  Reserved(a) (b)
34
Table of Contents
Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
OVERVIEW
NEE’ s operating performance is driven primaril y by the operations of its two principal businesses, FPL, which serves more than 5.7 million
customer accounts in Florida and is one of the largest electric utilities in the U.S., and NEER, which together with affiliated entities is the world's
largest generator of renewable energy from the wind and sun based on 2021 MWh produced on a net generation basis. The table below presents
net income (loss)  attributable  to NEE and earnings (loss) per share attribut able to NEE, assuming dilution, by reportable segment, the FPL
segment and NEER, as well as an operating segment of NEE, Gulf Power , which was acquired by NEE in January 2019 and merged into FPL on
January 1, 2021 (see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company ). Corporate and Other is primarily comprised of the operating results of
other business activities, as well as other income  and expense items, including interest expense, and eliminating entries, and may include the net
effect of rounding.  The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements contained herein
and all comparisons are with the corresponding items in the prior year .
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to NEEEarnings (Loss) Per Share Attributable to
NEE,
Assuming Dilution
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
(millions)
FPL Segment $ 2,935  $ 2,650 $ 2,334 $ 1.49 $ 1.35 $ 1.20 
Gulf Power 271 238 180 0.14 0.12 0.09 
NEER 599 531 1,807 0.30 0.27 0.93 
Corporate and Other (232) (500) (552) (0.12) (0.26) (0.28)
NEE $ 3,573  $ 2,919 $ 3,769 $ 1.81 $ 1.48 $ 1.94 
______________________
(a)    NEER’s results reflect an allocation of interest expense from NEECH based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy
Resources' subsidiaries.
For the five years ended  December 31, 2021, NEE delivered a total shareholder return of approximately 251.8%, above the S&P 500’s 133.4%
return, the S&P 500 Utilities' 74.4% return and the Dow Jones U.S. Electricity's 74.1% return. The historical stock performance of NEE's common
stock shown in the performance graph below is not necessarily indicative of future stock price performance.
(a)
35
Table of Contents
Adjusted Earnings
NEE prepares its financi al statements under GAAP . However , management uses earnings adjus ted for certain items (adjusted earnings), a non-
GAAP  financ ial measure , internally for financial planning, analysis of performance, reporting of results to the Board of Directors and as an input in
determining performance-based compensation under NEE’ s employee incentive compensation plans. NEE also uses adjusted earnings when
communicating its financial results and earnings outlook to analysts and investors. NEE’s managem ent believes that adjusted earnings provide a
more meaningful representation of NEE's fundam ental earnings power . Although these amounts are properly reflected in the determination of net
income under GAAP , management believes that the amount and/or nature of such items make period to period comparisons of operations difficult
and potentially confusing. Adjusted earnings do not represent a substitute for net income, as prepared under GAAP .
The following table provides details of the after-tax adjustments to net income considered in computing NEE's adjusted earnings discussed
above.
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(millions)
Net losses associated with non-qualifying hedge activity $ (1,576)$ (649)$ (406)
Differential membership interests-related – NEER $ (98)$ (87)$ (89)
NEP investment gains, net – NEER $ 27 $ (94)$ 96 
Gain on disposal of a business – NEER $ — $ 274 $ — 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds and OTTI, net – NEER $ 199 $ 131 $ 176 
Acquisition-related $ — $ — $ (70)
Impairment charge related to investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline – NEER $ — $ (1,208)$ — 
______________________
(a)For 2021, 2020 and 2019, approximately $1,735 million, $438 million and $65 million of losses, respectively, are included in NEER's net income; the balance is included in Corporate
and Other. The change in non-qualifying hedge activity is primarily attributable to changes in forward power and natural gas prices, interest rates and foreign currency exchange
rates, as well as the reversal of previously recognized unrealized mark-to-market gains or losses as the underlying transactions were realized.
(b)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests for a discussion of the sale of two solar generation facilities in Spain (Spain projects).
(c)For 2019, approximately $44 million, $20 million and $6 million of costs are included in Corporate and Other's, Gulf Power's and NEER's net income, respectively.
(d)See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of the impairment charge in 2020 related to the investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline, LLC (Mountain Valley
Pipeline).
NEE segreg ates into two categories unrealized mark-to-market gains and losses and timing impacts related to derivative transactions. The first
category , referred to as non-qualifying hedges, represents certain energy derivative, interest rate derivative and foreign currency transactions
entered into as economic hedges, which do not meet the requirements for hedge accounting, or for which hedge accounting treatment is not
elected or has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value of those transactions are marked to market and reported in the consolidated
statements of income, resulting in earnings volatility because the economic offset to certain of the positions are generally not marked to market.
As a consequence, NEE's net income reflects only the movement in one part of economically-linked transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in
the non-qua lifying hedge category for certain energy derivatives is offset by decreases (increa ses) in the fair value of related physical asset
positions in the portfolio or contracts, which are not marked to market under GAAP . For this reason, NEE's management views results expressed
excluding the impact of the non-qualifying hedges as a meaningful measure of current period performance. The second category , referred to as
trading activities, which is included in adjusted earnings, represents the net unrealized effect of actively traded positions entered into to take
advantage of expected market price movements and all other commodity hedging activities. At FPL, substantially all changes in the fair value of
energy derivative transactions are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or
losses are passed through the fuel clause. See Note 3.
2021 Summary
Net income attributable to NEE for 2021 was higher than 2020 by $654 million, or $0.33 per share, assuming dilution, due to higher results at the
FPL segment, Corporate and Other , NEER and Gulf Power .
FPL's net income increased by $316 million in 2021 primarily reflecting higher results at the FPL segment and at Gulf Power . The FPL segment's
increase in net income for 2021 was primarily driven by continued investments in plant in service  and other property . Gulf Power's increase in net
income in 2021 was primarily driven by reductions in O&M expenses.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
36
Table of Contents
NEER's results increase d in 2021 primarily driven by the absence of an impairment charge related to its investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline
occurring in 2020 and higher earnings on new investments, partly offset by unfavorable non-qualifying hedge activity compared to 2020 and the
absence of the 2020 gain on the sale of the Spain projects. In 2021, NEER added approximately 2,008 MW of new wind generating capacity and
728 MW of solar generating capacity , repowered 435 MW of wind generating capacity and increased its backlog of contracted renewable
development projects.
Corporate and Other's results in 2021 increased primarily due to favorable non-qualifying hedge activity .
NEE and its subsidiaries  require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are primarily provided by cash flows from operations,
borrowings or issuances of short- and long-term debt, proceeds from differential membership investors, sales of assets to NEP or third parties
and, from time to time, issuances of equity securities. See Liquidity and Capital Resources – Liquidity .
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Net income attributable to NEE for 2021 was $3.57 billion compared to $2.92 billion in 2020. In 2021, net income attributable to NEE increased
primarily due to higher results at the FPL segment, Corporate and Other , NEER and Gulf Power . The comparison of the results of operations for
the years ended December 31, 2020  and 2019 are included in Management's Discussion in NEE's and FPL's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2020 .
In February 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of its ownership  interest in two solar generation facilities located
in Spain with a total generating capacity of 99.8 MW. In December 2020, a subsidiary of NextE ra Energy Resources sold a 90% noncontrolling
ownership interest in a portfolio of three wind generation facilities and four solar generation facilities representing a total net generating capacity
of 900 MW. Additionally in December 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold its 100% ownership interest in a 100 MW solar
generation facility and a 30 MW battery storag e facility under construction, which achieved commercial operations in June 2021, to a NEP
subsidiary . In October 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale to a NEP subsidiary of their 100% ownership interests
in three wind generation facilities and one solar generation facility with a total generating capacity of 467 MW and 33.3% of the noncontrolling
ownership interests in four solar generation facilities and multiple distributed generation solar facilities representing a total net generating capacity
of 122 MW. In December 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold their 100% ownership interest in a portfolio of seven wind
generation facilities and six solar generation facilities representing a total generating capacity  of 2,520 MW and 115 MW of battery storage
capacity , three of which are currently under construction with expected in-service dates in the first half of 2022. See Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
In March 2021, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired GridLiance Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP, LLC (GridLiance), which owns and
operates three FERC-regulated transmission utilities across six states, five in the Midwest and Nevada. See Note 6 – GridLiance.
NEE's effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2021  and 2020  were approximately 11% and 2%, respectively . The rates for
both years reflect the impact of PTCs and ITCs and, in 2020, also reflect the impact of lower pretax income and the gain on sale of the Spain
solar projects which was not taxable for federal nor state income tax purposes. See Note 5.
On January  1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity. However , during 2021, FPL continued to be
regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power . The FPL segment and Gulf Power continued to
be separate operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL, through 2021. See Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company . Effective January
1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one ratemaki ng entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one operating segment of NEE. See
Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December
2025.
37
Table of Contents
FPL: Results of Operations
The table below presents net income for FPL by reportable segment, the FPL segment and Gulf Power . Prior year FPL amounts have been
retrospectively adjusted to reflect the merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company discussed above. In the following discussio ns, all comparisons are
with the corresponding items in the prior year .
Net Income
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(millions)
FPL Segment $ 2,935  $ 2,650 $ 2,334 
Gulf Power 271 238 180 
Corporate and Other — 2 5 
FPL $ 3,206  $ 2,890 $ 2,519 
FPL Segment: Results of Operations
The FPL segment obtain s its operating revenues primarily from the sale of electricity to retail customers at rates established by the FPSC through
base rates and cost recovery clause mechanisms. The FPL segment’ s net income for 2021 and 2020 was $2,935 million and $2,650 million,
respectively , representin g an increase of $285 million. The increase was primarily driven by higher earnings from investments in plant in service
and other property . Such investments grew the FPL segment's average retail rate base by approximately $3.3 billion in 2021 and reflect, among
other things, solar generation additions and ongoing transmission and distribution additions.
During 2021 and 2020, FPL’s service area was impacted by hurricanes and tropical storms, which resulted in the recording ofincremental storm
restoration costs. FPL determined that it would not seek recovery of certain of such costs throug h a storm surcharge from customers and instead
recorded such costs as storm restoration costs in NEE's and FPL’s consolidated statements of income. The FPL segment used available reserve
amortization to offset all such storm restoratio n costs that were expensed. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost
Recovery .
The use of reserve amortization was permitted by the 2016 rate agreement. See Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate
Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 for addit ional information on the 2016 rate agreement. In
order to earn a targeted regulatory ROE, subject to limitations associated with the 2016 rate agreement, reserve amortization was calculated
using a trailing thirteen-m onth average of retail rate base and capital structure in conjunction with the trailing twelve months regulatory retail base
net operatin g income, which primarily includes the retail base portion of base and other revenu es, net of O&M, depreciation and amortization,
interest and tax expenses. In general, the net impact of these income statement line items must be adjusted, in part, by reserve amortization to
earn the targeted regulatory ROE. In certain periods, reserve amortization is reversed so as not to exceed the targeted regulatory ROE. The
drivers of the FPL segment's net income not reflected in the reserve amortization calculation typically include wholesale and transmission service
revenues and expenses, cost recovery clause revenues and expenses, AFUDC – equity and revenue and costs not recoverable from retail
customers. In 2021 and 2020, the FPL segment recorded reserve amortization of approximately $429 million and the reversal of reserve
amortization of $1 million, respectively . The FPL  segment's regulatory ROE for both 2021 and 2020 was approximately 11.60%.
In December 2021, the FPSC issued a final order approving the 2021 rate agreement which became effective in January 2022 and will remain in
effect until at least Dece mber 2025, establishes FPL's allowed regulatory ROE at 10.60%, with a range of 9.70% to 11.70%, and allows for retail
rate base increases in 2022 and 2023. In December 2021, Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group in January 2022, Florida
Rising, Inc., Environmen tal Confederation of Southwest Florida, Inc., and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida filed notices of
appeal challenging the FPSC's final order approving the 2021 rate agreement, which notices of appeal are pending before the Florida Supreme
Court. See Item 1. Busin ess – FPL – FPL Regula tion – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through
December 2025 for additional information on the 2021 rate agreement.
During 2021, operating revenues increased $938 million primarily related to higher fuel cost recovery revenues as discussed in cost recovery
clauses below . 
38
Table of Contents
Retail Base
The FPL segment’ s retail base revenues for 2021 and 2020 reflect the 2016 rate agreement. In December 2016, the FPSC issued a final order
approving the 2016 rate agreement which became effective in January 2017 and remained in effect until December 2021. The 2016 rate
agreement established the FPL segment's allow ed regulatory ROE at 10.55%, with a range of 9.60% to 11.60%, and allowed for retail rate base
increases in 2017, 2018, and upon commencement of commercial operations at the Okeechobee Clean Energy Center and certain solar projects.
See Item 1. Business – FPL – FPL Regulation  – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Base Rates – Base Rates Effective January 2017 through
December 2021 for additional information on the 2016 rate agreement.
Retail base revenues decreased $9 million during the year ended December 31, 2021 and were impacted by a decrease of 2.6% in the average
usage per retail custome r, primarily related to unfavorable weather when compared to the prior year, partly offset by an increase of 1.5% in the
average number of customer accounts. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
Cost Recovery Clauses
Revenues from fuel and other cost recovery clauses and pass-through costs, such as franchise fees, revenue taxes and storm-related
surcharges, are largely a pass-through of costs. Such revenues also include a return on inves tment allowed to be recovered through the cost
recovery clauses on certain assets, primarily related to certain solar , environmental projects, storm protection plan investments and the
unamortized balance of the regulatory asset associated with the FPL segment's acquisition of certain generation facilities. See Item 1. Business –
FPL – FPL Regulation – FPL Electric Rate Regulation – Cost Recovery Clauses. Underrecovery or overrecovery of cost recovery clause and
other pass-th rough costs (deferred clause and franchise expenses and revenues) can significan tly affect NEE's and FPL's operating cash flows.
The 2021 net underreco very impacting the FPL segment's operating cash flows was approximat ely $516 million, primarily related to the fuel cost
recovery clause.
Fuel cost recovery revenues increased approximately $775 million in 2021 primarily as a result of higher fuel and energy prices. In 2021 and
2020, cost recovery clauses contributed approxi mately $124 million and $111 million, respectively , to the FPL segment’ s net income. FPL's fuel
cost recover y clause revenues and expenses are expected to increase in 2022 as a result of the collection of underrecovered 2021 fuel costs and
higher projected natural gas prices in 2022.
Other Items Impacting the FPL Segment's Consolidated Statements of Income
Fuel, Purchase Power and Interchange Expense
Fuel, purchased power and interchange expense increased $807 million in 2021 primarily related to higher fuel and energy prices.
Depreciation and Amortization Expense
The major components of the FPL  segment’ s depreciation and amortization expense are as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020
(millions)
Reserve reversal (amortization) recorded under the 2016 rate agreement $ (429)$ 1 
Other depreciation and amortization recovered under base rates (excluding reserve amortization) and other 2,168 2,017 
Depreciation and amortization primarily recovered under cost recovery clauses and securitized storm-recovery cost
amortization 229 228 
Total $ 1,968 $ 2,246 
Depreciation expense decreased $278 million during 2021 primarily reflecting the recording of reserve amortization in 2021 compared to the
reversal of reserve amor tization in 2020, partly offset by increased depreciation related to higher plant in service balances. Reserve amortization,
or reversal of such amortization, reflects adjustments to accrued asset removal costs provided under the 2016 rate agreement in order to achieve
the targeted  regulatory ROE. Reserve amortiza tion is recorded as either an increase or decrease to accrued asset removal costs which is
reflected in noncurrent regulatory assets at Dece mber 31, 2021 and in noncurrent regulatory liabilities at December 31, 2020 on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets. See Note 1 –Rate  Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025 – and Electric Plant,
Depreciation and Amortization – for discussion of reserve amortization, including certain limita tions on reserve amortization in 2022, and new
unified depreciation rates under the 2021 rate agreement.
Gulf Power: Results of Operations
Gulf Power's  net income increased $33 million in 2021. During 2021, operating revenues increased $105 million primarily related to higher fuel
cost recover y revenues. Operating expenses – net increased $89 million in 2021 primarily related to increases in fuel, purchased power and
interchange expense, partly of fset by lower O&M expenses.
39
Table of Contents
NEER: Results of Operations
NEER owns , develops, constructs, manages and operates electric generation facilities in wholesale energy markets in the U.S. and Canada.
NEER also provides full energy and capacity requirements services, engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities, owns, develops,
constructs and operates  rate-regulated transmission facilities and transmission lines and invests in natural gas, natural gas liquids and oil
production and pipeline infrastructure assets. NEER’ s net income less net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests for 2021  and 2020 was
$599 million  and $531 million, respectively , resulting in an increase  in 2021 of $68 million. The primary drivers, on an after-tax basis, of the
change are in the following table.
Increase (Decrease)
From Prior Period
Year Ended December 31, 2021
(millions)
New investments $ 235 
Existing generation and storage assets (70)
Gas infrastructure 49 
Customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading (37)
NEET 13 
Other , including income taxes and other investment income 52 
Change in non-qualifying hedge activity (1,297)
Change in unrealized gains/losses on equity securities held in nuclear decommissioning funds and OTTI, net 68 
NEP investment gains, net 121 
Disposal of a business (274)
Impairment charge related to investment in Mountain V alley Pipeline 1,208  
Increase in net income less net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests $ 68 
______________________
(a)    Reflects after-tax project contributions, including the net effect of deferred income taxes and other benefits associated with PTCs and ITCs for wind, solar and storage projects, as
applicable (see Note 1 – Income Taxes and – Sales of Differential Membership Interests and Note 5), but excludes allocation of interest expense or corporate general and
administrative expenses. Results from projects and pipelines are included in new investments during the first twelve months of operation or ownership. Project results, including
repowered wind projects, are included in existing generation and storage assets and pipeline results are included in gas infrastructure beginning with the thirteenth month of
operation or ownership.
(b)    Excludes allocation of interest expense and corporate general and administrative expenses.
(c)    See Overview – Adjusted Earnings for additional information.
New Investments
In 2021, results from new investments increased primarily due to higher earnings, including the net effect of deferred income taxes and other
benefits associated with PTCs and ITCs, related to the addition of wind and solar generating projects and battery storage during or after 2020.
The discussion below describes changes in certain line items set forth in NEE's consolidated statements of income as they relate to NEER.
Operating Revenues
Operating revenues for 2021 decreased $1,993 million primarily due to:
•the impact of non-qualifying commodity hedges  due primarily to changes in energy prices (approximately $2,510 million of losses during
2021 compared to $244 million of losses for 2020), and
•lower revenues from existing generation and storage assets of $331 million primarily due to the impacts of severe prolonged winter weather
in Texas in February 2021 (February 2021 weather event), the absence of revenues of certain wind and solar facilities sold to NEP in
October 2021 and lower nuclear revenues, due primarily to the closure of Duane Arnold in August 2020,
partly of fset by ,
•revenues from new investments of $263 million,
•net increases in revenues of $247 million from the customer supply , proprietary power and gas trading, and gas infrastructure businesses,
and
•higher revenues of $56 million from NEET  primarily related to the acquisition of GridLiance in 2021.
Operating Expenses – net
Operating expenses – net for 2021 increased $309 million primarily due to an increase in depreciation expense of $116 million primarily related to
new investments, higher fuel costs of $98 million and an increase of $73 million in O&M expenses primarily related to bad debt expense
associated with the February 2021 weather event (see Note 1 – Credit Losses).
Gains on Disposal of Businesses/Assets – net
In 2021, gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net primarily relate to sales of ownership interests in wind and solar projects to NEP and a third
party; in 2020, the amount was primarily related to the sale of the Spain projects in the first quarter of 2020. See Note 1 – Disposal of
Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.(a)
(a)
(a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
(c)
40
Table of Contents
Interest Expense
NEER's interest expense for 2021 decreased approximately $292 million primarily reflecting $251 million of favorable impacts related to changes
in the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments.
Equity in Earnings (Losses) of Equity Method Investees
NEER recog nized $666 million of equity in earnings of equity method investees in 2021 compar ed to $1,351 million of equity in losses of equity
method investees for the prior year. The change for 2021 primarily reflects the absence of an impairment charge related to the investment in
Mountain Valley Pipeline  of approximately $1.5 billion recorded in 2020 and higher equity in earnings of NEP recorded in 2021 primarily due to
changes in the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments. Due to continued legal and regulatory challenges related to Mountain Valley
Pipeline, NextEra Energy Resources also recorded an impairment charge in the first quarter of 2022 of approximately $0.8 billion ($0.6 billion
after tax). See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Tax Credits, Benefits and Expenses
PTCs from wind projects and ITCs from solar and certain wind projects are reflected in NEER’ s earnings. PTCs are recognized as wind energy is
generated and sold base d on a per kWh rate prescribed in applicable federal and state statutes. Reflected in income taxes in NEE's consolidated
statements of income are PTCs totaling approximately $90 million and $150 million and ITCs totaling approximately $237 million and $133 million
in 2021 and 2020, respectively . A portion of the PTCs and ITCs have been allocated to investors in connection with sales of differential
membership interests. See Note 1 – Income Taxes for a discussion of PTCs and ITCs and Note 5.
Corporate and Other: Results of Operations
Corporate and Other at NEE is primarily compris ed of the operating results of other business activities, as well as corporate interest income and
expenses. Corporate and Other allocates a portion of NEECH's corporate interest expense to NextEra Energy Resou rces. Interest expense is
allocated based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources'
subsidiaries.
Corporate and Other's results increased $268 million during 2021  prima rily due to favorable after-tax impacts of approximately $370 million, as
compared to the prior year, related to non-qualif ying hedge activity as a result of changes in the fair value of interest rate derivative instruments.
The favorable non-qualifying hedge activity was partly of fset by higher interest and refinancing costs incurred in 2021.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
NEE and its subsidiarie s require funds to support and grow their businesses. These funds are used for, among other things, working capital,
capital expenditures (see Note 15 – Commitments), investments in or acquisitions of assets and businesses (see Note 6), payment  of maturing
debt and related derivati ve obligations (see Note 13 and Note 3) and, from time to time, redemp tion or repurchase of outstanding debt or equity
securities. It is anticipate d that these requirements will be satisfied through a combination of cash flows from operations, short- and long-term
borrowings, the issuance of short- and long-term debt and, from time to time, equity securities, proceeds from differential membership investors
and sales of assets to NEP or third parties (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses /Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interest) ,
consistent with NEE’ s and FPL’s objective of maintaining, on a long-term basis, a capital structure that will support a strong investment grade
credit rating. NEE, FPL and NEECH rely on access to credit and capital markets as significant sources of liquidity for capital requirements and
other operations that are not satisfied by operating cash flows. The inability of NEE, FPL and NEECH to maintain their current credit ratings could
affect their ability to raise short- and long-term capital, their cost of capital and the execution of their respective financing strategies, and could
require the posting of additional collateral under certain agreements.
In October 2015, NEE authorized a program to purchase, from time to time, up to $150 million of common units representing limited partner
interests in NEP. Under  the program, purchas es may be made in amounts, at prices and at such times as NEE or its subsidiaries deem
appropriate, all subject to market conditions and other considerations. The purchases may be made in the open market or in privately negotiated
transactions. Any purchases will be made in such quantities, at such prices, in such manner and on such terms and conditions as determined by
NEE or its subsidiaries in their discretion, based on factors such as market and business conditions, applicable legal requirements and other
factors. The common unit purchase program does not require NEE to acquire any specific number of common units and may be modified or
terminated by NEE at any time. The purpose of the program is not to cause NEP’ s common  units to be delisted from the New York Stock
Exchange or to cause the common units to be deregistered with the SEC. As of December 31, 2021, the dollar value of units that may yet be
purchased by NEE under this program was $114 million. At December 31, 2021, NEE owned a noncontrolling general partner interest in NEP and
beneficially owned approximately 55.0% of NEP’ s voting power .
41
Table of Contents
Cash Flows
NEE's sources and uses of cash for 2021, 2020 and 2019 were as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(millions)
Sources of cash:
Cash flows from operating activities $ 7,553 $ 7,983 $ 8,155 
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 16,683 12,404 13,905 
Proceeds from differential membership investors 2,779 3,522 1,604 
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 2,761 1,012 1,316 
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net 14 — 1,494 
Payments from related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net 47 — — 
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests 65 501 99 
Other sources – net 40 83 121 
Total sources of cash 29,942 25,505 26,694 
Uses of cash:
Capital expenditures, acquisitions, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases (16,077) (14,610) (17,462)
Retirements of long-term debt (9,594) (6,103) (5,492)
Net decrease in commercial paper and other short-term debt (426) (907) (4,799)
Payments to related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net — (2) (54)
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net — (92) — 
Dividends (3,024) (2,743) (2,408)
Other uses – net (1,052) (590) (628)
Total uses of cash (30,173) (25,047) (30,843)
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 1 (20) 4 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ (230)$ 438 $ (4,145)
______________________
(a)    2019 amount primarily relates to the acquisition of Gulf Power Company. See Note 6 – Gulf Power Company.
For significant financing activity that occurred in January 2022, see Note 13.
NEE's primary capital requirements are for expanding and enhancing FPL's electric system and generation facilities to continue to provide
reliable service to meet customer electricity demands and for funding NEER's investments in independent power and other projects. See Note 15
– Commitments for estimated capital expenditures in 2022 through 2026.(a)
42
Table of Contents
The following table provides a summary of capital investments for 2021 , 2020  and 2019 .
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
(millions)
FPL Segment:
Generation:
New $ 830 $ 1,464 $ 1,242 
Existing 1,380 1,063 1,215 
Transmission and distribution 4,065 3,150 2,893 
Nuclear fuel 159 203 195 
General and other 835 651 550 
Other, primarily change in accrued property additions and exclusion of AFUDC – equity (484) 149 (340)
Total 6,785 6,680 5,755 
Gulf Power 782 1,012 729 
NEER:
Wind 3,777 3,359 1,974 
Solar (includes solar plus battery storage projects) 2,011 1,920 1,741 
Battery storage 304 168 29 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 241 125 179 
Natural gas pipelines 229 269 687 
Other gas infrastructure 669 572 969 
Rate-regulated transmission (2021 and 2019 includes acquisitions, see Note 6) 980 360 829 
Other 152 120 97 
Total 8,363 6,893 6,505 
Corporate and Other (2019 primarily relates to acquisitions, see Note 6) 147 25 4,473 
Total capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear fuel purchases $ 16,077 $ 14,610 $ 17,462 
.
Liquidity
At Decembe r 31, 2021, NEE's total net available liquidity was approximately $10.6 billion. The table below provides the components of FPL's and
NEECH's net available liquidity at December 31, 2021.
Maturity Date
FPL NEECH Total FPL NEECH
(millions)
Syndicated revolving credit facilities $ 3,798 $ 5,257 $ 9,055 2022 – 2026 2022 – 2026
Issued letters of credit (3) (1,374) (1,377)
3,795 3,883 7,678 
Bilateral revolving credit facilities 780 2,675 3,455 2022 – 2024 2022 – 2023
Borrowings — — — 
780 2,675 3,455 
Letter of credit facilities — 2,300 2,300 2022 – 2024
Issued letters of credit — (1,307) (1,307)
— 993 993 
Subtotal 4,575 7,551 12,126 
Cash and cash equivalents 55 582 637 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings
outstanding (1,582) (500) (2,082)
Amounts due to related parties under the CSCS agreement (see Note 8) — (57) (57)
Net available liquidity $ 3,048 $ 7,576 $ 10,624 
______________________
(a)    Provide for the funding of loans up to the amount of the credit facility and the issuance of letters of credit up to $3,275 million ($650 million for FPL and $2,625 million for NEECH).
The entire amount of the credit facilities is available for general corporate purposes and to provide additional liquidity in the event of a loss to the companies’ or their subsidiaries’
operating facilities (including, in the case of FPL, a transmission and distribution property loss). FPL’s syndicated revolving credit facilities are also available to support the purchase
of $1,375 million of pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds in the event they are tendered by individual bondholders and not remarketed
prior to maturity as well as the repayment of approximately $882 million of floating rate notes in the event an individual noteholder requires repayment at specified dates prior to
maturity. Approximately $3,120 million of FPL's and $3,889 million of NEECH's syndicated revolving credit facilities expire in 2026.
(b)    Approximately $150 million of NEECH's bilateral revolving credit facilities is available for costs incurred in connection with the development, construction and operations of wind and
solar power generation facilities.
(c)    Only available for the issuance of letters of credit.(a)
(b)
(c)
43
Table of Contents
At December 31, 2021, 72 banks, located globally , participated in FPL’s and NEECH’ s revolving credit facilities, with no one bank providing more
than 6% of the combined revolving credit facilities. Pursuant to a 1998 guarantee agreement, NEE guarantees the payment of NEECH’ s debt
obligations under its revolving credit facilities. In order for FPL or NEECH to borrow or to have letters of credit issued under the terms of their
respective revolving credit facilities and, also for NEECH, its letter of credit facilities, FPL, in the case of FPL, and NEE, in the case of NEECH,
are required, among other things, to maintain a ratio of funded debt to total capitalization that does not exceed a stated ratio. The FPL and
NEECH revolving credit facilities also contain default and related acceleration provisions relating  to, among other things, failure of FPL and NEE,
as the case may be, to maintain the respective ratio of funded debt to total capitalization at or below the specified ratio. At December 31, 2021,
each of NEE and FPL  was in compliance with its required ratio.
Capital Support
Guarantees, Letters of Credit, Surety Bonds and Indemnifications (Guarantee Arrangements)
Certain subsidiaries of NEE issue guarantees  and obtain letters of credit and surety bonds, as well as provide indemnities, to facilitate
commercial transactions with third parties and financings. Substantially all of the guarantee arrangements are on behalf of NEE’ s consolidated
subsidiaries, as discussed in more detail below . NEE is not required to recognize liabilities associated with guarantee arrangements issued on
behalf of its consolidated  subsidiaries unless it becomes probable that they will be required to perform. At December 31, 2021, NEE believes that
there is no material exposure related to these guarantee arrangements.
NEE subsidiaries issue guarantees related to equity contribution agreements associated with the development, construction and financing of
certain power generation facilities, engineering, procurement and construction agreements and equity contributions associated with a natural gas
pipeline project under construction and a related natural gas transportation agreement. Commitments associated with these activities are
included and/or disclosed in the contracts table in Note 15.
In addition, at Decembe r 31, 2021, NEE subsidiaries had approximately $5.2 billion in guarante es related to obligations under purchased power
agreements, nuclear-rel ated activities, payment obligations related to PTCs, as well as other  types of contractual obligations (see Note 4 –
Contingent Consideration and Note 15 – Commitments).
In some instances, subs idiaries of NEE elect to issue guarantees instead of posting other forms of collateral required under certain financing
arrangements, as well as for other project-level cash management activities. At December 31, 2021, these guarantees totaled approximately
$576 million  and support, among other things, cash management activities, including those related to debt service and operations and
maintenance service agreements, as well as other specific project financing requirements.
Subsidiaries of NEE also issue guarantees to support customer supply and proprietary power and gas trading activities, including the buying and
selling of wholesale and retail energy commodit ies. At December 31, 2021, the estimated mark-to-market exposure (the total amount that these
subsidiaries of NEE could be required to fund based on energy commodity market prices at December 31, 2021) plus contract settlement net
payables, net of collateral posted for obligations under these guarantees totaled approximately $1.3 billion.
At December 31, 2021, subsidiaries of NEE also had approximately $3.7 billion of standby letters of credit and approximately $902 million of
surety bond s to support certain of the commerc ial activities discussed above. FPL's and NEECH's credit facilities are available to support the
amount of the standby letters of credit.
In addition, as part of contract negotiations in the normal course of business, certain subsidiaries of NEE have agreed and in the future may
agree to make payments to compensate or indemnify other parties, including those associated with asset divestitures, for possible unfavorable
financial consequences resulting from specified  events. The specified events may include, but are not limited to, an adverse judgment in a
lawsuit, or the imposition  of additional taxes due to a change in tax law or interpretations of the tax law. NEE is unable to estimate the maximum
potential amount of future payments under some of these contracts because events that would  obligate them to make payments have not yet
occurred or , if any such event has occurred, they have not been notified of its occurrence.
NEECH, a 100% owned  subsidiary of NEE, provides funding for, and holds ownership interests in, NEE's operating subsidiaries other than FPL.
NEE has fully and unconditionally guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH, including most of its debt and all of its debentures
registered pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933 and commercial paper issuances, as well as most of its payment guarantees and
indemnifications, and NEECH has guaranteed certain debt and other obligations of subsidiaries within the NEER segment. Certain guarantee
arrangements described above contain requirements for NEECH and FPL to maintain a specified credit rating. For a discussion of credit rating
downgrade triggers, see Credit Ratings below .
NEE fully and unconditionally guarantees NEEC H debentures pursuant to a guarantee agreement, dated as of June 1, 1999 (1999 guarantee)
and NEECH  junior subordinated debentures pursuant to an indenture, dated as of September 1, 2006 (2006 guarantee). The 1999 guarantee is
an unsecured obligation of NEE and ranks equally and ratably with all other unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness of NEE. The 2006
guarantee is unsecured and subordinate and junior in right of payment to NEE senior indebtedness (as defined therein). No payment on those
junior subordinated debentures may be made under the 2006
44
Table of Contents
guarantee until all NEE senior indebtedness has been paid in full in certain circumstances. NEE’s and NEECH’ s ability to meet their financial
obligations are primarily dependent on their subsidiaries’  net income, cash flows and their ability  to pay upstream dividends or to repay funds to
NEE and NEECH. The dividend-paying ability of some of the subsidiaries is limited by contractual restrictions which are contained in outstanding
financing agreements.
Summarized financial information of NEE and NEECH is as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2021
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
Consolidated NEE Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ (1)$ 3,139 $ 17,069 
Operating income (loss) $ (352)$ (1,317)$ 2,913 
Net income (loss) $ (275)$ (395)$ 2,827 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE/NEECH $ (275)$ 351 $ 3,573 
December 31, 2021
Issuer/Guarantor
CombinedNEECH
Consolidated NEE Consolidated
(millions)
Total current assets $ 48 $ 5,662 $ 9,288 
Total noncurrent assets $ 2,308 $ 57,620 $ 131,624 
Total current liabilities $ 1,553 $ 11,560 $ 17,437 
Total noncurrent liabilities $ 27,956 $ 40,289 $ 77,806 
Redeemable noncontrolling interests $ — $ 245 $ 245 
Noncontrolling interests $ — $ 8,222 $ 8,222 
————————————
(a)Excludes intercompany transactions, and investments in, and equity in earnings of, subsidiaries.
(b)Information has been prepared on the same basis of accounting as NEE's consolidated financial statements.
Shelf Registration
In March 2021, NEE, NEECH and FPL filed a shelf registration statement with the SEC for an unspecified amount of securities, which became
effective upon filing. The amount of securities issuable by the companies is established from time to time by their respective boards of directors.
Securities that may be issued under the registr ation statement include, depending on the registrant, senior debt securities, subordinated debt
securities, junior subordinated debentures, first mortgage bonds, common stock, preferred stock, depositary shares, stock purchase contracts,
stock purchase units, warrants and guarantees related to certain of those securities.(a) (b) (b)
(a) (b) (b)
45
Table of Contents
Credit Ratings
NEE’ s liquid ity, ability to access credit and capital markets, cost of borrowings and collateral posting requirements under certain agreements is
dependent on its and its subsidiaries credit ratings. At February 17, 2022, Moody’ s Investors Service, Inc. (Moody’ s), S&P Global Ratings (S&P)
and Fitch Ratings, Inc. (Fitch) had assigned the following credit ratings to NEE, FPL  and NEECH:
Moody's S&P Fitch
NEE:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
FPL:
Corporate credit rating A1 A A
First mortgage bonds Aa2 A+ AA-
Senior unsecured notes A1 A A+
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds VMIG-1/P-1 A-1 F1
Commercial paper P-1 A-1 F1
NEECH:
Corporate credit rating Baa1 A- A-
Debentures Baa1 BBB+ A-
Junior subordinated debentures Baa2 BBB BBB
Commercial paper P-2 A-2 F2
_________________________
(a)    A security rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities and should be evaluated independently of any other rating. The rating is subject to revision or withdrawal at
any time by the assigning rating organization.
(b)    The outlook indicated by each of Moody's, S&P and Fitch is stable.
(c)    Short-term ratings are presented as all bonds outstanding are currently paying a short-term interest rate. At FPL's election, a portion or all of the bonds may be adjusted to a long-
term interest rate.
NEE and its subsidiarie s have no credit rating downgrade triggers that would accelerate the maturity dates of outstanding debt. A change in
ratings is not an event of default under applicable debt instruments, and while there are conditions to drawing on the credit facilities noted above,
the maintenance of a specific minimum credit rating is not a condition to drawing on these credit facilities.
Commitment fees and interest rates on loans under these credit facilities’  agreements are tied to credit ratings. A ratings downgrade also could
reduce the accessibility  and increase the cost of commercial paper and other short-term debt issuances and borrowings and additional or
replacement credit facilities. In addition, a rating s downgrade could result in, among other things, the requirement that NEE subsidiaries post
collateral under certain agreements and guarantee arrangements, including, but not limited to, those related to fuel procurement, power sales and
purchases, nuclear decommissioning funding, debt-related reserves and trading activities. FPL’s and NEECH’ s credit facilities are available to
support these potential requirements.
Covenants
NEE's charter does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. As a practical matter , the ability of NEE to pay dividends on its
common stock is dependent upon, among other things, dividends paid to it by its subsidiaries.  For example, FPL pays dividends to NEE in a
manner consistent with FPL's long-term targeted capital structure. However , the mortgage securing FPL's first mortgage bonds contains
provisions which, under certain conditions, restrict the payment of dividends to NEE and the issuance of additional first mortgage bonds.
Additionally , in some circumstances, the mortgage restricts the amount of retained earnings that FPL can use to pay cash dividends on its
common stock. The restricted amount may change based on factors set out in the mortgage. Other than this restriction on the payment of
common stock dividends, the mortgage does not restrict FPL's use of retained earnings. At December 31, 2021, no retained earnings were
restricted by these provisions of the mortgage and, in light of FPL's current financial conditio n and level of earnings, management does not
expect that planned financing activities or dividends would be af fected by these limitations.
FPL may issue first mortgage bonds under its mortgage subject to its meeting an adjusted net earnings test set forth in the mortgage, which
generally requires adjusted net earnings to be at least twice the annual interest requirements  on, or at least 10% of the aggregate principal
amount of, FPL’s first mortgage bonds including those to be issued and any other non-junior FPL indebtedness. At December 31, 2021, coverage
for the 12 months ended December 31, 2021 would have been approximately 9.1 times the annual interest requirements and approximately 3.9
times the aggregate principal requirements. New first mortgage bonds are also limited to an amount equal to the sum of 60% of unfunded
property additions after adjustments to offset property retirements, the amount of retired first mortgage bonds or qualified lien bonds and the
amount of cash on depo sit with the mortgage trustee. At December 31, 2021, FPL could have issued in excess of $30.5 billion of additional first
mortgage bonds based on the unfunded property additions and retired first mortgage bonds. At December 31, 2021, no cash was deposited with
the mortgage trustee for these purposes.(a) (a) (a)
(b)
(b)
(c)
(b)
46
Table of Contents
In Septembe r 2006, NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended, September 2006 RCC) in connection with
NEECH's offering of $350 million principal amount of Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (Series B junior
subordinated debentures). The September 2006 RCC is for the benefit of persons that buy, hold or sell a specified series of long-term
indebtedness (covered debt) of NEECH (other than the Series B junior subordinated debentures) or, in certain cases, of NEE. NEECH's 3.50%
Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 have been designated as the covered debt under the September 2006 RCC. The September 2006 RCC
provides that NEECH may redeem, and NEE or NEECH may purchase, any Series B junior subordinated debentures on or before October 1,
2036, only to the exten t that the redemption or purchase price does not exceed a specified amount of proceeds from the sale of qualifying
securities, subject to certain limitations described in the September 2006 RCC. Qualifying securities are securities that have equity-like
characteristics that are the same as, or more equity-like than, the Series B junior subordinated debentures at the time of redemption or purchase,
which are sold within 365 days prior to the date of the redemption or repurchase of the Series B junior subordinated debentures.
In June 2007, NEE and NEECH executed a Replacement Capital Covenant (as amended, June 2007 RCC) in connection with NEECH's offering
of $400 million principal amount of its Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (Seri es C junior subordinated debentures). The June
2007 RCC is for the benefit of persons that buy, hold or sell a specified series of covered debt of NEECH (other than the Series C junior
subordinated debentures) or, in certain cases, of NEE. NEECH's 3.50% Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 have been designated as the
covered debt under the June 2007 RCC. The June 2007 RCC provides that NEECH may redeem or purchase, or satisfy , discharge or defease
(collectively , defease), and NEE and any majority-owned subsidiary of NEE or NEECH may purchase, any Series C junior subordinated
debentures on or before  June 15, 2037, only to the extent that the principal amount defeased  or the applicable redemption or purchase price
does not exceed a specified amount raised from the issuance, during the 365 days prior to the date of that redemption, purchase or defeasance,
of qualifying securities that have equity-like characteristics that are the same as, or more equity-like than, the applicable characteristics of the
Series C junior subordinated debentures at the time of redemption, purchase or defeasance, subject to certain limitations described in the June
2007 RCC.
New Accounting Rules and Interpretations
Reference Rate Reform  – In March  2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued an accounting standards  update which provides
certain optio ns to apply accounting guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies transition from the London Inter-
Bank Of fered Rate and other interbank of fered rates to alternative reference rates. See Note 1 – Reference Rate Reform.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
NEE’ s significant accounting policies are described in Note 1 to the consolidated financial statem ents, which were prepared under GAAP . Critical
accounting policies are those that NEE believes  are both most important to the portrayal of its financial condition and results of operations, and
require complex, subjective judgments, often as a result of the need to make estimates and assumptions about the effect of matters that are
inherently uncertain. Judgments and uncertainties affecting the application of those policies may result in materially different amounts being
reported under dif ferent conditions or using dif ferent assumptions.
NEE considers the follow ing policies to be the most critical in understanding the judgments that are involved in preparing its consolidated financial
statements:
Accounting for Derivatives and Hedging Activities
NEE uses derivative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in the
purchase and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exchang e rate risk associated primarily with outstanding
and expecte d future debt issuances and borrowings. In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses  derivatives to optimize the value of its power
generation and gas infrastructure assets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage of expected future
favorable price movements.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Accounting pronouncements require the use of fair value accounting if certain conditions are met, which may require significant judgment to
measure the fair value of assets and liabilities. This applies not only to traditional financial deriv ative instruments, but to any contract having the
accounting characteristic s of a derivative. As a result, significant judgment must be used in apply ing derivatives accounting guidance to contracts.
In the event changes in interpretation occur , it is possible that contracts that currently are excluded from derivatives accounting rules would have
to be recorded on the balance sheet at fair value, with changes in the fair value recorded in the statement of income.
47
Table of Contents
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on the balance shee t at fair value using a combination of market and
income approaches. Fair values for some of the longer-term contracts where liquid markets are not available are derived through the use of
industry-standard valuat ion techniques, such as internally developed models which estimate the fair value of a contract by calculating the present
value of the difference between the contract price and the forward prices. Forward prices represent the price at which a buyer or seller could
contract today to purchase or sell a commodity at a future date. The near-term forward market for electricity is generally liquid and therefore the
prices in the early years of the forward curves reflect observable market quotes. However , in the later years, the market is much less liquid and
forward price curves must be developed using factors including the forward prices for the commodities used as fuel to generate electricity , the
expected system heat rate (which measures the efficiency of power plants in converting fuel to electricity) in the region where the purchase or
sale takes place, and a fundamental forecast of expected spot prices based on modeled supply and demand in the region. NEE estimates the fair
value of interest rate and foreign currency deriva tives using an income approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing
the net amount of estimated future cash inflows and outflows related to the derivative agreements. The assumptions in these models are critical
since any changes therein could have a significant impact on the fair value of the derivative.
At FPL, substantially all changes in the fair value of energy derivative transactions are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until the contracts
are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the  fuel clause . See Note 3.
In NEE’s non-rate regula ted operations, predominantly NextEra Energy Resources, essentially all changes in the derivatives’  fair value for power
purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in operating revenues and the equity method investees’
related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value are recognized in interest expense and the
equity metho d investees' related activity is recognized in equity in earnings of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of
income. NEE estimates the fair value of these derivatives using an income approach based on a discounted cash flows valuation technique
utilizing observable inputs.
Certain derivative transactions at NEER are entered into as economic hedges but the transactions do not meet the requirements for hedge
accounting, hedge accounting treatment is not elected or hedge accounting has been discontinued. Changes in the fair value of those
transactions are marked to market and reported  in the consolidated statements of income, resulting in earnings volatility . These changes in fair
value are reflected in the non-qualifying hedge category in computing adjusted earnings and could be significant to NEER’ s results because the
economic offset to the positions are not marked to market. As a consequence, NEE's net income reflects only the movement in one part of
economically-linked transactions. For example, a gain (loss) in the non-qualifying hedge category for certain energy derivatives is offset by
decreases (increases) in the fair value of relate d physical asset positions in the portfolio or contracts, which are not marked to market under
GAAP . For this reason, NEE’ s management views results expressed excluding the unrealized mark-to-market impact of the non-qualifying
hedges as a meaningful measure of current period performance. For additional information regarding derivative instruments, see Note 3,
Overview and Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity .
Accounting for Pension Benefits
NEE sponsors a qualifie d noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for substantially all empl oyees of NEE and its subsidiaries. Management
believes that, based on actuarial assumptions and the well-funded status of the pension plan, NEE will not be required to make any cash
contributions to the qualified pension plan in the near future. The qualified pension plan has a fully funded trust dedicated to providing benefits
under the plan. NEE allocates net periodic income associated with the pension plan to its subsidiaries annually using specific criteria.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
For the pension plan, the benefit obligation is the actuarial present value, as of the December 31 measurement date, of all benefits attributed by
the pension benefit formula to employee service  rendered to that date. The amount of benefit to be paid depends on a number of future events
incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including an estimate of the average remaining life of employees/survivors as well as the average
years of service rendered. The projected benefit obligation is measured based on assumptio ns concerning future interest rates and future
employee compensation levels. NEE derives pension income from actuarial calculations based on the plan’ s provisions and various management
assumptions including discount rate, rate of increase in compensation levels and expected long-term rate of return on plan assets.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance requires recognition of the funded status of the pension plan in the balance sheet, with changes in the funded status
recognized in other comprehensive income within shareholders’  equity in the year in which the changes occur .
48
Table of Contents
Since NEE is the plan sponsor , and its subsidiaries do not have separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations to their employees, this
accounting guidance is reflected at NEE and not allocated to the subsidiaries. The portion of previously unrecognized actuarial gains and losses
and prior service costs or credits that are estimated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic (income) cost in future periods and that otherwise
would be recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income are classified as regulatory assets and liabilities at NEE in accordance with
regulatory treatment.
Net periodic pension income is calculated using a number of actuarial assumptions. Those assumptions for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 include:
 2021 2020 2019
Discount rate 2.53 % 3.22 % 4.26 %
Salary increase 4.40 % 4.40 % 4.40 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.83 % 3.88 %
In developing these assumptions, NEE evaluate d input, including other qualitative and quantitative factors, from its actuaries and consultants, as
well as information available in the marketplace . In addition, for the expected long-term rate of return on pension plan assets, NEE considered
different models, capital market return assumptio ns and historical returns for a portfolio with an equity/bond asset mix similar to its pension fund,
as well as its pension fund's historical compounded returns. NEE believes that 7.35% is a reaso nable long-term rate of return, net of investment
management fees, on its pension plan assets. NEE will continue to evaluate all of its actuarial assumptions, including its expected rate of return,
at least annually , and will adjust them as appropriate.
NEE utilizes  in its determination of pension income a market-related valuation of plan assets. This market-related valuation reduces year-to-year
volatility and recognizes investment gains or losses over a five-year period following the year in which they occur . Investment gains or losses for
this purpose are the difference between the expected return calculated using the market-rela ted value of plan assets and the actual return
realized on those plan assets. Since the market -related value of plan assets recognizes gains or losses over a five-year period, the future value
of plan assets will be affected as previously deferred gains or losses are recognized. Such gains and losses together with other differences
between actual results and the estimates used in the actuarial valuations are deferred and recognized in determining pension income only to the
extent they exceed 10% of the greater of projected benefit obligations or the market-related value of plan assets.
The followin g table illustrates the effect on net periodic pension income of changing the critical actuarial assumptions discussed above, while
holding all other assumptions constant:
Increase (Decrease) in 2021
Net Periodic Pension Income
Change in
Assumption NEE FPL
(millions)
Expected long-term rate of return (0.5)% $ (24)$ (16)
Discount rate 0.5% $ 13 $ 9 
Salary increase 0.5% $ (4)$ (3)
NEE also utilizes actuar ial assumptions about mortality to help estimate obligations of the pension plan. NEE has adopted the latest revised
mortality tables and mortality improvement scales released by the Society of Actuaries, which did not have a material impact on the pension
plan's obligation.
See Note 12.
Carrying Value of Long-Lived Assets
NEE evaluates long-lived assets for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be
recoverable.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The amount of future net cash flows, the timing of the cash flows and the determination of an appropriate interest rate all involve estimates and
judgments about future events. In particular , the aggregate amount of cash flows determines whether an impairment exists, and the timing of the
cash flows is critical in determining fair value. Because each assessment is based on the facts and circumstances associated with each long-
lived asset, the ef fects of changes in assumptions cannot be generalized.
49
Table of Contents
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the carrying value of the asset exceeds the undiscounted future net cash flows associated with
that asset. The impairme nt loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying value of the long-lived asset exceeds the asset’ s fair value.
In most instances, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated future cash flows using an appropriate interest rate.
Carrying Value of Equity Method Investments
NEE evalua tes its equity method investments for impairment when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the fair value of the
investment is less than the carrying value an d the investment may be other-than-temporarily impaired.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Indicators of a potential impairment include, but are not limited to, a series of operating losses of an investee, the absence of an ability to recover
the carrying amount of the investment, the inabi lity of the investee to sustain an earnings capacity and a current fair value of an investment that
may be less than its carrying value. If indicators of impairment exist, an estimate of the investment’ s fair value will be calculated. Approaches for
estimating fair value include, among others, an income approach using a probability-weighte d discounted cash flows model and a market
approach using an earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) multiple model. The probability assigned to each
scenario as well as the cash flows and EBITDA  multiple identified are critical in determining fair value.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary . Assessment of whether an investment is
other-than-temporarily impaired involves, among other factors, consideration of the length of time that the fair value is below the carrying value,
current expected performance relative to the expected performance when the investment was initially made, performance relative to peers,
industry performance relative to the economy , credit rating, regulatory actions and legal and permitting challenges. If management is unable to
reasonably assert that an impairment is tempora ry or believes that there will not be full recovery  of the carrying value of its investment, then the
impairment is considered to be other than temporary . Investments that are other-than-temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair
value and cannot subse quently be written back up for increases in estimated fair value. Impai rment losses are recorded in equity in earnings
(losses) of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements.
Decommissioning and Dismantlement
NEE accounts for asset retirement obligations and conditional asset retirement obligations (collectively , AROs) under accounting guidance that
requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in the period in which it is incurred if it can be reasonably estimated, with the
offsetting associated asset retirement costs capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the long-lived assets. NEE's AROs relate primarily to
decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantlement of certain of NEER's wind and solar
facilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
The calculat ion of the future cost of retiring long-lived assets, including nuclear decommissioning and plant dismantlement costs, involves
estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures and making judgments concerning whether or not such costs are considered a legal
obligation. Estimating the amount and timing of future expenditures includes, among other things, making projections of when assets will be
retired and ultimately decommissioned and how costs will escalate with inflation. In addition, NEE also makes interest rate and rate of return
projections on its inves tments in determining recommended funding requirements for nuclear decommissioning costs. Periodically , NEE is
required to update these  estimates and project ions which can affect the annual expense amounts recognized, the liabilities recorded and the
annual funding requirements for nuclear decomm issioning costs. For example, an increase of 0.25% in the assumed escalation rates for nuclear
decommissioning costs would increase NEE’ s AROs at December 31, 2021 by approximately  $234 million.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
FPL – For ratemaking purpos es, FPL accrues and funds for nuclear plant decommissioning costs over the expected servic e life of each unit
based on studies that are approved by the FPSC. The most recent studies, filed in 2020, reflect , among other things, the expiration dates of the
operating licenses for FPL’s nuclear units at the time of the studies. FPL’s portion of the future cost of decommissioning its four nuclear units,
including spent fuel storage above what is expe cted to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be
approximately $10.2 billion, or $2.4 billion expre ssed in 2021 dollars. The ultimate costs of decommissioning reflect the application submitted to
the NRC for the extension of St. Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 licenses for an additional 20 years.
50
Table of Contents
FPL accrues the cost of dismantling its other generation plants over the expected service life of each unit based on studies filed with the FPSC.
Unlike nuclear decommissioning, dismantleme nt costs are not funded. The most recent studies became effective January 1, 2022. At
December 31, 2021, FPL’s portion of the ultimate cost to dismantle its other generation plants is approximately $2.5 billion, or $1.2 billion
expressed in 2021 dollars. The majority of the dismantlement costs are not reported as AROs. FPL accrues for interim removal costs over the life
of the related assets based on depreciation studies approved by the FPSC. Any differences between the amount of the ARO and the amount
recorded for ratemaking purposes are reported as a regulatory asset or liability in accordance with regulatory accounting.
The components of FPL ’s decommissioning of nuclear plants, dismantlement of plants and other accrued asset removal costs are as follows:
Nuclear
DecommissioningOther Generation Plant
DismantlementInterim Removal
Costs and Other Total
December 31, December 31, December 31, December 31,
2021 2020 2021 2020 2021 2020 2021 2020
(millions)
AROs $ 1,736 $ 1,604 $ 364 $ 326 $ 7 $ 6 $ 2,107 $ 1,936 
Less capitalized ARO asset net of accumulated
depreciation 63 — 56 59 1 1 120 60 
Accrued asset removal costs 447 408 198 227 (156) 544 489 1,179 
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense
difference 4,399 3,690 (218) (185) (9) (5) 4,172 3,500 
Accrued decommissioning, dismantlement and other
accrued asset removal costs $ 6,519 $ 5,702 $ 288 $ 309 $ (159) $ 544 $ 6,648 $ 6,555 
______________________
(a)    See Note 11.
(b)    Included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE’s and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets, except for $263 million which is related to interim removal costs and is included in
noncurrent regulatory assets as of December 31, 2021. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation.
(c)    Included in noncurrent regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets, except for $118 million and $83 million which are related to other generation plant
dismantlement and are included in noncurrent regulatory assets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
(d)    Represents total amount accrued for ratemaking purposes.
NEER – NEER records liabilities for the present value of its expected nuclear plant decommissioning costs which are determined using various
internal and external data and applying a probability percentage to a variety of scenarios regarding the life of the plant and timing of
decommissioning. The liabilities are being accreted using the interest method through the date decommissioning activities are expected to be
complete. At December 31, 2021 and 2020 , the AROs for decomm issioning of NEER’ s nuclear plants approximated $599 million and $637
million, respectively . NEER’ s portion of the ultima te cost of decommissioning its nuclear plants, including costs associated with spent fuel storage
above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be approximatel y $9.4 billion, or
$2.1 billion  expressed in 2021 dollars.
See Note 1 – Asset Retirement Obligations and – Decommiss ioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantl ement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset
Removal Costs and Note 11.
Regulatory Accounting
Certain of NEE's businesses are subject to rate regulation which results in the recording of regulatory assets and liabilities. See Note 1 – Rate
Regulation for details regarding NEE’ s regulatory assets and liabilities.
Nature of Accounting Estimates
Regulatory assets and liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking
process. Regulatory assets and liabilities are included in rate base or otherwise earn (pay) a return on investment during the recovery period.
Assumptions and Accounting Approach
Accounting guidance allows regulators to create  assets and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. If NEE's
rate-regulated entities, primarily FPL, were no longer subject to cost-based rate regulation, the existing regulatory assets and liabilities would be
written off unless regulators specify an alternative means of recovery or refund. In addition, the regulators, including the FPSC for FPL, have the
authority to disallow recovery of costs that they consider excessive or imprudently incurred. Such costs may include, among others, fuel and
O&M expenses, the cost of replacing power lost when generation facilities are unavailable, storm restoration costs and costs associated with the
construction or acquisition of new facilities. The continued applicability of regulatory accounting is assessed at each reporting period.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
51
Table of Contents
ENERGY MARKETING AND TRADING AND MARKET RISK SENSITIVITY
NEE and FPL are expos ed to risks associated with adverse changes in commodity prices, interest rates and equity prices. Financial instruments
and positions affecting the financial statements of NEE and FPL described below are held primarily for purposes other than trading. Market risk is
measured as the potential loss in fair value resulting from hypothetical reasonably possible changes in commodity prices, interest rates or equity
prices over the next year. Management has established risk management policies to monitor and manage such market risks, as well as credit
risks.
Commodity Price Risk
NEE and FPL use deriv ative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in
the purchase and sale of fuel and electricity . In addition, NEE, through NEER, uses derivatives to optimize the value of its power generation and
gas infrastructure assets and engages in power  and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage of expected future favorable price
movements. See Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates – Accounting for Derivatives and Hedging Activities and Note 3.
During 2020 and 2021, the changes in the fair value of NEE’ s consolidated subsidiaries’  energy contract derivative instruments were as follows:
Hedges on Owned Assets
TradingNon-
QualifyingFPL Cost
Recovery
Clauses NEE Total
(millions)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2019 $ 651 $ 1,209 $ (11) $ 1,849 
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts (329) (253) 12 (570)
Value of contracts acquired 91 (36) — 55 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 10 4 — 14 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized 283 72 (1) 354 
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2020 706 996 — 1,702 
Reclassification to realized at settlement of contracts 179 293 (7) 465 
Value of contracts acquired 80 9 — 89 
Net option premium purchases (issuances) 23 11 — 34 
Changes in fair value excluding reclassification to realized (10) (2,701) 8 (2,703)
Fair value of contracts outstanding at December 31, 2021 978 (1,392) 1 (413)
Net margin cash collateral paid (received) (28)
Total mark-to-market energy contract net assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2021 $ 978 $ (1,392) $ 1 $ (441)
NEE’ s total mark-to-market energy contract net assets (liabilities) at December 31, 2021 shown above are included on the consolidated balance
sheets as follows:
December 31, 2021
(millions)
Current derivative assets $ 689 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,068 
Current derivative liabilities (1,175)
Noncurrent derivative liabilities (1,023)
NEE's total mark-to-market energy contract net liabilities $ (441)
52
Table of Contents
The sources of fair value estimates and maturity of energy contract derivative instruments at December 31, 2021 were as follows:
Maturity
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter Total
(millions)
Trading:
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets $(190)$(176)$(145)$ (95)$ (7)$ 1 $(612)
Significant other observable inputs 499 422 248 195 81 97 1,542 
Significant unobservable inputs (139) (79) 1 22 30 213 48 
Total 170 167 104 122 104 311 978 
Owned Assets – Non-Qualifying:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets (37) (24) (2) — — — (63)
Significant other observable inputs (479) (371) (253) (150) (91) (101) (1,445)
Significant unobservable inputs 29 17 12 18 19 21 116 
Total (487) (378) (243) (132) (72) (80) (1,392)
Owned Assets – FPL Cost Recovery Clauses:       
Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets — — — — — — — 
Significant other observable inputs (5) — — — — — (5)
Significant unobservable inputs 7 (1) — — — — 6 
Total 2 (1) — — — — 1 
Total sources of fair value $(315)$(212)$(139)$ (10)$ 32 $ 231 $(413)
With respec t to commodities, NEE’ s Exposure Management Committee (EMC), which is comprised of certain members of senior management,
and NEE's chief executiv e officer are responsible for the overall approval of market risk management policies and the delegation of approval and
authorization levels. The EMC and NEE's chief executive officer receive periodic updates on market positions and related exposures, credit
exposures and overall risk management activities.
NEE uses a value-at-risk (VaR) model to meas ure commodity price market risk in its trading and mark-to-market portfolios. The VaR is the
estimated loss of marke t value based on a one-day holding period at a 95% confidence level using historical simulation methodology . The VaR
figures are as follows:
TradingNon-Qualifying Hedges
and Hedges in FPL  Cost Recovery
Clauses Total
FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE FPL NEER NEE
(millions)
December 31, 2020 $ — $ 3 $ 3 $ 1 $ 77 $ 78 $ 1 $ 84 $ 85 
December 31, 2021 $ — $ 17 $ 17 $ 1 $ 148 $ 148 $ 1 $ 149 $ 149 
Average for the year ended December 31, 2021 $ — $ 11 $ 11 $ — $ 100 $ 100 $ — $ 101 $ 101 
______________________
(a)    The VaR figures for the trading portfolio include positions that are marked to market. Taking into consideration offsetting unmarked non-derivative positions, such as physical
inventory, the trading VaR figures were approximately $9 million and $3 million at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, respectively.
(b)    Non-qualifying hedges are employed to reduce the market risk exposure to physical assets or contracts which are not marked to market. The VaR figures for the non-qualifying
hedges and hedges in FPL cost recovery clauses category do not represent the economic exposure to commodity price movements.
Interest Rate Risk
NEE's and FPL's financ ial results are exposed to risk resulting from changes in interest rates as a result of their respective outstanding and
expected future issuances of debt, investments in spec ial use funds and other investments. NEE and FPL manage their respe ctive interest rate
exposure by monitoring current interest rates, entering into interest rate contracts and using a combination of fixed rate and variable rate debt.
Interest rate contracts are used to mitigate and adjust interest rate exposure when deemed appropriate based upon market conditions or when
required by financing agreements.(a) (b)
53
Table of Contents
The following are estimates of the fair value of NEE's and FPL's financial instruments that are exposed to interest rate risk:
 December 31, 2021  December 31, 2020
 Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value  Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)
NEE:      
Fixed income securities:      
Special use funds $ 2,505 $ 2,505 $ 2,134 $ 2,134 
Other investments, primarily debt securities $ 311 $ 311 $ 247 $ 247 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 52,745 $ 57,290 $ 46,082 $ 51,525 
Interest rate contracts – net unrealized losses $ (633)$ (633) $ (961)$ (961)
FPL:      
Fixed income securities – special use funds $ 1,934 $ 1,934 $ 1,617 $ 1,617 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 18,510 $ 21,379 $ 17,236 $ 21,178 
______________________
(a)    See Notes 3 and 4.
The special  use funds of NEE and FPL consist of restricted funds set aside to cover the cost of storm damage for FPL and for the
decommissioning of NEE's and FPL's nuclear power plants. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery . A portion of
these funds is invested in fixed income debt securities primarily carried at estimated fair value. At FPL, changes in fair value, including any credit
losses, result in a corre sponding adjustment to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on current regulatory treatment. The
changes in fair value for NEE's non-rate regula ted operations result in a corresponding adjustment to other comprehensive income, except for
credit losses and unrealized losses on available for sale securities intended or required to be sold prior to recovery of the amortized cost basis,
which are reported in current period earnings. Because the funds set aside by FPL for storm damage could be needed at any time, the related
investments are generally more liquid and, therefore, are less sensitive to changes in interest rates. The nuclear decommissioning funds, in
contrast, are generally invested in longer-term securities.
At December 31, 2021,  NEE had interest rate contracts with a notional amount of approxim ately $11.2 billion to manage exposure to the
variability of cash flows associated with expected future and outstanding debt issuances at NEECH and NEER. See Note 3.
Based upon  a hypothetical 10% decrease in interest rates, the fair value of NEE’ s net liabilities would increase by approxim ately $1,440  million
($664 million f or FPL) at December 31, 2021.
Equity Price Risk
NEE and FPL are exposed to risk resulting from changes in prices for equity securities. For example, NEE’ s nuclear decommissioning reserve
funds include marketable equity securities carrie d at their market value of approximately $5,511 million and $4,726 million ($3,552 million and
$3,012 millio n for FPL) at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . NEE's and FPL’s investment strategy for equity securities in their nuclear
decommissioning reserve funds emphasizes marketable securities which are broadly diversified. At December 31, 2021, a hypothetical 10%
decrease in the prices quoted on stock exchanges would result in an approximately $520 million ($335 million for FPL) reduction in fair value. For
FPL, a corresponding adjustment would be made to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts based on current regulatory treatment, and
for NEE’ s non-rate regul ated operations, a corresponding amount would be recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities
held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Credit Risk
NEE and its subsidiaries , including FPL, are also exposed to credit risk through their energy marketing and trading operations. Credit risk is the
risk that a financial loss will be incurred if a counterparty to a transaction does not fulfill its financ ial obligation. NEE manages counterparty credit
risk for its subsidiaries with energy marketing and trading operations through established policies, including counterparty credit limits, and in
some cases credit enhancements, such as cash prepayments, letters of credit, cash and other collateral and guarantees.
Credit risk is also managed through the use of master netting agreements. NEE’ s credit department monitors current and forward credit exposure
to counterparties and their affiliates, both on an individual and an aggregate basis. For all derivative and contractual transactions, NEE’ s energy
marketing and trading operations, which include FPL's energy marketing and trading division, are exposed to losses in the event of
nonperformance by counterparties to these transactions. Some relevant considerations when assessing NEE’ s energy marketing and trading
operations’  credit risk exposure include the following:
•Operations are primarily concentrated in the energy industry .(a) (a)
54
Table of Contents
•Trade receiv ables and other financial instruments are predominately with energy , utility and financial services related companies, as well as
municipalities, cooperatives and other trading companies in the U.S.
•Overall credit risk is managed through established credit policies and is overseen by the EMC.
•Prospective and existing customers are review ed for creditworthiness based upon established standards, with customers not meeting
minimum standards providing various credit enha ncements or secured payment terms, such as letters of credit or the posting of margin cash
collateral.
•Master netting agreements are used to offset cash and noncash gains and losses arising from derivative instruments with the same
counterparty . NEE’ s policy is to have master netting agreements in place with significant counterparties.
Based on NEE’ s policie s and risk exposures related to credit, NEE and FPL do not anticipate a material adverse effect on their financial
statements as a result of counterparty nonperformance. At December 31, 2021, NEE's credit risk exposure associated with its energy marketing
and trading counterparties, taking into account collateral and contractual netting rights, totaled approximately $1.9 billion  ($61 million for FPL), of
which approximately 64% (100% for FPL) was with companies that have investment grade credit ratings. With regard to credit risk exposure to
counterparties with below investment grade credit ratings, NEE has first lien security positions with respect to approximately 60% of such
exposure. For the remain ing unsecured positions with counterparties that have below investment  grade credit ratings, no one counterparty makes
up more than 9% of NEE’ s total exposure to below investment grade counterparties. See Notes 1 – Credit Losses, 2 and 3.
Item 7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
See Management’ s Discussion – Energy Marketing and Trading and Market Risk Sensitivity .
55
Table of Contents
Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
MANAGEMENT'S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
NextEra Energy, Inc.'s (NEE) and Florida Power & Light Company's (FPL) management are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate
internal control over financial reporting as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). The consolidated financial
statements, which in part are based on informed judgments and estimates made by management, have been prepared in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles applied on a consistent basis.
To aid in carrying out this responsibility, we, along with all other members of management, maintain a system of internal accounting control which is
established after weighing the cost of such controls against the benefits derived. In the opinion of management, the overall system of internal accounting
control provides reasonable assurance that the assets of NEE and FPL and their subsidiaries are safeguarded and that transactions are executed in
accordance with management's authorization and are properly recorded for the preparation of financial statements. In addition, management believes the
overall system of internal accounting control provides reasonable assurance that material errors or irregularities would be prevented or detected on a
timely basis by employees in the normal course of their duties. Any system of internal accounting control, no matter how well designed, has inherent
limitations, including the possibility that controls can be circumvented or overridden and misstatements due to error or fraud may occur and not be
detected. Also, because of changes in conditions, internal control effectiveness may vary over time. Accordingly, even an effective system of internal
control will provide only reasonable assurance with respect to financial statement preparation and reporting.
The system of internal accounting control is supported by written policies and guidelines, the selection and training of qualified employees, an
organizational structure that provides an appropriate division of responsibility and a program of internal auditing. NEE's written policies include a Code of
Business Conduct & Ethics that states management's policy on conflicts of interest and ethical conduct. Compliance with the Code of Business Conduct &
Ethics is confirmed annually by key personnel.
The Board of Directors pursues its oversight responsibility for financial reporting and accounting through its Audit Committee. This Committee, which is
comprised entirely of independent directors, meets regularly with management, the internal auditors and the independent auditors to make inquiries as to
the manner in which the responsibilities of each are being discharged. The independent auditors and the internal audit staff have free access to the
Committee without management present to discuss auditing, internal accounting control and financial reporting matters.
Management assessed the effectiveness of NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, using the criteria set forth
by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission in the Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013). Based on this
assessment, management believes that NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2021.
NEE's and FPL's independent registered public accounting firm, Deloitte & Touche LLP, is engaged to express an opinion on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated financial statements and an opinion on NEE's and FPL's internal control over financial reporting. Their reports are based on procedures
believed by them to provide a reasonable basis to support such opinions. These reports appear on the following pages.
JAMES L. ROBO REBECCA J. KUJAWA
James L. Robo
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of NEE and
Chairman of FPLRebecca J. Kujawa
Executive Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer
of NEE and FPL
JAMES M. MAY
James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting Officer
of NEE
ERIC E. SILAGY KEITH FERGUSON
Eric E. Silagy
President and Chief Executive Officer of FPLKeith Ferguson
Controller of FPL
56
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financ ial reporting of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsidia ries (NEE) and Florida Power & Light Company
and subsidiaries (FPL) as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria establishe d in Internal Control – Integrated Framework  (2013)  issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, NEE and FPL maintained, in all material respects,
effective internal control over financial reportin g as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integ rated
Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2021 of NEE and FPL and our report dated February 17, 2022,
expressed unqualified opinions on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
NEE's and FPL’s management are responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for their assessments of the
effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial
Reporting. Our responsi bility is to express opinions on NEE’ s and FPL’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We are a
public accou nting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S.
federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits  in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audits to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was mainta ined in all material respects. Our audits included
obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating
the design and operating  effectiveness of intern al control based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered
necessary in the circumstances. W e believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A
company's internal control over financial reportin g includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance
that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accor dance with authorizations of management and
directors of the compan y; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company's assets that could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any
evaluation of effectivene ss to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or
that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 17, 2022
57
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of
    NextEra Energy , Inc. and Florida Power & Light Company
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of NextEra Energy , Inc. and subsidiaries (NEE) and the related separate
consolidated balance sheets of Florida Power & Light Company and subsidiaries (FPL) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and NEE's and
FPL's related consolidated statements of income  and cash flows, NEE's consolidated statements of comprehensive income and equity , and FPL’s
consolidated statements of common shareholder ’s equity , for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related
notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the
consolidated financial position of NEE and the consolidated financial position of FPL as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of their
operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), NEE’ s
and FPL’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated
Framework (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organiz ations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated February 17, 2022,
expressed unqualified opinions on NEE’ s and FPL ’s internal control over financial reporting.
Emphasis of Matter
As discussed in Note 6 to the financial statemen ts, on January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity .
FPL’s 2019 and 2020 financial statements have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect this merger . Our opinion is not modified with respect to
this matter .
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility  of NEE’ s and FPL’s management. Our respons ibility is to express opinions on NEE’ s and FPL’s
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with
respect to NEE and FPL in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applica ble rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits  in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audits to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the finan cial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits
included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We belie ve that our audits provide a reasonable basis for
our opinions.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements of NEE and FPL that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the
financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgme nts. The communication of critical audit matters
does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters
below , providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
NEE – Operating Revenue – Unrealized Losses – Refer to Note 3 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
NEE enters into comple x energy derivatives and transacts in certain markets that are thinly traded, which may result in subjective estimates of
fair value that include unobservable inputs. Changes in the derivatives’  fair value for power purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities
are primarily  recognized on a net basis in operating revenues. For the year ended December 31, 2021, unrealized losses associated with Level 3
transactions of $924 million are included in operating revenues in the consolidated statement of income of NEE.
Given mana gement uses complex proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of Level 3 derivative assets and
liabilities, performing audit procedures to evalua te the appropriateness of these models and inputs required a high degree of auditor judgment
and an increased extent of ef fort, including the need to involve our firm specialists who possess significant quantitative and modeling expertise.
58
Table of Contents
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to operating revenue – unrealized losses included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiven ess of controls relating to commodity valuation models, their related Level 3 unobservable inputs, and market
data validation.
•We selected  a sample of transactions, obtained an understanding of the business rationale of transactions, and read the underlying
contractual agreements.
•We used personnel in our firm who specialize in energy transacting to independently value Level 3 transactions. For certain fair value
models, we used our firm specialists to directly test the underlying assumptions of the unobservable inputs used by management.
•We evaluate d NEE’ s disclosures related to the proprietary models and unobservable inputs to estimate the fair value of Level 3
derivative assets and liabilities, including the balances recorded and significant assumptions.
FPL – Impact of Rate Regulation on the Financial Statements – Refer to Note 1 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
FPL is subject to rate regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission (the “FPSC”), which has jurisdiction with respect to the rates of electric
distribution companies. Management has determined it meets the requirements under accounting principles generally accepted in the United
States of America to prepare its financial state ments applying the specialized rules to account for the effects of cost-based rate regulation.
Accounting for the economics of rate regulation impacts multiple financial statement line items and disclosures, such as property , plant, and
equipment; regulatory assets and liabilities; operating revenues; operation and maintenance expense; and depreciation expense.
Rates are determined and approved in regulator y proceedings based on an analysis of FPL’s costs to provide utility service and a return on, and
recovery of, FPL’s investment in the assets required to deliver utility service. Accounting guidance for FPL’s regulated operations provides that
rate-regulated entities report assets and liabilities consistent with the recovery of those incurred costs in rates, if it is probable that such rates will
be charged and collecte d. The FPSC has the authority to disallow recovery of costs that it cons iders excessive or imprudently incurred. Future
FPSC decis ions could impact the accounting for regulated operations, including decisions about the amount of allowable costs and any refunds
that may be required. As a result of this cost-ba sed regulation, FPL follows the accounting guidance that allows regulators to create assets and
impose liabilities, based on the probability of future cash flows, that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. Regulatory assets and
liabilities represent probable future revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking process.
We identified the impact of rate regulation as a critical audit matter due to the requirement to have auditors with deep knowledge of and
significant experience with accounting for rate regulation and the rate setting process due to its inherent complexities.
How the Critical Audit Matter W as Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the impact of rate regulation included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiven ess of management’ s controls over the evaluation of the likelihood of (1) the recovery in future rates of costs
incurred as property , plant, and equipment and deferred as regulatory assets, and (2) a refund or a future reduction in rates that should
be reported as regulator y liabilities. We also tested the effectiveness of management’ s controls over the initial recognition of amounts as
property , plant, and equipment and regulatory assets or liabilities; the depreciation and amortization of such amounts in accordance with
FPSC order s; and the monitoring and evaluation of regulatory developments that may affect the likelihood of recovering costs
recognized as property , plant and equipment and regulatory assets in future rates or of a refund or future reduction in rates that should
be recognized as a regulatory liability .
•We evaluated FPL ’s disclosures related to the impacts of rate regulation, including the balances recorded and regulatory developments.
•We assessed the likelih ood of (1) recovery of recorded regulatory assets and (2) obligations requiring future reductions in rates by
obtaining, reading and evaluating relevant regula tory orders issued by the FPSC to FPL, including the December 2, 2021 order adopting
the stipulatio n of settlement for FPL's 2021 rate agreement. We also evaluated such regulatory orders and other publicly available filings
made by FPL  and compared them to management’ s recorded regulatory asset and liability balances for completeness.
DELOITTE & TOUCHE LLP
Boca Raton, Florida
February 17, 2022
We have served as NEE’ s and FPL ’s auditor since 1950.
59
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
OPERA TING REVENUES $ 17,069  $ 17,997  $ 19,204  
OPERA TING EXPENSES    
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 4,527  3,539  4,363  
Other operations and maintenance 3,953  3,751  3,640  
Storm restoration costs 28 183 234 
Depreciation and amortization 3,924  4,052  4,216  
Taxes other than income taxes and other – net 1,801  1,709  1,804  
Total operating expenses – net 14,233  13,234  14,257  
GAINS ON DISPOSAL  OF BUSINESSES/ASSETS – NET 77 353 406 
OPERA TING INCOME 2,913  5,116  5,353  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)    
Interest expense (1,270 ) (1,950 ) (2,249 )
Equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees 666 (1,351 ) 66 
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 142 93 67 
Gains on disposal of investments and other property – net 70 50 55 
Change in unrealized gains (losses) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds – net 267 163 238 
Other net periodic benefit income 257 200 185 
Other – net 130 92 121 
Total other income (deductions) – net 262 (2,703 ) (1,517 )
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 3,175  2,413  3,836  
INCOME TAXES 348 44 448 
NET INCOME 2,827  2,369  3,388  
NET LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 746 550 381 
NET INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 3,573  $ 2,919  $ 3,769  
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:    
Basic $ 1.82 $ 1.49 $ 1.95 
Assuming dilution $ 1.81 $ 1.48 $ 1.94 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
60
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
NET INCOME $ 2,827  $ 2,369  $ 3,388  
OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME (LOSS), NET  OF TAX
Reclassification of unrealized losses on cash flow hedges from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) to net income (net of $ 2 tax benefit, $ 4 tax benefit and $ 8 tax
expense, respectively) 6 12 29 
Net unrealized gains (losses) on available for sale securities:  
Net unrealized gains (losses) on securities still held (net of $ 4 tax benefit, $ 4 tax expense
and $ 8 tax expense, respectively) (11) 12 20 
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net income (net of
$2 tax expense, $ 1 tax expense and $ 1 tax benefit, respectively) (4) (3) (2)
Defined benefit pension and other benefits plans:
Net unrealized gain (loss) and unrecognized prior service benefit (cost) (net of $ 30 tax
expense, $ 11 tax expense and $ 14 tax benefit, respectively) 95 37 (46)
Reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) to net income (net of
$1 tax benefit, $ 1 tax benefit and $ 1 tax benefit, respectively) 5 2 (3)
Net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation (1) 13 22 
Other comprehensive income related to equity method investees (net of less than $ 1 tax
expense, less than $ 1 tax expense and $ 0 tax expense, respectively) 1 1 1 
Total other comprehensive income, net of tax 91 74 21 
IMPACT OF DISPOSAL  OF A BUSINESS (NET  OF $ 19 TAX BENEFIT) — 10 — 
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME 2,918  2,453  3,409  
COMPREHENSIVE LOSS ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS 747 543 380 
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME ATTRIBUT ABLE TO NEE $ 3,665  $ 2,996  $ 3,789  
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
61
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except par value)
December 31,
2021 2020
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 639 $ 1,105 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $35 and $67, respectively 3,378 2,263 
Other receivables 730 711 
Materials, supplies and fuel inventory 1,561 1,552 
Regulatory assets 1,125 377 
Derivatives 689 570 
Other 1,166 804 
Total current assets 9,288 7,382 
Other assets:   
Property, plant and equipment – net ($20,521 and $18,084 related to VIEs, respectively) 99,348 91,803 
Special use funds 8,922 7,779 
Investment in equity method investees 6,159 5,728 
Prepaid benefit costs 2,243 1,707 
Regulatory assets 4,578 3,712 
Derivatives 1,135 1,647 
Goodwill 4,844 4,254 
Other 4,395 3,672 
Total other assets 131,624 120,302 
TOTAL ASSETS $ 140,912 $ 127,684 
LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Commercial paper $ 1,382 $ 1,551 
Other short-term debt 700 458 
Current portion of long-term debt ($58 and $27 related to VIEs, respectively) 1,785 4,138 
Accounts payable ($752 and $1,433 related to VIEs, respectively) 6,935 4,615 
Customer deposits 485 474 
Accrued interest and taxes 525 519 
Derivatives 1,263 311 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 1,378 991 
Regulatory liabilities 289 245 
Other 2,695 2,256 
Total current liabilities 17,437 15,558 
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt ($1,125 and $493 related to VIEs, respectively) 50,960 41,944 
Asset retirement obligations 3,082 3,057 
Deferred income taxes 8,310 8,020 
Regulatory liabilities 11,273 10,735 
Derivatives 1,713 1,199 
Other 2,468 2,242 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 77,806 67,197 
TOTAL LIABILITIES 95,243 82,755 
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS – VIE 245 — 
EQUITY   
Common stock ($0.01 par value, authorized shares – 3,200; outstanding shares – 1,963 and 1,960, respectively) 20 20 
Additional paid-in capital 11,271 11,222 
Retained earnings 25,911 25,363 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss — (92)
Total common shareholders' equity 37,202 36,513 
Noncontrolling interests ($8,217 and $8,413 related to VIEs, respectively) 8,222 8,416 
TOTAL EQUITY 45,424 44,929 
TOTAL LIABILITIES, REDEEMABLE NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS AND EQUITY $ 140,912 $ 127,684 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
62
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 2,827 $ 2,369 $ 3,388 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 3,924 4,052 4,216 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 290 263 262 
Unrealized losses (gains) on marked to market derivative contracts – net 2,005 533 (108)
Foreign currency transaction losses (gains) (94) 45 17 
Deferred income taxes 436 (78) 258 
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (599) (121) 155 
Equity in losses (earnings) of equity method investees (666) 1,351 (66)
Distributions of earnings from equity method investees 526 456 438 
Gains on disposal of businesses, assets and investments – net (146) (403) (461)
Recoverable storm-related costs (138) (69) (180)
Other – net (326) 189 (141)
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Current assets (1,267) (364) 123 
Noncurrent assets (324) (234) (93)
Current liabilities 1,053 (6) 116 
Noncurrent liabilities 52 — 231 
Net cash provided by operating activities 7,553 7,983 8,155 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures of FPL Segment (6,626) (6,477) (5,560)
Acquisition and capital expenditures of Gulf Power (782) (1,012) (5,165)
Independent power and other investments of NEER (8,247) (6,851) (6,385)
Nuclear fuel purchases (275) (245) (315)
Other capital expenditures (147) (25) (37)
Sale of independent power and other investments of NEER 2,761 1,012 1,316 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds and other investments 4,995 3,916 4,008 
Purchases of securities in special use funds and other investments (5,310) (4,100) (4,160)
Other – net 40 83 121 
Net cash used in investing activities (13,591) (13,699) (16,177)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 16,683 12,404 13,905 
Retirements of long-term debt (9,594) (6,103) (5,492)
Proceeds from differential membership investors 2,779 3,522 1,604 
Net change in commercial paper (169) (965) (234)
Proceeds from other short-term debt — 2,158 200 
Repayments of other short-term debt (257) (2,100) (4,765)
Payments from (to) related parties under a cash sweep and credit support agreement – net 47 (2) (54)
Issuances of common stock/equity units – net 14 (92) 1,494 
Proceeds from sale of noncontrolling interests 65 501 99 
Dividends on common stock (3,024) (2,743) (2,408)
Other – net (737) (406) (476)
Net cash provided by financing activities 5,807 6,174 3,873 
Effects of currency translation on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 1 (20) 4 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (230) 438 (4,145)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 1,546 1,108 5,253 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 1,316 $ 1,546 $ 1,108 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 1,323 $ 1,432 $ 1,799 
Cash paid (received) for income taxes – net $ (69)$ 235 $ 184 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Accrued property additions $ 4,995 $ 4,445 $ 3,573 
Increase in property, plant and equipment related to an acquisition $ — $ 68 $ — 
Decrease in joint venture investments related to an acquisition $ — $ 145 $ — 
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.
63
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(millions)
Common Stock
Additional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Retained
EarningsTotal
Common
Shareholders'
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
EquityRedeemable
Non-controlling
Interests SharesAggregate
Par Value
Balances, December 31, 2018 1,912 $ 19 $ 10,476 $ (188)$23,837 $ 34,144 $ 3,269 $37,413 $ 468 
Net income (loss) — — — — 3,769 3,769 (371) (9)
Issuances of common stock/equity
units – net 40 — 1,470 — — 1,470 —  — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 164 — — 164 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,408) (2,408) —  — 
Other comprehensive income — — — 20 — 20 1 — 
Premium on equity units — — (120) — — (120) — — 
Other differential membership interest
activity — — (20) — — (20) 1,270 29 
Other — 1 (15) (1) 1 (14) 186 (1)
Balances, December 31, 2019 1,956 20 11,955 (169) 25,199 37,005 4,355 $41,360 487 
Net income (loss) — — — — 2,919 2,919 (546) (4)
Issuances of common stock/equity
units – net — — (92) — — (92) — — 
Share-based payment activity 4 — 153 — — 153 — — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (2,743) (2,743) — — 
Other comprehensive income — — — 67 — 67 7  — 
Impact of disposal of a business — — — 10 — 10 — — 
Adoption of accounting standards
update — — — — (11) (11) — — 
Premium on equity units — — (587) — — (587) — — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (36) — — (36) 3,809 (483)
Sale of noncontrolling interests — — (169) — — (169) 689 — 
Other — — (2) — (1) (3) 102 — 
Balances, December 31, 2020 1,960 20 11,222 (92) 25,363 36,513 8,416 $44,929 — 
Net income (loss) — — — — 3,573 3,573 (748) 2 
Share-based payment activity 3 — 132 — — 132 —  — 
Dividends on common stock — — — — (3,024) (3,024) —  — 
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — 92 — 92 (1) — 
Other differential membership
interests activity — — (26) — — (26) 363 243 
Other — — (57) — (1) (58) 192 — 
Balances, December 31, 2021 1,963 $ 20 $ 11,271 $ — $25,911 $ 37,202 $ 8,222 $45,424 $ 245 
_________________________
(a)Dividends per share were $1.54, $1.40 and $1.25 for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(b)See Note 1 – Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments.
(c)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
(a)
(b)
(a)
 (c)
64
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF INCOME
(millions)
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
OPERA TING REVENUES $ 14,102  $ 13,060  $ 13,680  
OPERA TING EXPENSES
Fuel, purchased power and interchange 3,956  3,060  3,802  
Other operations and maintenance 1,803  1,707  1,790  
Storm restoration costs 28 183 234 
Depreciation and amortization 2,266  2,526  2,771  
Taxes other than income taxes and other – net 1,533  1,464  1,504  
Total operating expenses – net 9,586  8,940  10,101  
OPERA TING INCOME 4,516  4,120  3,579  
OTHER INCOME (DEDUCTIONS)
Interest expense (615) (641) (649)
Allowance for equity funds used during construction 132 87 66 
Other – net 11 2 7 
Total other deductions – net (472) (552) (576)
INCOME BEFORE INCOME TAXES 4,044  3,568  3,003  
INCOME TAXES 838 678 484 
NET INCOME $ 3,206  $ 2,890  $ 2,519  
______________________
(a)Amounts have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company, see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company.
(b)FPL's comprehensive income is the same as reported net income.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a) (a)
(b)
65
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(millions, except share amount)
 December 31,
2021 2020
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 55 $ 25 
Customer receivables, net of allowances of $ 11 and $ 44, respectively 1,297  1,141  
Other receivables 350 405 
Materials, supplies and fuel inventory 963 899 
Regulatory assets 1,111  360 
Other 142 182 
Total current assets 3,918  3,012  
Other assets:   
Electric utility plant and other property – net 58,227  53,879  
Special use funds 6,158  5,347  
Prepaid benefit costs 1,657  1,550  
Regulatory assets 4,343  3,399  
Goodwill 2,989  2,989  
Other 775 825 
Total other assets 74,149  67,989  
TOTAL ASSETS $ 78,067  $ 71,001  
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Commercial paper $ 1,382  $ 1,551  
Other short-term debt 200 200 
Current portion of long-term debt 536 354 
Accounts payable 1,318  874 
Customer deposits 478 468 
Accrued interest and taxes 322 300 
Accrued construction-related expenditures 601 423 
Regulatory liabilities 278 224 
Other 643 948 
Total current liabilities 5,758  5,342  
Other liabilities and deferred credits:   
Long-term debt 17,974  16,882  
Asset retirement obligations 2,049  1,871  
Deferred income taxes 7,137  6,519  
Regulatory liabilities 11,053  10,600  
Other 502 559 
Total other liabilities and deferred credits 38,715  36,431  
TOTAL LIABILITIES 44,473  41,773  
COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
EQUITY   
Common stock ( no par value, 1,000  shares authorized, issued and outstanding) 1,373  1,373  
Additional paid-in capital 19,936  18,236  
Retained earnings 12,285  9,619  
TOTAL EQUITY 33,594  29,228  
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND EQUITY $ 78,067  $ 71,001  
_________________________
(a)Amounts have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company, see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
66
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(millions)
Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES    
Net income $ 3,206 $ 2,890 $ 2,519 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by (used in) operating activities:  
Depreciation and amortization 2,266 2,526 2,771 
Nuclear fuel and other amortization 174 167 178 
Deferred income taxes 752 629 45 
Cost recovery clauses and franchise fees (599) (121) 155 
Recoverable storm-related costs (138) (69) (180)
Other – net (157) 35 (5)
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Current assets (49) (164) (42)
Noncurrent assets (114) (77) 22 
Current liabilities 20 31 50 
Noncurrent liabilities (3) (31) (12)
Net cash provided by operating activities 5,358 5,816 5,501 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES    
Capital expenditures (7,411) (7,476) (6,290)
Nuclear fuel purchases (159) (203) (195)
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities in special use funds 3,308 2,488 2,729 
Purchases of securities in special use funds (3,394) (2,567) (2,854)
Other – net 15 65 10 
Net cash used in investing activities (7,641) (7,693) (6,600)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES    
Issuances of long-term debt, including premiums and discounts 2,588 3,003 2,998 
Retirements of long-term debt (1,304) (1,603) (200)
Net change in commercial paper (169) (123) 418 
Proceeds from other short-term debt — — 200 
Capital contributions from NEE 1,700 2,750 359 
Dividends to NEE (540) (2,210) (2,620)
Other – net (44) (44) (46)
Net cash provided by financing activities 2,231 1,773 1,109 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (52) (104) 10 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at beginning of year 160 264 254 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash at end of year $ 108 $ 160 $ 264 
SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURES OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION    
Cash paid for interest (net of amount capitalized) $ 586 $ 620 $ 614 
Cash paid (received) for income taxes – net $ (1)$ 105 $ 584 
SUPPLEMENTAL SCHEDULE OF NONCASH INVESTING AND FINANCING ACTIVITIES  
Accrued property additions $ 1,107 $ 698 $ 914 
NEE's noncash contribution of a consolidated subsidiary – net $ — $ — $ 4,436 
_________________________
(a) Amounts have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company, see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a) (a)
67
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMMON SHAREHOLDER'S EQUITY
(millions)
Common
StockAdditional
Paid-In CapitalRetained
EarningsCommon
Shareholder's
Equity
Balances, December 31, 2018 $ 1,373  $ 10,601  $ 9,040  $ 21,014  
Net income — — 2,519   
Capital contributions from NEE — 359 — 
Dividends to NEE — — (2,620 ) 
NEE's contribution of a consolidated subsidiary — 4,525  — 
Balances, December 31, 2019 1,373  15,485  8,939  $ 25,797  
Net income — — 2,890   
Capital contributions from NEE — 2,750  — 
Dividends to NEE — — (2,210 ) 
Other — 1 — 
Balances, December 31, 2020 1,373  18,236  9,619  $ 29,228  
Net income — — 3,206   
Capital contributions from NEE — 1,700  —  
Dividends to NEE — — (540) 
Balances, December 31, 2021 $ 1,373  $ 19,936  $ 12,285  $ 33,594  
_________________________
(a)2020 and 2019 amounts have been retrospectively adjusted to reflect the merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company, see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company.
The accompanying Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements are an integral part of these statements.(a)
68
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Years Ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
1. Summary of Significant Accounting and Reporting Policies
Basis of Presentation  – The opera tions of NextEra Energy , Inc. (NEE ) are conducted primarily through Florida Power & Light Company (FPL), a
wholly owned subsidiary , and NextEra Energy Resources, LLC (NextEra Energy Resources) and NextEra Energy Transmission, LLC (NEET)
(collectively , NEER), wholly owned indirect subs idiaries that are combined for segment reporting purposes. On January 1, 2021, FPL and Gulf
Power Company merged, with FPL as the surviving entity . However during 2021, FPL continued to be regulated as two separate ratemaking
entities in the former service areas of FPL and Gulf Power . The FPL segment (FPL, excluding Gulf Power , related purchase accounting
adjustments and eliminating entries) and the Gulf Power segment (Gulf Power) continued to be operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL,
through 2021. Effective January 1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one ratemaking entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one
operating segment of NEE (see Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025 below). The merger of FPL and
Gulf Power Company was a merger between entities under common control, which required it to be accounted for as if the merger occurred since
the inception of common control, with prior periods retrospectively adjusted to furnish comparative information. Accordingly , FPL's consolidated
financial statements have been retrospectively adjusted to include the historical results and financial position of the common control merger prior
to the merger date. See Note 6 – Merger of FPL  and Gulf Power Company .
FPL's princip al business  is a rate-regulated electric utility which supplies electric service to more than 5.7 million customer accounts throughout
most of the east and lower west coasts of Florida and eight  counties throughout northwest Florida. NEER invests in independent power projects
through both controlled and consolidated entitie s and noncontrolling owner ship interest s in joint ventures. NEER participates in natural gas,
natural gas liquids and oil production primarily through operating and non-operating ownership  interests and in pipeline infrastructure through
either wholly owned subsidiaries or noncontrol ling or joint venture interests. NEER also invests in rate-regulated transmission facilities and
transmission lines that connect its electric generation facilities to the electric grid through controlled and consolidated entities.
The consolidated financial statements of NEE and FPL include the accounts of their respective controlled subsidiaries. They also include NEE's
and FPL's share of the undivided interest in certain assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses. Amounts representing NEE's interest in entities it
does not control, but over which it exercises significant influence, are included in investment in equity method investees; the earnings/losses of
these entities is included  in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees. Intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated
in consolida tion. Certain amounts included in prior years' consolidated financial statements have been reclassified to conform to the current
year's prese ntation. The preparation of financial statements requires the use of estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of
assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses and the disclosure of c ontingent assets and liabilities. Actual results could dif fer from those estimates.
NEP was formed in 2014  to acquire, manage and own contracted clean energy projects with stable long-term cash flows through a limited partner
interest in NextEra Energy Operating Partners, LP (NEP  OpCo). NEP owns or has an ownersh ip interest in a portfolio of wind, solar and solar
plus battery storage projects and long-term contracted natural gas pipelines. NEE owns a noncontrolling interest in NEP and accounts for its
ownership interest in NEP as an equity method  investment with its earnings/losses from NEP as equity in earnings (losses) of equity method
investees and accounts for NextEra Energy Resources' project sales to NEP as third-party sales in its consolidated financial statements. NEER
operates essentially all of the energy projects owned by NEP and provide services to NEP under various related party operations and
maintenance, administrative and management services agreements.
Operating Revenues – FPL and NEER generate substantially all of NEE’ s operating revenues, which primarily include  revenues from contracts
with custome rs as further discussed in Note 2, as well as, at NEER, derivative and lease transactions. FPL's operating revenues include amounts
resulting from base rates, cost recovery clauses (see Rate Regulation below), franchise fees, gross receipts taxes and surcharges related to
storms (see Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below). Franchise fees and gross receipts taxes are imposed on FPL;
however , the Florida Public Service Commission (FPSC) allows FPL to include in the amounts  charged to customers the amount of the gross
receipts tax for all customers and the franchise fee for those customers located in the jurisdicti on that imposes the amount. Accordingly , FPL's
franchise fees and gross receipts taxes are reported gross in operating revenues and taxes other than income taxes and other in NEE's and
FPL's conso lidated statements of income and were approximately $852 million, $800 million and $838 million in 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively . FPL also collects municipal utility taxes which are reported gross in customer receivables and accounts payable on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets. Certain NEER commodity contracts for the purchase and sale of power that meet the definition of a derivative are
recorded at fair value with subsequent changes in fair value recognized as revenue. See Energy Trading below and Note 3.
69
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Rate Regula tion – FPL, the most significant of NEE's rate-regu lated subsidiaries, is subject to rate regulation by the FPSC and the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC). Its rates are designed to recover the cost of providing service to its customers including a reasonable
rate of return on invested capital. As a result of this cost-based regulation, FPL follows the acco unting guidance that allows regulators to create
assets and impose liabilities that would not be recorded by non-rate regulated entities. Regulator y assets and liabilities represent probable future
revenues that will be recovered from or refunded to customers through the ratemaking process.
NEE's and FPL's regulatory assets and liabilities are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2021 2020 2021 2020
(millions)
Regulatory assets:
Current:
Early retirement of generation facilities and transmission assets $ 140 $ 36 $ 140 $ 36 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 141 161 141 161 
Deferred clause and franchise expenses 698 28 698 28 
Other 146 152 132 135 
Total $ 1,125 $ 377 $ 1,111 $ 360 
Noncurrent:     
Early retirement of generation facilities and transmission assets $ 2,233 $ 1,438 $ 2,233 $ 1,438 
Acquisition of purchased power agreements 332 473 332 473 
Accrued asset removal costs 263 — 263 — 
Other 1,750 1,801 1,515 1,488 
Total $ 4,578 $ 3,712 $ 4,343 $ 3,399 
Regulatory liabilities:     
Current:
Deferred clause revenues $ 274 $ 215 $ 274 $ 215 
Other 15 30 4 9 
Total $ 289 $ 245 $ 278 $ 224 
Noncurrent:     
Asset retirement obligation regulatory expense difference $ 4,290 $ 3,583 $ 4,290 $ 3,583 
Accrued asset removal costs 782 1,206 752 1,179 
Deferred taxes 4,561 4,698 4,457 4,594 
Other 1,640 1,248 1,554 1,244 
Total $ 11,273 $ 10,735 $ 11,053 $ 10,600 
______________________
(a)The majority of these regulatory assets are being amortized over 20 years.
(b)The majority of these regulatory assets are being amortized over approximately 9 years.
(c)See Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization below.
Cost recove ry clauses, which are designed to permit full recovery of certain costs and provide a return on certain assets allowed to be recovered
through various clauses , include substantially all fuel, purchased power and interchange expen se, certain costs associated with the acquisition
and retireme nt of several electric generation facilities, certain construction-related costs for certain of FPL's solar generation facilities, and
conservation and certain environmental-related costs.  Revenues from cost recovery clauses are recorded when billed; FPL achieves matching of
costs and related revenues by deferring the net underrecovery or overrecovery . Any underrecovered costs or overrecovered revenues are
collected from or returned to customers in subsequent periods.
If FPL were no longer subject to cost-based rate regulation, the existing regulatory assets and liabilities would be written off unless regulators
specify an alternative means of recovery or refund. In addition, the FPSC has the authority  to disallow recovery of costs that it considers
excessive or imprudently incurred. The continued applicability of regulatory accounting is assessed at each reporting period. Regulatory assets
and liabilities are discussed within various subsections below . (a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
70
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025 – In December 2021, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and
settlement between FPL  and several intervenors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2021 rate agreement).
Key elements of the 2021 rate agreement, which is effective from January 2022 through at least December 2025, include, among other things,
the following:
•New retail base rates and charges were established for the combined utility system (including the former Gulf Power service area) resulting
in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$692 million beginning January 1, 2022, and
◦$560 million beginning January 1, 2023.
•In addition, FPL is eligible to receive, subject to conditions specified in the 2021 rate agreeme nt, base rate increases associated with the
addition of up to 894 megawatts (MW) annua lly of new solar generation (through a Solar Base Rate Adjustment (SoBRA) mechanism) in
each of 2024 and 2025, and may carry forward any unused MW in 2024 to 2025. FPL has agreed to an installed cost cap of $1,250  per
kilowatt and will be required to demonstrate that these proposed solar facilities are cost ef fective.
•FPL's authorized regulatory return on common equity (ROE) is 10.60 %, with a range of 9.70% to 11.70 %. If FPL's earned regulatory ROE
falls below 9.70%, FPL may seek retail base rate relief. If the earned regulatory ROE rises above 11.70 %, any party  with standing may seek
a revie w of FPL's retail base rates. If the averag e 30-year U.S. Treasury rate is 2.49% or greater  over a consecutive six-month  period, the
authorized regulatory ROE will increase to 10.80 % with a range of 9.80% to 11.80 %. If triggere d, the increase in the authorized regulatory
ROE will not result in an incremental general base rate increase, but will apply for all other regulatory purposes, including the SoBRA
mechanism.
•Subject to certain conditions, FPL may amortize, over the term of the 2021 rate agreement, up to $1.45 billion of depreciation reserve
surplus, provided that in any year of the 2021 rate agreement FPL must amortize at least enough reserve amount to maintain its minimum
authorized regulatory ROE and also may not amortize any reserve amount that would result in an earned regulatory ROE in excess of its
maximum authorized regulatory ROE. FPL is limited to the amortization of $200 million of depreciation reserve surplus during the first year of
the 2021 rate agreement.
•FPL is authorized to expand SolarT ogether™, a voluntary community solar program that gives certain FPL electric customers an opportunity
to participate directly in the expansion of solar energy and receive credits on their related monthly customer bill, by constructing an additional
1,788  MW of solar generation from 2022 through 2025, such that the total capacity of SolarT ogether™ would be 3,278  MW.
•Future storm  restoration costs would be recoverable on an interim basis beginning 60 days from the filing of a cost recovery petition,  but
capped at an amount that produces a surcharge of no more than $4 for every 1,000  kilowa tt-hour (kWh) of usage on residential bills during
the first 12 mont hs of cost recovery . Any additional costs  would be eligible for recovery in subsequent years. If storm restoration costs
exceed $800 million in any given calendar year, FPL may request an increase to the $4 surcharge. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and
Storm Cost Recovery below .
•If federal or state permanent corporate income tax changes become effective during the term of the 2021 rate agreement, FPL will be able to
prospectively adjust base rates after a review by the FPSC.
In December 2021, Floridians Against Increased Rates, Inc. and, as a group in January 2022, Florida Rising, Inc., Environmental Confederation
of Southwes t Florida, Inc., and League of United Latin American Citizens of Florida filed notices of appeal challenging the FPSC's final order
approving the 2021 rate agreement, which notices of appeal are pending before the Florida Supreme Court.
Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021 – In December 2016, the FPSC issued a final order approving a stipulation and
settlement between FPL and several interven ors in FPL's base rate proceeding (2016 rate agreement). Key elements of the 2016 rate
agreement, which became ef fective in January 2017, provided for , among other things, the following:
•new retail base rates and charges which resulted in the following increases in annualized retail base revenues:
◦$400 million beginning January 1, 2017;
◦$211 million beginning January 1, 2018; and
◦$200 million  beginning April 1, 2019 for a new appro ximately 1,720  MW natural  gas-fired combined-cycle unit in Okeechobee
County , Florida that achieved commercial operation on March 31, 2019;
•additional base rate increases in 2018 through  2020 associated with the addition of approximately 1,200  MW of new solar generating
capacity that became operational during that timeframe;
•regulatory ROE of 10.55 %, with a range of 9.60% to 11.60 %;
•subject to certain conditions, the right to reduce depreciation expense up to $1.25 billion (reserve), provided that in any year of the 2016 rate
agreement FPL  was required to amortize enough reserve to maintain an earned regulatory ROE within the range of 9.60% to 11.60 %; and
•an interim cost recovery mechanism for storm restoration costs. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery below .
Electric Plant, Depreciation and Amortization  – The cost of additions to units of property of FPL and NEER is added to electric plant in service and
other property . In accordance with regulatory accounting, the cost of FPL's units of utility prope rty retired, less estimated net salvage value, is
charged to accumulated  depreciation. Maintenance and repairs of property as well as replacements and renewals of items determined to be less
than units of utility property are charged to other operations and maintenance (O&M) expenses. The American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of
2009, as amended, provided for an option to
71
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
elect a cash grant (convertible investment tax credits (ITCs)) for certain renewable energy property (renewable property). Convertible ITCs are
recorded as a reduction in property , plant and equipment on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets and are amortized as a reduction to
depreciation and amortization expense over the estimated life of the related property . At December 31, 2021 and 2020, convertible ITCs, net of
amortization, were approximately $ 755 million ($ 116 million at FPL) and $ 791 million ($ 122 million at FPL).
Depreciation of FPL's electric property is provided on a straight-line basis, primarily over its average remaining useful life. FPL includes in
depreciation expense a provision for electric generation plant dismantlement, interim asset removal costs, accretion related to asset retirement
obligations (see Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal Costs below) and storm
recovery amortization. For substantially all of FPL's property , depreciation studies are performed periodically and filed with the FPSC which result
in updated depreciation rates. As part of the 2021 rate agreement, the FPSC approved new unified depreciation rates which became effective
January 1, 2022. These  new rates are expected to decrease depreciation expense.  Reserve amortization is recorded as either an increase or
decrease to accrued asset removal costs which is reflected in noncurrent regulatory assets at December 31, 2021 and noncurrent regulatory
liabilities at December 31, 2020 on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. The FPL segment used available reserve amortization to offset
all of the storm restoration costs that were expensed during 2019 through 2021. See Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery
below . FPL files a twelv e-month forecast with the FPSC each year which contains a regulatory  ROE intended to be earned based on the best
information FPL has at that time assuming norm al weather . This forecast establishes a targeted regulatory ROE. In order to earn the targeted
regulatory ROE in each reporting period subject to the conditions of the effective rate agreem ent, reserve amortization is calculated using a
trailing thirte en-month average of retail rate base and capital structure in conjunction with the trailing twelve months regulatory retail base net
operating income, which primarily includes the retail base portion of base and other revenues, net of O&M, depreciation and amortization, interest
and tax expe nses. In general, the net impact of these income statement line items is adjusted, in part, by reserve amortization or its reversal to
earn the targeted regulatory ROE. See Rate Regulation – Base Rates Ef fective January 2022 through December 2025 above.
NEER's electric plant in service and other prope rty less salvage value, if any, are depreciated primarily using the straight-line method over their
estimated useful lives. NEER reviews the estimated useful lives of its fixed assets on an ongoing basis. NEER's oil and gas production assets are
accounted for under the successful efforts method. Depletion expenses for the acquisition of reserve rights and development costs are
recognized using the unit of production method.
Nuclear Fuel – FPL and NEER have several contracts for the supply of uranium and the conversion, enrichm ent and fabrication of nuclear fuel.
See Note 15 – Contracts. FPL's and NEER's nuclear fuel costs are charged to fuel expense on a unit of production method.
Construction Activity  – Allowance for funds used during construction (AFUDC) is a noncash item which represents  the allowed cost of capital,
including an ROE, used to finance construction projects. FPL records the portion of AFUDC attributable to borrowed funds as a reduction of
interest expense and the remainder as other income. FPSC rules limit the recording of AFUDC to projects that have an estimated cost in excess
of 0.5% prior to 2021 and 0.4% beginning  in 2021 of a utility's plant in service  balance and require more than one year to complete. FPSC rules
allow construction projects below the applicable threshold as a component of rate base.
FPL's const ruction work  in progress includes construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, engineering costs,
AFUDC and other costs directly associated with the construction of various projects. Upon completion of the projects, these costs are transferred
to electric utility plant in service and other property . Capitalized costs associated with construction activities are charged to O&M expenses when
recoverability is no longer probable.
NEER capitalizes project development costs once it is probable that such costs will be realized through the ultimate construction of the related
asset or sale of develop ment rights. At Decembe r 31, 2021 and 2020, NEER's capitalized development costs totaled approximately $831 million
and $571 million, respectively , which are included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. These costs include land
rights and other third-pa rty costs directly associ ated with the development of a new project. Upon commencement of construction, these costs
either are transferred to construction work in progress or remain in other assets, depending upon  the nature of the cost. Capitalized development
costs are charged to O&M expenses when it is probable that these costs will not be realized.
NEER's construction work in progress includes construction materials, progress payments on major equipment contracts, third-party engineering
costs, capitalized interest and other costs directly associated with the construction and development of various projects. Interest expense
allocated from NextEra Energy Capital Holdings , Inc. (NEECH) to NEER is based on a deeme d capital structure of 70% debt and differential
membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries. Upon commencement of project operation, costs associated with
construction work in progress are transferred to electric plant in service and other property . In 2019, NEER determined it was no longer moving
forward with the construction of a 220 MW wind facility due to unresolved permitting issues. NEE recorded charges of approximately $72 million
($54 million after tax), which are included in taxes other than income taxes and other – net in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the
year ended December 31, 2019, primarily related to the write-of f of capitalized construction costs .
72
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Asset Retirement Obligations  – NEE and FPL each  account for asset retirement obligations and conditional asset retirement obligations
(collectively , AROs) under accounting guidance that requires a liability for the fair value of an ARO to be recognized in the period in which it is
incurred if it can be reasonably estimated, with the offsetting associated asset retirement costs capitalized as part of the carrying amount of the
long-lived assets. NEE's AROs relate primarily to decommissioning obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the
dismantlement of certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. See Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other
Accrued Asset Removal Costs below and Note 11.
For NEE's rate-regulated  operations, including FPL, the asset retirement cost is subsequently allocated to a regulatory liability or regulatory asset
using a systematic and rational method over the asset's estimated useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the passage of time are
recognized as an increase in the carrying amount of the ARO and a decrease in the regulator y liability or regulatory asset. Changes resulting
from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows are recognized as an increase or a decrease in the ARO and asset
retirement cost, or regulatory liability when asset retirement cost is depleted.
For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, the asset retirement cost is subsequently allocated to expense using a systematic and rational method
over the asset's estimat ed useful life. Changes in the ARO resulting from the passage of time are recognized as an increase in the carrying
amount of the liability and as accretion expense,  which is included in depreciation and amortization expense in NEE's consolidated statements of
income. Changes resulting from revisions to the timing or amount of the original estimate of cash flows are recognized as an increase or a
decrease in the asset retirement cost, or income when asset retirement cost is depleted.
Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Remova l Costs  – For ratem aking purposes, FPL accrues
for the cost of end of life retirement and disposa l of its nuclear and other generation plants over the expected service life of each unit based on
nuclear decommissioning and other generation dismantlement studies periodically filed with the FPSC. In addition, FPL accrues for interim
removal costs over the life of the related assets based on depreciation studies approved by the FPSC. As approved by the FPSC, FPL previously
suspended its annual decommissioning accrual. Any differences between expense recognized for financial reporting purposes and the amount
recovered through rates are reported as a regulatory asset or liability in accordance with regul atory accounting. See Rate Regulation, Electric
Plant, Depreciation and Amortization, and Asset Retirement Obligations above and Note 11.
Nuclear decommissioning studies are performed at least every five years and are filed with the FPSC for approval. FPL filed updated nuclear
decommissioning studie s with the FPSC in December 2020. These studies reflect, among other things, the expiration dates of the operating
licenses for FPL's nucle ar units at the time of the studies. The 2020 studies provide for the dismantlement of Turkey Point Units Nos. 3 and 4
following the end of plant operation with decom missioning activities commencing in 2052 and 2053, respectively , and provide for St. Lucie Unit
No. 1 to be mothballed beginning in 2036 with decommissioning activities to be integrated with the dismantlement of St. Lucie Unit No. 2 in 2043.
These studies also assume that FPL will be storing spent fuel on site pending removal to a United States (U.S.) government facility . FPL's portion
of the ultima te costs of decommissioning its four nucle ar units, including costs associated with spent fuel storage above what is expected to be
refunded by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is estimated to be approximately $10.2 billion, or
$2.4 billion expressed in 2021 dollars. The ultimate costs of decommissioning reflect the applicatio n submitted to the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory
Commission (NRC) for the extension of St. Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 licenses for an additional 20 years.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expenditures to decommission FPL's nuclear units are included in nuclear decommissioning reserve
funds, which are included in special use funds on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Marketable securities held in the
decommissioning funds are primarily carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund earnings, consisting of dividends, interest and realized gains and
losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as well as any changes in unrealized gains and losses and estimated credit
losses on debt securitie s, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a corresponding offset in the related regulatory asset or liability
accounts. FPL does not currently make contributions to the decommissioning funds, other than the reinvestment of fund earnings. During 2021,
2020 and 2019 fund earnings on decommissioning funds were approximately $173 million, $132 million and $125 million, respectively . The tax
effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are included in deferred income taxes.
Other generation plant dismantlement studies are performed periodically and are submitted to the FPSC for approval. Previously approved
studies were effective from January 1, 2017 through December 2021 and resulted in an annu al expense of $26 millio n which is recorded in
depreciation and amortization expense in NEE's  and FPL's consolidated statements of income. As part of the 2021 rate agreement, the FPSC
approved a new annual  expense of $48 millio n based on FPL's updated dismantlement studies which became effective January 1, 2022. At
December 31, 2021, FPL's portion of the ultim ate cost to dismantle its other generation units is approximately $2.5 billion , or $1.2 billion
expressed in 2021 dollars.
NEER's AROs primarily include nuclear decom missioning liabilities for Seabrook Station (Seabrook), Duane Arnold Energy Center (Duane
Arnold) and Point Beach Nuclear Power Plant (Point Beach) and dismantlement liabilities for its wind and solar
73
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
facilities. The liabilities are being accreted using the interest method through the date decommis sioning or dismantlement activities are expected
to be comple te. See Note 11. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEER's ARO was approximate ly $1.1 billion and $1.2 billion, respectively , and
was primarily determined using various internal and external data and applying a probability percentage to a variety of scenarios regarding the life
of the plant and timing of decommissioning or dismantlement. NEER's portion of the ultimate cost of decommissioning its nuclear plants, including
costs associated with spent fuel storage above what is expected to be refunded by the DOE under a spent fuel settlement agreement, is
estimated to be approx imately $9.4 billion , or $2.1 billion  expressed in 2021 dollars. The ultimate cost to dismantle NEER's wind and solar
facilities is estimated to be approximately $ 2.0 billion.
Seabrook files a compr ehensive nuclear decommissioning study with the New Hampshire Nuclear Decommissioning Financing Committee
(NDFC) every four years ; the most recent study was filed in 2019. Seabrook's decommissioning funding plan is also subject to annual review by
the NDFC. Currently , there are no ongoing decommissioning funding requirements for Seabroo k, Duane Arnold and Point Beach, however , the
NRC, and in the case of Seabrook, the NDFC, has the authority to require additional funding in the future. NEER's portion of Seabrook's, Duane
Arnold's and Point Beach's restricted funds for the payment of future expenditures to decommission these plants is included in nuclear
decommissioning reserve funds, which are includ ed in special use funds on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Marketable securities held in the
decommissioning funds are primarily carried at fair value. See Note 4. Market adjustments  for debt securities result in a corresponding
adjustment to other comprehensive income (OCI), except for estimated credit losses and unrealized losses on debt securities intended or
required to be sold prior to recovery of the amort ized cost basis, which are recognized in other – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Market adjustments for equity securities are recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses ) on equity securities held in NEER's nuclear
decommissioning funds – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Fund earnings, consisting of dividends, interest and realized gains
and losses are recognize d in income and are reinvested in the funds. The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are included
in deferred income taxes.
Major Maintenance Costs  – FPL expenses costs associated with planned maintenance for its non-nuclear electric genera tion plants as incurred.
FPL recognizes costs associated with planned major nuclear maintenance in accordance with regulatory treatment. FPL defers nuclear
maintenance costs for each nuclear unit’s planned outage to a regulatory asset as the costs are incurred. FPL amortizes the costs to O&M
expense using the straight-line method over the period from the end of the current outage to the next planned outage where the respective work
scope is performed. 
NEER uses the deferra l method to account for certain planned major maintenance costs. NEER's major maintenance costs for its nuclear
generation units and combustion turbines are capitalized (included in noncurrent other asse ts on NEE's consolidated balance sheets) and
amortized to O&M expense using the straight-line method over the period from the end of the current outage to the next planned outage where
the respective work scope is performed.
Cash Equivalents  – Cash equivalents consist of short-term, highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less.
Restricted Cash – At Decem ber 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE had approximately $677 million ($53 million for FPL) and $441 million ($135 million for
FPL), respectively , of restricted cash, of which approximately $677 millio n ($53 millio n for FPL) and $374 millio n ($93 millio n for FPL),
respectively , are included in current other assets and the remaining balances are included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets. Restricted cash is primarily related to debt service payments and margin cash collateral requirements at NEER and
bond procee ds held for construction at FPL. In addition, where offsetting positions exist, restricted cash related to margin cash collateral of $121
million is netted against derivative assets and $172 million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31, 2021 and $183 million is netted
against derivative assets and $ 136 million is netted against derivative liabilities at December 31, 2020. See Note 3.
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments  – Effective January 1, 2020, NEE and FPL adopted an accounting standards update that
provides for a new methodology , the current expected credit loss (CECL) model, to account for credit losses for certain financial assets measured
at amortized cost. On January 1, 2020, NEE recorded a reduction to retained earnings of approximately $11 million representing the cumulative
effect of adopting the new standards update, which primarily related to the impact of applying the CECL  model to NEER's receivables. The impact
of adopting the new standards update was not material to FPL. See also Note 4 – Special Use Funds.
Allowance for Doubtful Accounts and Bad Debt  – FPL maintains an accumulated provision for uncollectible customer accounts receivable that is
estimated using a percentage, derived from historical revenue and write-of f trends, of the previous four months of revenue, and includes
estimates of credit and other losses based on both current events and forecasts. NEER regularly reviews collectibility of its receivables and
establishes a provision for losses estimated as a percentage of accounts receivable based on the historical bad debt write-of f trends for its retail
electricity provider operations, as well as includes estimates for credit and other losses base d on both current events and forecasts. When
necessary , NEER uses the specific identification method for all other receivables.
74
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Credit Losses – NEE's credit department monitors current and forward credit exposure to counterparties and their affiliates. Prospective and
existing customers are reviewed for creditworthi ness based on established standards and credit quality indicators. Credit quality indicators and
standards that are close ly monitored include credit ratings, certain financial ratios and delinquenc y trends which are based off the latest available
information. Customers not meeting minimum standards provide various credit enhancements or secured payment terms, such as letters of
credit, the posting of margin cash collateral or use of master netting arrangements.
For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, NEE recorded approximately $146 million, $94 million and $32 million of bad debt
expense, including credi t losses, respectively , which are included in O&M expenses in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income. The amount for
the year ended Decemb er 31, 2021 primarily relates to credit losses at NEER driven by the operational and energy market impacts of severe
prolonged winter weather in Texas in February 2021 (February 2021 weather event). The estimate for credit losses related to the impacts of the
February 2021 weather event was developed based on NEE’ s assessment of the ultimate collectability of these receivables. At December 31,
2021, appro ximately $127 millio n of allowances are included in noncurre nt other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheet related to the
February 2021 weather event.
Inventory  – FPL values materials, supplies and fuel inventory using a weighted-average cost method . NEER's materials, supplies and fuel
inventories, which include emissions allowance s and renewable energy credits, are carried at the lower of weighted-average cost and net
realizable value, unless evidence indicates that the weighted-average cost will be recovered with a normal profit upon sale in the ordinary course
of business.
Energy Trading  – NEE provides full energy and capacity requirements services primarily to distribution utilities, which include load-following
services and various ancillary services, in certain  markets and engages in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to optimize the value of
electricity and fuel contr acts, generation facilities and gas infrastructure assets, as well as to take advantage of projected favorable commodity
price movements. Trading contracts that meet the definition of a derivative are accounted for at fair value and realized gains and losses from all
trading contracts, including those where physical delivery is required, are recorded net for all periods presented. See Note 3.
Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost Recovery  – The storm and prope rty insurance reserve funds (storm funds) provide coverage
toward FPL's storm damage costs. Marketable securities held in the storm funds are carried at fair value. See Note 4. Fund earnings, consisting
of dividends, interest and realized gains and losses, net of taxes, are reinvested in the funds. Fund earnings, as well as any changes in
unrealized gains and losses, are not recognized in income and are reflected as a corresponding  adjustment to the storm and property insurance
reserves (storm reserves ). The tax effects of amounts not yet recognized for tax purposes are included in deferred income taxes. The storm funds
are included in special use funds and the storm reserves in noncurrent regulatory liabilities, or in the case of a deficit, in regulatory assets on
NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
During 2021 , 2020 and 2019, FPL’s service area was impacted by hurricanes and tropical storm s, which resulted in the recording ofincremental
storm restoration costs. The FPL segment deter mined that it would not seek recovery of certain of such costs through a storm surcharge from
customers and instead recorded such costs as storm restoration costs in NEE's and FPL’s conso lidated statements of income. The FPL segment
used available reserve amortization to of fset all such storm restoration costs that were expensed.
Restoration costs associated with multiple storm s since 2018 that impacted FPL's customers in the former Gulf Power service area are being
collected from northwest Florida customers through a storm damage surcharge through late 2024 and are recorded as regulatory assets. As of
December 31, 2021, the balance was $242 million, of which $92 million and $150 million are included in current regulatory assets and noncurrent
regulatory assets, respectively , on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. As of December 31, 2020, the balance was $347 million, of
which $100 million and $247 million are included in current regulatory assets and noncurrent regulatory assets, respectively , on NEE's and FPL's
consolidated balance sheets.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets  – NEE evaluates long-lived assets for impairment  when events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount may not be recoverable. The impairment loss to be recognized is the amount by which the carrying value of the long-lived  asset
exceeds the asset's fair value. In most instance s, the fair value is determined by discounting estimated future cash flows using an appropriate
interest rate.
Impairment of Equity Method Investments  – NEE evaluates its equity method investments for impairment when events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the fair value of the investment is less than the carrying value and the investment may be other-than-temporarily
impaired. An impairment loss is required to be recognized if the impairment is deemed to be other than temporary . Investments that are other-
than-temporarily impaired are written down to their estimated fair value and cannot subsequently be written back up for increases in estimated
fair value. Impairment losses are recorded in equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investe es in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income.
See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair V alue Measurements. 
75
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets  – NEE's goodwill and other intangible assets are as follows:
Weighted-
Average
Useful LivesDecember 31,
2021 2020
(years) (millions)
Goodwill (by reporting unit):
FPL segment:
Florida City Gas $ 292 $ 292 
Other 9 9 
Gulf Power (see Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company) 2,688 2,688 
NEER segment:
Rate-regulated transmission (see Note 6 – GridLiance) 1,206 614 
Gas infrastructure 487 487 
Customer supply and trading 95 93 
Generation assets 56 60 
Corporate and Other 11 11 
Total goodwill $ 4,844 $ 4,254 
Other intangible assets not subject to amortization, primarily land easements $ 136 $ 135 
Other intangible assets subject to amortization:
Purchased power agreements 15 $ 507 $ 453 
Other, primarily transportation contracts and customer lists 23 187 166 
Total 694 619 
Accumulated amortization (88) (61)
Total other intangible assets subject to amortization – net $ 606 $ 558 
NEE's, including FPL's, goodwill relates to various acquisitions which were accounted for using the purchase method of accounting. Other
intangible assets are primarily included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balan ce sheets. NEE's other intangible assets subject
to amortization are amortized, primarily on a straight-line basis, over their estimated useful lives. Amortization expense was approximately $25
million, $27 million and $18 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , and is expected  to be approximately
$16 million, $16 million , $18 million, $ 16 million and $ 16 million for 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2026, respectively .
Goodwill and other intan gible assets not subject to amortization are assessed for impairment at least annually by applying a fair value-based
analysis. Other intangible assets subject to amortization are periodically reviewed when impairment indicators are present to assess
recoverability from future operations using undiscounted future cash flows.
Pension Plan – NEE records the service cost component of net periodic benefit income to O&M expense and the non-service cost component to
other net periodic benef it income in NEE's consolidated statements of income. NEE allocates  net periodic pension income to its subsidiaries
based on the pensionab le earnings of the subsidiaries' employees. Accounting guidance require s recognition of the funded status of the pension
plan in the balance shee t, with changes in the funded status recognized in other comprehensive income within shareholders' equity in the year in
which the changes occur . Since NEE is the plan sponsor , and its subsidiaries do not have separate rights to the plan assets or direct obligations
to their employees, this accounting guidance is reflected at NEE and not allocated to the subsidiaries. The portion of previously unrecognized
actuarial gains and losses and prior service costs or credits that are estimated to be allocable to FPL as net periodic (income) cost in future
periods and that otherwise would be recorded  in accumulated other comprehensive income (AOCI) are classified as regulatory assets and
liabilities at NEE in accordance with regulatory treatment.
Stock-Based Compensation  – NEE accounts for stock-based payment transactions based on grant-date fair value. Compensation costs for
awards with graded vesting are recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period for the entire award. Forfeitures of stock-
based awards are recognized as they occur . See Note 14 – Stock-Based Compensation.
Retirement of Long-T erm Debt  – For NEE's rate-regulated subsidiaries, including FPL, gains and losses that result from differences in
reacquisition cost and the net book value of long-term debt which is retired are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability and amortized to interest
expense ratably over the remaining life of the original issue, which is consistent with their treatment in the ratemaking process. NEE's non-rate
regulated subsidiaries recognize such dif ferences in interest expense at the time of retirement.
Reference Rate Reform  – In March  2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued an accounting standards  update which provides
certain options to apply accounting guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting as companies
76
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
transition from the Lond on Inter-Bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) and other interbank offered rates to alternative reference rates. NEE’ s and FPL’s
contracts that reference LIBOR or other interbank offered rates mainly relate to debt and derivative instruments. The standards update was
effective upon issuance but can be applied prospectively through December 31, 2022. During the fourth quarter of 2021, NEE began utilizing
options provided by the standards update with regard to modifications to debt and debt-rela ted hedging instruments. NEE will continue to
evaluate reference rate modifications to debt and derivative instruments through December 31, 2022 and continue to apply the standards update
if eligible. Although the full impact is unknown, to date there has not been a material impact to NEE.
Income Taxes  – Deferred income taxes are recognized on all significant temporary differences between the financial statement and tax bases of
assets and liabilities, and are presented as noncurrent on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. In connection with the tax sharing
agreement between NEE and certain of its subsidiaries, the income tax provision at each applicable subsidiary reflects the use of the "separate
return method," except that tax benefits that could not be used on a separate return basis, but are used on the consolidated tax return, are
recorded by the applicab le subsidiary that gener ated the tax benefits. Any remaining consolidated income tax benefits or expenses are recorded
at the corpo rate level. Included in other regulato ry assets and other regulatory liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets is the
revenue equivalent of the difference in deferred income taxes computed under accounting rules, as compared to regulatory accounting rules. The
net regulatory liability totaled $3,780  million ($3,723  million for FPL) and $3,949  million ($3,890  million for FPL) at Dece mber 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively , and is being amortized in accordan ce with the regulatory treatment over the estimated lives of the assets or liabilities for which the
deferred tax amount was initially recognized.
Production tax credits (PTCs) are recognized as wind energy is generated and sold based on a per kWh rate prescribed in applicable federal and
state statutes and are recorded as a reduction of current income taxes payable, unless limited by tax law in which instance they are recorded as
deferred tax assets. NEER recognizes ITCs as a reduction to income tax expense when the related energy property is placed into service. FPL
recognizes ITCs as a reduction to income tax expense over the depreciable life of the related energy property . At December 31, 2021 and 2020,
FPL’s accum ulated deferred ITCs were approximately $1,054  millio n and $753 millio n, respectively , and are included in noncurrent regulatory
liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
A valuation allowance is recorded to reduce the carrying amounts of deferred tax assets when it is more likely than not that such assets will not
be realized. NEE recogn izes interest income (expense) related to unrecognized tax benefits (liabilities) in interest income and interest expense,
respectively , net of the amount deferred at FPL. At FPL, the offset to accrued interest receivable (payable) on income taxes is classified as a
regulatory liability (regul atory asset) which will be amortized to income (expense) over a five-year  period upon settlement in accordance with
regulatory treatment. All tax positions taken by NEE in its income tax returns that are recognized  in the financial statements must satisfy a more-
likely-than-not threshold.  NEE and its subsidiaries file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various states, the most significant of
which is Florida, and certain foreign jurisdictions. Federal tax liabilities, with the exception of certain refund claims, are effectively settled for all
years prior to 2017. State and foreign tax liabilities, which have varied statutes of limitations regarding additional assessments, are generally
effectively settled for years prior to 2017. At December 31, 2021, NEE had unrecognized tax benefits of approximately $125 millio n that, if
recognized, could impact the annual effective income tax rate. The amounts of unrecognized  tax benefits and related interest accruals may
change within the next 12 months; however , NEE and FPL do not expect these changes to have  a significant impact on NEE’ s or FPL’s financial
statements. See Note 5.
Sales of Differential Membership Interests  – Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold Class B membership interests in entities that
have ownership interests in wind and solar generation facilities, with generating capacity totaling approximately 11,226  MW and 1,894  MW,
respectively , and battery storage capacity in operation or under construction totaling 220 MW at Dece mber 31, 2021 , to third-par ty investors.  NEE
retains a controlling interest in the entities and therefore presents the Class B member interests as noncontrolling interests. Noncontrolling
interests represents the portion of net assets in consolidated entities that are not owned by NEE and are reported as a component of equity in
NEE’ s consolidated balance sheet. The third-party investors are allocated earnings, tax attributes and cash flows in accordance with the
respective limited liability company agreements. Those economics are allocated primarily to the third-party investors until they receive a targeted
return (the flip date) and thereafter to NEE. NEE has the right to call the third-party interests at specified amounts if and when the flip date occurs.
NEE has determined the allocation of economics  between the controlling party and third-party investor should not follow the respective ownership
percentages for each wind and solar project but rather the hypothetical liquidation of book value (HLBV) method based on the governing
provisions in each respective limited liability company agreement. Under the HLBV method, the amounts of income and loss attributable to the
noncontrolling interest reflects changes in the amount the owners would hypothetically receive at each balance sheet date under the respective
liquidation provisions, assuming the net assets of these entities were liquidated at the recorded amounts, after taking into account any capital
transactions, such as contributions and distributions, between the entities and the owners. At the point in time that the third-party investor , in
hypothetical liquidation, would achieve its targeted return, NEE attributes the additional hypothetical proceeds to the Class B membership
interests based on the call price. A loss attributable to noncontrolling interest on NEE’ s consolidated statements of income represents earnings
attributable to NEE.
77
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Redeemable Noncontrolling Interests  – Certain subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources sold Class B membership interests in entities that
have ownership interests in wind generation as well as solar and solar plus battery storage facilities to third-party investors. As specified in the
respective limited liability company agreements, if, subject to certain contingencies, certain events occur , including, among others, those that
would delay completion or cancel any of the underlying projects, an investor has the option to require NEER to return all or part of its investment.
As these potential redemptions were outside of NEER’ s control, these balances were classified as redeemable noncontrolling interests on NEE's
consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2021. These contingencies are expected to be resolved in 2022.
Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)  – An entity is considered to be a VIE when its total equity investment at risk is not sufficient to permit the entity to
finance its activities without additional subordinated financial support, or its equity investors, as a group, lack the characteristics of having a
controlling financial interest. A reporting company is required to consolidate a VIE as its primary beneficiary when it has both the power to direct
the activities of the VIE that most significantly impact the VIE's economic performance, and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive
benefits from the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. NEE and FPL evaluate whether an entity is a VIE whenever reconsideration
events as defined by the accounting guidance occur . See Note 9.
Leases  – NEE and FPL determine if an arrangement is a lease at inception. NEE and FPL recognize a right-of-use (ROU) asset and a lease
liability for operating and finance leases by recognizing and measuring leases at the commence ment date based on the present value of lease
payments over the lease term. For sales-type leases, the book value of the leased asset is remov ed from the balance sheet and a net investment
in sales-type  lease is recognized based on fixed payments under the contract and the residual value of the asset being leased. NEE and FPL
have elected not to apply the recognition requir ements to short-term leases and not to separate nonlease components from associated lease
components for all classes of underlying assets except for purchased power agreements. ROU assets are includ ed in noncurrent other assets,
lease liabilities are included in current and noncurrent other liabilities and net investments in sales-type leases are included in current and
noncurrent other assets on NEE’ s and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Operating lease expense is included in fuel, purchased power and
interchange or O&M expenses, interest and amortization expenses associated with finance  leases are included in interest expense and
depreciation and amortization expense, respectively , and rental income associated with operating leases and interest income associated with
sales-type leases are included in operating revenues in NEE’ s and FPL ’s consolidated statements of income. See Note 10.
Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests – In Decemb er 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources
sold their 100% ownersh ip interest, comprised of a 50% controlling ownership interest to a NEP subsi diary and a 50% noncontrolling ownership
interest to a third party , in a portfolio of seven  wind generation facilitie s and six solar generation facilitie s in geographically diverse locations
throughout the U.S. representing a total generat ing capacity of 2,520  MW and 115 MW of batte ry storage capacity , three of which are currently
under const ruction with expected in-service dates in the first half of 2022. Total cash proceeds for these two separate transactions totaled
approximately $1.7 billion, subject to working capital and other adjustments. NEER will continue to consolidate the three projects currently under
construction for accounting purposes. A NextE ra Energy Resources affiliate will continue to operate the facilities included in the sales. In
connection with the sales, a loss of approximately $53 million ($33 million after tax) is reflected in the gains on disposal of businesses/assets –
net in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2021. In connection with the three facilities currently under
construction, approxima tely $668 million of cash received was recorded as contract liabilities, which is included in current other liabilities on
NEE’ s conso lidated balance sheet. The contract  liabilities relate to sale proceeds from NEP and the third party of approximately $349 million and
differential membership interests of approximately $319 million, of which $117 million is contingent on the enactment of a solar PTC by a
specified date in 2022. The contract liabilities associated with the sale proceeds and the differen tial membership interests are also subject to the
three facilities under construction achieving commercial operations by specified dates in the first half of 2022. The contract liabilities will be
reversed and the sale recognized for accounting purposes if the contingencies are resolved in 2022. Otherwise, NextEra Energy Resources may
be required to return proceeds related to differential membership interests and/or repurchase the facilities for up to $668 millio n. In addition,
NextEra Energy Resou rces is responsible to pay for all construction costs related to the portfolio. At December 31, 2021, approximately
$970 million is included in accounts payable on NEE's consolidated balance sheet and represents amounts owed by NextEra Energy Resources
to NEP  to reimburse NEP  for construction costs.
In October 2021, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale to a NEP subs idiary of their 100% ownership interests in three
wind genera tion facilities and one solar generation facility located in the West and Midwest regions of the U.S. with a total genera ting capacity of
467 MW and 33.3% of the noncontrolling ownership interests in four solar generation facilities and multiple distribute d generation solar facilities
located in geographicall y diverse locations throughout the U.S. representing a total net ownership interest in plant capacity (net generating
capacity) of 122 MW for cash proceeds  of approximately $563 millio n, plus working capital and other adjustments of $22 millio n. A NextEra
Energy Resources affiliate will continue to operate the facilities included in the sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately
$94 million ($69 million after tax) was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for the year ende d December 31, 2021, which is
included in gains on disposal of businesses/assets, and noncontrolling interests of approximate ly $125 million and additional paid-in capital of
approximately $ 60 million ($ 43 million after tax) were recorded on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2021.
78
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
In Decembe r 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources sold a 90% noncontro lling ownership interest, comprised of a 50% ownership
interest to a third party and a 40% ownership interest to a NEP subsidiary , in a portfolio of three  wind generation facilities and four solar
generation facilities in geographically diverse locations throughout the U.S. representing a total net generating capacity of 900 MW. In addition, in
December 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resources also sold its 100% ownership  interest in a 100 MW solar generation facility and a 30
MW battery storage facility (solar-plus-storage facility) under construction in Arizona to a NEP subsidiary . Total cash proceeds for these two
separate transactions totaled approximately $656 million. NEER continu ed to consolidate the projects until the sale was recognized for
accounting purposes, see Note 9 – NEER. A NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will continue to operate the facilities included in the sale. In
connection with the 90% sale, noncontrolling interests of approximately $689 million and a reduction to additional paid-in capital of approximately
$188 million ($165 million after tax) were recorded on NEE's cons olidated balance sheet at December 31, 2020. In connection with the solar-
plus-storage facility transaction, approximately $155 million of cash received was recorded as a contract liability , which is included in current other
liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2020. The solar-plus-storage facility achieved commercial operations in June
2021 and the contract liability was reversed and the sale was recognized for accounting purposes.
In 2020, a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Resour ces completed the sale of its ownership interest in two solar generation facilitie s located in Spain
with a total generating capacity of 99.8 MW, which resulted in net cash proceeds of approximately €111 million (approximately $121 million). In
connection with the sale, a gain of approximately $270 million (pretax and after tax) was recorded in NEE's consolidated statements of income for
the year ended December 31, 2020 and is included in gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net.
In 2019, subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resources completed the sale of ownership interests in three  wind genera tion facilitie s and three  solar
generation facilities, including noncontrolling interests in two of the solar facilities, located in the Midwest and West regions of the U.S. with a total
net generating capacity of 611 MW to a NEP subsidia ry for cash proceeds of approximately $1.0 billion , plus working capital of $12 million. A
NextEra Energy Resources affiliate will continue  to operate the facilities included in the sale. In connection with the sale, a gain of approximately
$341 million ($259 million after tax) was recorded in NEE's consoli dated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2019, which is
included in gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net, and noncontrolling interests of appro ximately $118 million were recorded on NEE's
consolidated balance sheet.
2. Revenue from Contracts with Customers
Revenue is recognized when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to customers at an amount that reflects the consideration to
which the entity expects  to be entitled in exchange for those goods and services. The promised goods or services in the majority of NEE’ s
contracts with customers is, at FPL, for the delivery of electricity based on tariff rates approved by the FPSC and, at NEER, for the delivery of
energy commodities and the availability of electric capacity and electric transmission.
FPL and NEER generate  substantially all of NEE’ s operating revenues, which primarily include revenues from contracts with customers, as well
as derivative  and lease transactions at NEER. For the vast majority of contracts with customers, NEE believes that the obligation to deliver
energy , capacity or transmission is satisfied over time as the customer simultaneously receive s and consumes benefits as NEE performs. In
2021, 2020 and 2019, NEE’s revenue from contracts with customers was approximately $18.8 billion ($14.1 billion at FPL), $17.0 billion ($13.0
billion at FPL) and $17.5 billion ($13.6 billion at FPL), respectively . NEE's and FPL's receivables are primarily associated with revenues earned
from contracts with custo mers, as well as derivative and lease transactions at NEER, and consis t of both billed and unbilled amounts, which are
recorded in customer receivables and other receivables on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets. Receivables represent unconditional
rights to consideration and reflect the difference s in timing of revenue recognition and cash collections. For substantially all of NEE's and FPL's
receivables, regardless of the type of revenue transaction from which the receivable originated, customer and counterparty credit risk is managed
in the same manner and the terms and conditions of payment are similar . During 2021, NEER did not recognize approximately $180 million of
revenue related to reimb ursable expenses from a counterparty that are deemed not probable of collection. These reimbursable expenses arose
from the impacts of the February 2021 weat her event. These determinations were made based on assessments of the counterparty's
creditworthiness and NEER's ability to collect.
FPL – FPL’s revenues are derived primarily from tariff-based sales that result from providing electricity to retail customers in Florida with no
defined contractual term. Electricity sales to retail customers account for approximately 90% of FPL’s 2021 operating revenues, the majority of
which are to residential customers. FPL’s retail customers receive a bill monthly based on the amount of monthly kWh usage with payment due
monthly . For these types  of sales, FPL recognizes revenue as electricity is delivered and billed to customers, as well as an estimate for electricity
delivered and not yet billed. The billed and unbilled amounts represent the value of electricity delivered to the customer . At December 31, 2021
and 2020, FPL's unbilled revenues amounted to approximately $583 million and $454 million, respectively , and are included in customer
receivables on NEE’ s and FPL’s consolidated balance sheets. Certain contracts with customer s contain a fixed price which primarily relate to
certain power purchase  agreements with matu rity dates through 2041. As of December 31, 2021, FPL expects to record approximately
$400 million of revenues related to the fixed capacity price components of such contracts over the remaining terms of the related
79
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
contracts as the capacity is provided. These contracts also contain a variable price component for energy usage which FPL recognizes as
revenue as the energy is delivered based on rates stipulated in the respective contracts.
NEER  – NEER’ s revenue from contracts with customers is derived primarily from the sale of energy commodities, electric capacity and electric
transmission. For these types of sales, NEER recognizes revenue as energy commodities are delivered and as electric capacity and electric
transmission are made available, consistent with the amounts billed to customers based on rates stipulated in the respective contracts as well as
an accrual for amounts earned but not yet billed. The amounts billed and accrued represent the value of energy or transmission delivered and/or
the capacity of energy or transmission available to the customer . Revenues yet to be earned under these contracts, which have maturity dates
ranging from 2022 to 2053, will vary based on the volume of energy or transmission delivered and/or available. NEER’ s customers typically
receive bills monthly with payment due within 30 days. Certain contracts with customers contain a fixed price which primarily relate to electric
capacity sales associated with independent system operator annual auctions through 2025 and certain power purchase agreements with maturity
dates throug h 2034. As of December 31, 2021, NEER expects to record approximately $735 million of revenues related to the fixed price
components of such contracts over the remaining terms of the related contracts as the capacity is provided.
3. Derivative Instruments
NEE and FPL use deriv ative instruments (primarily swaps, options, futures and forwards) to manage the physical and financial risks inherent in
the purchase  and sale of fuel and electricity , as well as interest rate and foreign currency exchange rate risk associated primarily with outstanding
and expected future debt issuances and borrowings, and to optimize the value of NEER's powe r generation and gas infrastructure assets. NEE
and FPL  do not utilize hedge accounting for their cash flow and fair value hedges.
With respect  to commodities related to NEE's competitive energy business, NEER employs risk management procedures to conduct its activities
related to optimizing the value of its power generation and gas infrastructure assets, providing  full energy and capacity requirements services
primarily to distribution utilities, and engaging in power and fuel marketing and trading activities to take advantage of expected future favorable
price movements and changes in the expected volatility of prices in the energy markets. Thes e risk management activities involve the use of
derivative instruments executed within prescribed limits to manage the risk associated with fluctuating commodity prices. Transactions in
derivative instruments are executed on recognize d exchanges or via the over-the-counter (OTC) markets, depending on the most favorable credit
terms and market execution factors. For NEER's power generation and gas infrastructure assets, derivative instruments are used to hedge all or
a portion of the expected output of these assets. These hedges are designed to reduce the effect of adverse changes in the wholesale forward
commodity markets associated with NEER's power generation and gas infrastructure assets. With regard to full energy and capacity
requirements services, NEER is required to vary the quantity of energy and related services based on the load demands of the customers served.
For this type of transacti on, derivative instruments are used to hedge the anticipated electricity quantities required to serve these customers and
reduce the effect of unfavorable changes in the forward energy markets. Additionally , NEER  takes positions in energy markets based on
differences between actual forward market levels and management's view of fundamental market conditions, including supply/demand
imbalances, changes in traditional flows of energy , changes in short- and long-term weather patterns and anticipated regulatory and legislative
outcomes. NEER uses derivative instruments to realize value from these market dislocations, subject to strict risk management limits around
market, operational and credit exposure.
Derivative instruments, when required to be marked to market, are recorded on NEE's and FPL's  consolidated balance sheets as either an asset
or liability measured at fair value. At FPL, substantially all changes in the derivatives' fair value are deferred as a regulatory asset or liability until
the contracts are settled, and, upon settlement, any gains or losses are passed through the applicable fuel and purchased power cost recovery
clause (fuel clause). For NEE's non-rate regulated operations, predominantly NEER, essentially all changes in the derivatives' fair value for power
purchases and sales, fuel sales and trading activities are recognized on a net basis in operating revenues and the equity method investees'
related activity is recognized in equity in earning s of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Settlement gains and
losses are included within the line items in the consolidated statements of income to which they relate. Transactions for which physical delivery is
deemed not to have occurred are presented on a net basis in the consolidated statements of income. For commodity derivatives, NEE believes
that, where offsetting positions exist at the same location for the same time, the transactions are considered to have been netted and therefore
physical delivery has been deemed not to have occurred for financial reporting purposes. Settlements related to derivative instruments are
primarily recognized in net cash provided by operating activities in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of cash flows.
For interest rate and foreign currency derivative instruments, all changes in the derivatives' fair value, as well as the transaction gain or loss on
foreign denominated debt, are recognized in interest expense and the equity method investees' related activity is recognized in equity in earnings
(losses) of equity method investees in NEE's consolidated statements of income.  In addition, for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019,
NEE reclassified from AOCI approximately $26 millio n ($6 millio n after tax), of which $23 millio n was reclassified  to gains on disposal of
businesses/assets – net (see Note 1 – Dispos al of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests) with the balance to
interest expense, and $ 11 million ($ 8 million after tax) to
80
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
interest expense, respectively , because it beca me probable that related future transactions being hedged would not occur . At December 31,
2021, NEE's AOCI included amounts related to discontinued interest rate cash flow hedges with expiration dates through March 2035 and foreign
currency cash flow hedges with expiration dates through September 2030. Approximately $6 million of net losses included in AOCI at
December 31, 2021 are expected to be reclassi fied into earnings within the next 12 months as the principal and/or interest payments are made.
Such amounts assume no change in scheduled principal payments.
Fair Value Measurements of Derivative Instrume nts – The fair value of assets and liabilities are determined using either unadjusted quoted prices
in active markets (Level 1) or pricing inputs that are observable (Level 2) whenever that inform ation is available and using unobservable inputs
(Level 3) to estimate fair value only when relevant observable inputs are not available. NEE and FPL use several different valuation techniques to
measure the fair value of assets and liabilities, relying primarily on the market approach of using  prices and other market information for identical
and/or comp arable assets and liabilities for those assets and liabilities that are measured at fair value on a recurring basis. NEE's and FPL's
assessment of the signif icance of any particular input to the fair value measurement requires judgment and may affect placement within the fair
value hierarchy levels. Non-performance risk, including the consideration of a credit valuation adjustment, is also considered in the determination
of fair value for all assets and liabilities measured at fair value.
NEE and FPL measure the fair value of commodity contracts using a combination of market and income approaches utilizing prices observed on
commodities exchanges and in the OTC markets, or through the use of industry-standard valuation techniques, such as option modeling or
discounted cash flows techniques, incorporating both observable and unobservable valuation inputs. The resulting measurements are the best
estimate of fair value as represented by the transfer of the asset or liability through an orderly transaction in the marketplace at the measurement
date.
Most exchange-traded derivative assets and liabilities are valued directly using unadjusted quoted prices. For exchange-traded derivative assets
and liabilities where the principal market is deemed to be inactive based on average daily volumes and open interest, the measurement is
established using settlement prices from the exchanges, and therefore considered to be valued using other observable inputs.
NEE, through its subsidi aries, including FPL, also enters into OTC commodity contract derivative s. The majority of these contracts are transacted
at liquid trading points, and the prices for these contracts are verified using quoted prices in active markets from exchanges, brokers or pricing
services for similar contracts.
NEE, throug h NEER, also enters into full requirements contracts, which, in most cases, meet the definition of derivatives and are measured at fair
value. These contracts typically have one or more inputs that are not observable and are significant to the valuation of the contract. In addition,
certain exchange and non-exchange traded derivative options at NEE have one or more significa nt inputs that are not observable, and are valued
using industry-standard option models.
In all cases where NEE and FPL use significant unobservable inputs for the valuation of a commodity contract, consideration is given to the
assumptions that market participants would use in valuing the asset or liability . The primary input to the valuation models for commodity contracts
is the forward commodit y curve for the respective instruments. Other inputs include, but are not limited to, assumptions about market liquidity ,
volatility , correlation and contract duration as more fully described below in Significant Unob servable Inputs Used in Recurring Fair Value
Measurements. In instances where the referen ce markets are deemed to be inactive or do not have transactions for a similar contract, the
derivative assets and liabilities may be valued using significant other observable inputs and potentially significant unobservable inputs. In such
instances, the valuation for these contracts is established using techniques including extrapolati on from or interpolation between actively traded
contracts, or estimated basis adjustments from liquid trading points. NEE and FPL regularly evaluate and validate the inputs used to determine
fair value by a number of methods, consisting of various market price verification procedures, including the use of pricing services and multiple
broker quote s to support the market price of the various commodities. In all cases where there are assumptions and models used to generate
inputs for valuing derivative assets and liabilities, the review and verification of the assumptions, models and changes to the models are
undertaken by individuals that are independent of those responsible for estimating fair value.
NEE uses interest rate contracts and foreign currency contracts to mitigate and adjust interes t rate and foreign currency exchange exposure
related primarily to certain outstanding and expected future debt issuances and borrowings  when deemed appropriate based on market
conditions or when required by financing agreements. NEE estimates the fair value of these derivatives using an income approach based on a
discounted cash flows valuation technique utilizing the net amount of estimated future cash inflows and outflows related to the agreements .
The tables below present NEE's and FPL's gross derivative positions at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, as required by disclosure
rules. Howev er, the majority of the underlying contracts are subject to master netting agreements and generally would not be contractually settled
on a gross basis. Therefore, the tables below also present the derivative positions on a net basis, which reflect the offsetting of positions of
certain transactions within the portfolio, the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin
cash collateral, as well as the location of the net derivative position on the consolidated balance sheets.
81
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,896 $ 5,082 $ 1,401 $ (6,622)$ 1,757 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 106 $ — $ (30) 76 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 8 $ — $ (17) (9)
Total derivative assets $ 1,824 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 3 $ 13 $ (3)$ 13 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 2,571 $ 4,990 $ 1,231 $ (6,594)$ 2,198 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 739 $ — $ (30) 709 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 86 $ — $ (17) 69 
Total derivative liabilities $ 2,976 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 8 $ 5 $ (3)$ 10 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 689 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,135 
Total derivative assets $ 1,824 
Current derivative liabilities $ 1,263 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 1,713 
Total derivative liabilities $ 2,976 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 13 
Current other liabilities $ 9 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 10 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts. NEE and FPL also
have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the consolidated balance sheets and are
recorded in customer receivables – net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $150 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $56 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(d)Reflects the netting of approximately $6 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.
(e)Reflects the netting of approximately $172 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
82
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Netting Total
(millions)
Assets:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 919 $ 1,881 $ 1,679 $ (2,325)$ 2,154 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 81 $ — $ (41) 40 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 57 $ — $ (34) 23 
Total derivative assets $ 2,217 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ 1 $ 2 $ — $ 3 
Liabilities:
NEE:
Commodity contracts $ 1,004 $ 1,468 $ 305 $ (2,277)$ 500 
Interest rate contracts $ — $ 1,042 $ — $ (41) 1,001 
Foreign currency contracts $ — $ 43 $ — $ (34) 9 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,510 
FPL – commodity contracts $ — $ — $ 3 $ — $ 3 
Net fair value by NEE balance sheet line item:
Current derivative assets $ 570 
Noncurrent derivative assets 1,647 
Total derivative assets $ 2,217 
Current derivative liabilities $ 311 
Noncurrent derivative liabilities 1,199 
Total derivative liabilities $ 1,510 
Net fair value by FPL balance sheet line item:
Current other assets $ 3 
Current other liabilities $ 2 
Noncurrent other liabilities 1 
Total derivative liabilities $ 3 
______________________
(a)Includes the effect of the contractual ability to settle contracts under master netting arrangements and the netting of margin cash collateral payments and receipts. NEE and FPL also
have contract settlement receivable and payable balances that are subject to the master netting arrangements but are not offset within the consolidated balance sheets and are
recorded in customer receivables – net and accounts payable, respectively.
(b)Reflects the netting of approximately $184 million in margin cash collateral received from counterparties.
(c)Reflects the netting of approximately $136 million in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE had approximately $56 millio n and $6 millio n (none at FPL), respectively , in margin cash collat eral
received from counterparties that was not offset against derivative assets in the above presentat ion. These amounts are included in current other
liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheets. Additionally , at December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE had approximately $673 million and $315
million (none at FPL), respectively , in margin cash collateral paid to counterparties that was not offset against derivative assets or liabilities in the
above presentation. These amounts are included in current other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
Significant Unobservable Inputs Used in Recurri ng Fair Value Measurements  – The valua tion of certain commodity contracts requires the use of
significant unobservable inputs. All forward price, implied volatility , implied correlation and interest rate inputs used in the valuation of such
contracts are directly based on third-party market data, such as broker quotes and exchange settlements, when that data is available. If third-
party market data is not available, then industry standard methodologies are used to develop inputs that maximize the use of relevant observable
inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. Observable inputs, including some forward prices, implied volatilities and interest rates used
for determining fair value  are updated daily to reflect the best available market information. Unob servable inputs which are related to observable
inputs, such as illiquid portions of forward price or volatility curves, are updated daily as well, using industry standard techniques such as
interpolation and extrapolation, combining observable forward inputs supplemented by historical market and other relevant data. Other
unobservable inputs, such as implied correlations, block-to-hourly price shaping, customer migration rates from full requirements contracts and
some implied volatility curves, are modeled using proprietary models based on historical data and industry standard techniques.(a)
(b)
(c)
83
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The significant unobservable inputs used in the valuation of NEE's commodity contracts categorized as Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy at
December 31, 2021 are as follows:
Transaction TypeFair V alue at
December 31, 2021Valuation
Technique(s)Significant
Unobservable Inputs RangeWeighted-
average
Assets Liabilities
(millions)
Forward contracts – power $ 433 $ 204 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $(5)— $140 $37
Forward contracts – gas 191 31 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MMBtu ) $2 — $15 $3
Forward contracts – congestion 29 8 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $(10)— $45 $—
Options – power 52 (1)Option models Implied correlations 32% — 86% 52%
Implied volatilities 8% — 368% 81%
Options – primarily gas 356 347 Option models Implied correlations 32% — 86% 52%
Implied volatilities 17% — 295% 36%
Full requirements and unit
contingent contracts200 566 Discounted cash flow Forward price (per MWh ) $2 — $308 $64
Customer migration rate —% — 19% 2%
Forward contracts – other 140 76 
Total $ 1,401  $ 1,231  
______________________
(a)Unobservable inputs were weighted by volume.
(b)Megawatt-hours
(c)One million British thermal units
(d)Applies only to full requirements contracts.
The sensitivity of NEE's fair value measurements to increases (decreases) in the significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Significant Unobservable Input PositionImpact on
Fair Value Measurement
Forward price Purchase power/gas Increase (decrease)
Sell power/gas Decrease (increase)
Implied correlations Purchase option Decrease (increase)
Sell option Increase (decrease)
Implied volatilities Purchase option Increase (decrease)
Sell option Decrease (increase)
Customer migration rate Sell power Decrease (increase)
————————————
(a)Assumes the contract is in a gain position.(a)
(b)
(c)
(b)
(b)
(d)
(a)
84
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The reconciliation of changes in the fair value of derivatives that are based on significant unobservable inputs is as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019
NEE FPL NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at December 31 of
prior year $ 1,374 $ (1)$ 1,207 $ (8)$ 647 $ (36)
Realized and unrealized gains (losses):
Included in earnings (1,488) — 547 — 923 — 
Included in other comprehensive income (loss) — — 1 — 5 — 
Included in regulatory assets and liabilities 8 8 2 2 1 1 
Purchases 243 — 191 — 141 — 
Sales — — 114 — — — 
Settlements 259 1 (562) 6 (356) 25 
Issuances (196) — (123) — (87) — 
Transfers in 2 — 18 (1) (5) — 
Transfers out (32) — (21) — (62) 2 
Fair value of net derivatives based on significant unobservable inputs at December 31 $ 170 $ 8 $ 1,374 $ (1)$ 1,207 $ (8)
Gains (losses) included in earnings attributable to the change in unrealized gains (losses)
relating to derivatives held at the reporting date $ (924)$ — $ 317 $ — $ 611 $ — 
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, realized and unrealized gains (losses) of approximately $(1,488) million, $569 million and $956 million are included in the
consolidated statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
(b)Included in net unrealized gains (losses) on foreign currency translation in the consolidated statements of comprehensive income.
(c)See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
(d)Transfers into Level 3 were a result of decreased observability of market data. Transfers from Level 3 to Level 2 were a result of increased observability of market data.
(e)For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, unrealized gains (losses) of approximately $(924) million, $317 million and $638 million are included in the consolidated
statements of income in operating revenues and the balance is included in interest expense.
Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments  – Gains (losse s) related to NEE's derivatives are recorded in NEE's consolidated statements
of income as follows:
Years Ended December 31,
2021  2020  2019
(millions)
Commodity contracts – operating revenues $ (2,710)$ 352 $ 762 
Foreign currency contracts – interest expense (89) 8 (7)
Interest rate contracts – interest expense 264 (421) (699)
Losses reclassified from AOCI:
Interest rate contracts (7) (35) (32)
Foreign currency contracts – interest expense (3) (3) (4)
Total $ (2,545) $ (99) $ 20 
______________________
(a)For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, FPL recorded gains of approximately $7 million, $6 million and $9 million, respectively, related to commodity contracts as
regulatory liabilities on its consolidated balance sheets.
(b)For the year ended December 31, 2020, approximately $23 million was reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and
Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests); remaining balances were reclassified to interest expense on NEE's consolidated statements of income.
Notional Volumes of Derivative Instruments  – The following table represents net notional volumes associated with derivative instruments that are
required to be reported at fair value in NEE's and FPL's consolidated financial statements. The table includes significant volumes of transactions
that have minimal expos ure to commodity price changes because they are variably priced agree ments. These volumes are only an indication of
the commod ity exposure that is managed through the use of derivatives. They do not represe nt net physical asset positions or non-derivative
positions and the related hedges, nor do they represent NEE's and FPL's net economic exposure, but only the net notional derivative positions
that fully or partially hedge the related asset positions. NEE and FPL  had derivative commodity contracts for the following net notional volumes:(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(d)
(e)
(a)
(b)
85
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Commodity Type NEE FPL NEE FPL
(millions)
Power (103)MWh — (90)MWh — 
Natural gas (1,290)MMBtu 91 MMBtu (607)MMBtu 87 MMBtu
Oil (33)barrels — (6)barrels — 
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE had interest rate contracts with a notional amount of approximately $ 11.2 billion and a net notional amount
of approximately $ 10.5 billion, respectively , and foreign currency contracts with a notional amount of approximately $ 1.0 billion and $ 1.0 billion,
respectively .
Credit-Risk-Related Contingent Features  – Certain derivative instruments contain credit-risk-related contingent features including, among other
things, the requirement to maintain an investme nt grade credit rating from specified credit rating  agencies and certain financial ratios, as well as
credit-related cross-defa ult and material adverse change triggers. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the aggregate fair value of NEE's derivative
instruments with credit-risk-related contingent features that were in a liability position was approximately $4.1 billion ($12 million for FPL) and
$1.9 billion ($ 3 million for FPL), respectively .
If the credit-risk-related contingent features underlying these derivative agreements were triggered, certain subsidiaries of NEE, including FPL,
could be required to post collateral or settle contracts according to contractual terms which generally allow netting of contracts in offsetting
positions. Certain deriva tive contracts contain multiple types of credit-related triggers. To the extent these contracts contain a credit ratings
downgrade trigger , the maximum exposure is included in the following credit ratings collateral posting requirements. If FPL's and NEECH's credit
ratings were downgraded to BBB/Baa2 (a three level downgrade for FPL and a one level downgrade for NEECH from the current lowest
applicable rating), applic able NEE subsidiaries would be required to post collateral such that the total posted collateral would be approximately
$645 million (none  at FPL) and $80 million (none  at FPL) at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . If FPL's and NEECH's credit ratings were
downgraded to below investment grade, applicable NEE subsidiaries would be required to post additional collateral such that the total posted
collateral would be approximately $2.7 billion ($35 million at FPL) and $1.2 billion ($75 million at FPL) at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively . Some derivative contracts do not contain credit ratings downgrade triggers, but do contain provisions that require certain financial
measures be maintained and/or have credit-related cross-default triggers. In the event these provisions were triggered, applicable NEE
subsidiaries could be required to post additional collateral of up to approximately $1,040  million ($145 million at FPL) and $880 million ($75
million at FPL) at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Collateral related to derivatives may be posted in the form of cash or credit support in the normal course of business. At December 31, 2021 and
2020, applic able NEE subsidiaries have posted approximately $84 million (none  at FPL) and $2 million (none  at FPL), respectively , in cash and
$1,060  million (none  at FPL) and $66 million (none  at FPL), respectively , in the form of letters of credit each of which could be applied toward the
collateral requirements described above. FPL and NEECH have capacity under their credit  facilities generally in excess of the collateral
requirements described above that would be available to support, among other things, derivative activities. Under the terms of the credit facilities,
maintenance of a specif ic credit rating is not a condition to drawing on these credit facilities, although there are other conditions to drawing on
these credit facilities.
Additionally , some contracts contain certain adequate assurance provisions whereby a counterparty may demand additional collateral based on
subjective events and/or conditions. Due to the subjective nature of these provisions, NEE and FPL are unable to determine an exact value for
these items and they are not included in any of the quantitative disclosures above.
4. Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements
Non-derivative fair value measurements consist of NEE’ s and FPL’s cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents, special use funds and
other investments. The fair value of these financial assets is determined by using the valuation techniques and inputs as described in Note 3 –
Fair V alue Measurements of Derivative Instruments as well as below .
Cash Equiva lents  and Restrict ed Cash Equivalents – NEE and FPL hold investments in money market funds. The fair value of these funds is
estimated using a market approach based on current observable market prices.
Special Use Funds and Other Investments – NEE and FPL hold primarily debt and equity securities directly , as well as indirectly throu gh
commingled funds. Substantially all directly held equity securities are valued at their quoted market prices. For directly held debt securities,
multiple prices and price types are obtained from pricing vendors whenever possible, which enables cross-provider validations. A primary price
source is identified based on asset type, class or issue of each security . Commingled funds, which are similar to mutual funds, are maintained by
banks or investment companies and hold certain investments in accordance with a stated set of objectives. The fair value of commingled funds is
primarily derived from the quoted prices in active  markets of the underlying securities. Because the fund shares are offered to a limited group of
investors, they are not considered to be traded in an active market.
86
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Recurring Non-Derivativ e Fair Value Measureme nts – NEE's and FPL's financi al assets and other fair value measurements made on a recurring
basis by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
 December 31, 2021
 Level 1 Level 2  Level 3 Total
 (millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE – equity securities $ 176 $ —  $ — $ 176 
FPL – equity securities $ 58 $ —  $ — $ 58 
Special use funds:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 2,538 $ 2,973 $ — $ 5,511 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 770 $ 75  $ — $ 845 
Corporate debt securities $ 7 $ 955  $ — $ 962 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 431  $ — $ 431 
Other debt securities $ 2 $ 265  $ — $ 267 
FPL:   
Equity securities $ 862 $ 2,690 $ — $ 3,552 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 624 $ 44  $ — $ 668 
Corporate debt securities $ 6 $ 720  $ — $ 726 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 313  $ — $ 313 
Other debt securities $ 2 $ 225  $ — $ 227 
Other investments:   
NEE:   
Equity securities $ 70 $ 2  $ — $ 72 
Debt securities $ 111 $ 162  $ 12 $ 285 
FPL – equity securities $ 13 $ — $ — $ 13 
______________________
(a) Includes restricted cash equivalents of approximately $ 56 million ($ 53 million for FPL) in current other assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(b) Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair V alue of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair V alue below .
(c) Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d) Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
(millions)
Assets:      
Cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents:      
NEE – equity securities $ 742 $ — $ — $ 742 
FPL – equity securities $ 137 $ — $ — $ 137 
Special use funds:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 2,237 $ 2,489 $ — $ 4,726 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 590 $ 127  $ — $ 717 
Corporate debt securities $ 1 $ 870  $ — $ 871 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 422  $ — $ 422 
Other debt securities $ — $ 124  $ — $ 124 
FPL:      
Equity securities $ 752 $ 2,260 $ — $ 3,012 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds $ 449 $ 87  $ — $ 536 
Corporate debt securities $ — $ 627  $ — $ 627 
Mortgage-backed securities $ — $ 335  $ — $ 335 
Other debt securities $ — $ 119  $ — $ 119 
Other investments:      
NEE:      
Equity securities $ 62 $ — $ — $ 62 
Debt securities $ 91 $ 127 $ — $ 218 
FPL - equity securities $ 12 $ — $ — $ 12 
______________________
(a) Includes restricted cash equivalents of approximately $ 111 million ($ 91 million for FPL) in current other assets and $ 42 million ($ 42 million for FPL) in noncurrent other assets on the consolidated balance sheets.
(b) Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis. See Fair V alue of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair V alue below .
(c) Primarily invested in commingled funds whose underlying securities would be Level 1 if those securities were held directly by NEE or FPL.
(d) Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(c)
(d)
87
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Contingent Consideratio n – At December 31, 2021,  NEER had approximately $261 millio n of contingent consideration liabilities which are
included in noncurrent other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet. The liabilities relate to contingent consideration for the completion of
capital expenditures for future development projects in connection with the acquisition  of GridLiance Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP, LLC (see
Note 6 – GridLiance). NEECH guarantees the contingent consideration obligations under the GridLiance acquisition agreements. Significant
inputs and assumptions used in the fair value measurement, some of which are Level 3 and require judgement, include the projected timing and
amount of future cash flows, estimated probability of completing future development projects as well as discount rates.
Fair Value of Financial Instruments Recorded at Other than Fair Value – The carrying amounts of commercial paper and other short-term debt
approximate their fair values. The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of other financial instruments recorded at other than fair value are
as follows:
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Carrying
AmountEstimated
Fair ValueCarrying
AmountEstimated
Fair Value
 (millions)  
NEE:
Special use funds $ 906 $ 907 $ 919 $ 920 
Other investments $ 102 $ 102 $ 29 $ 29 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 52,745 $ 57,290 $ 46,082 $ 51,525 
FPL:
Special use funds $ 672 $ 672 $ 718 $ 719 
Long-term debt, including current portion $ 18,510 $ 21,379 $ 17,236 $ 21,178 
______________________
(a)Primarily represents investments accounted for under the equity method and loans not measured at fair value on a recurring basis (Level 2).
(b)Included in noncurrent other assets on NEE's consolidated balance sheets.
(c)At December 31, 2021 and 2020, substantially all is Level 2 for NEE and FPL.
Special Use Funds  – The speci al use funds noted above and those carried at fair value (see Recurring Non-Derivative Fair Value Measurements
above) cons ist of NEE's nuclear decommission ing fund assets of approximately $8,846  millio n and $7,703  millio n at December 31, 2021 and
2020, respectively , ($6,082  million and $5,271  million, respectively , for FPL) and FPL's storm fund assets of $76 million and $76 million at
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . The investments held in the special use funds consist of equity and available for sale debt securities
which are primarily carried at estimated fair value. The amortized cost of debt securities is approximately $2,438  million and $2,009  million at
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively ($1,877  million and $1,521  million, respectively , for FPL). Debt securities included in the nuclear
decommissioning funds have a weighted-avera ge maturity at December 31, 2021 of approxim ately eight years  at both NEE and FPL. FPL's
storm fund primarily consists of debt securities with a weighted-average maturity at December 31, 2021 of approximately one year. The cost of
securities sold is determined using the specific identification method.
Effective January 1, 2020, NEE and FPL adopted an accounting standards update that provides  a modified version of the other-than-temporary
impairment model for debt securities. The new available for sale debt security impairment model no longer allows consideration of the length of
time during which the fair value has been less than its amortized cost basis when determining  whether a credit loss exists. Credit losses are
required to be presented  as an allowance rather than as a write-down of securities not intended  to be sold or required to be sold. NEE and FPL
adopted this model prospectively . See Note 1 – Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments.
For FPL's special use funds, changes in fair value of debt and equity securities, including any estimated credit losses of debt securities, result in
a correspon ding adjustm ent to the related regulatory asset or liability accounts, consistent with regulatory treatment. For NEE's non-rate
regulated operations, changes in fair value of debt securities result in a corresponding adjustme nt to OCI, except for estimated credit losses and
unrealized losses on debt securities intended or required to be sold prior to recovery of the amor tized cost basis, which are recognized in other –
net in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Changes in fair value of equity securities are recorded in change in unrealized gains (losses) on
equity securities held in NEER's nuclear decommissioning funds – net in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income.(a)
(b)
(c) (c)
(a)
(c) (c)
88
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
(millions)
Unrealized gains $ 981 $ 627 $ 780 $ 652 $ 444 $ 510 
Realized gains and losses and proceeds from the sale or maturity of available for sale debt securities are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
(millions)
Realized gains $ 78 $ 110 $ 68 $ 59 $ 83 $ 44 
Realized losses $ 73 $ 70 $ 48 $ 57 $ 56 $ 29 
Proceeds from sale or maturity of securities $ 1,831 $ 2,541 $ 3,005 $ 1,330 $ 2,162 $ 2,539 
The unrealiz ed gains and unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities and the fair value of available for sale debt securities in an
unrealized loss position are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2021 2020 2021 2020
 (millions)  
Unrealized gains $ 76 $ 134 $ 63 $ 104 
Unrealized losses $ 19 $ 9 $ 15 $ 9 
Fair value $ 1,100 $ 201 $ 857 $ 150 
______________________
(a)Unrealized losses on available for sale debt securities in an unrealized loss position for greater than twelve months at December 31, 2021 and 2020 were not material to NEE or
FPL.
Regulations issued by the FERC and the NRC provide general risk management guidelines to protect nuclear decommissioning funds and to
allow such funds to earn a reasonable return. The FERC regulations prohibit, among other investments, investments in any securities of NEE or
its subsidiar ies, affiliates or associates, excluding investments tied to market indices or mutual funds. Similar restrictions applicable to the
decommissioning funds for NEER's nuclear plants are included in the NRC operating licenses for those facilities or in NRC regulations applicable
to NRC licensees not in cost-of-service environments. With respect to the decommissioning fund for Seabrook, decommissioning fund
contributions and withdrawals are also regulated by the NDFC pursuant to New Hampshire law .
The nuclear decommissioning reserve funds are managed by investment managers who must comply with the guidelines of NEE and FPL and
the rules of the applicable regulatory authorities. The funds' assets are invested giving consideration to taxes, liquidity , risk, diversification and
other prudent investment objectives.
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements – NEE tests its equity method investments for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances
indicate that the investm ent may be impaired. During the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2020 financial statements, it was determined that
NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline, LLC (Mountain Valley Pipeline) accounted for under the equity method of
accounting was other-than-temporarily impaired.  The impairment is the result of continued legal and regulatory challenges that have resulted in
substantial delays in achieving commercial operation and increased costs to complete construction. More specifically at the end of 2020 and into
early 2021, developments in the legal, regulat ory and political environment caused NextEra Energy Resources to consider the investment
impaired and the impairment to be other than temporary . The challenges included legal challenges to the various permits needed to complete
construction and the regulatory approvals received, regulatory challenges related to alternative construction plans and the extended construction
period, and the political and environmental challenges with the construction of an interstate pipeline. Accordingly , NextEra Energy Resources
performed a fair value analysis based on the market approach to determine the amount of the impairment. The challenges to complete
construction and the resulting economic outlook for the pipeline were considered in determin ing the magnitude of the other-than-temporary
impairment. Based on the fair value analysis, the equity method investment with a carrying amount of approximately $1.9 billion was written down
to its estimated fair value of approximately $400 million as of December 31, 2020, resulting in an impairment charge of $1.5 billion (or $1.2 billion
after tax), which is recorded in equity in(a)
89
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
earnings (losses) of equity method investees in NEE’ s consolidated statements of income for the year ended December 31, 2020.
The fair value estimate was based on a probability-weighted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (EBITDA) multiple
valuation technique using a market participant view of the potential different outcomes for the investment. As part of the valuation, NextEra
Energy Resources used observable inputs where available, including the EBITDA  multiples of recent pipeline transactions. Significant
unobservable inputs (Level 3), including the probabilities assigned to the different potential outcomes, the forecasts of operating revenues and
costs, and the projected capital expenditures to complete the project, were also used in the estimation of fair value. An increase in the revenue
forecasts, a decrease in the projected operatin g or capital expenditures or an increase in the probability assigned to the full pipeline being
completed would result in an increased fair market value. Changes in the opposite direction of those unobservable inputs would result in a
decreased fair market value.
On February  2, 2022, the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit (the 4th Circuit) vacated and remanded Mountain Valley Pipeline’ s
Biological Opinion issued by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. While NextEra Energy Resources continues to evaluate options and next steps
with its joint venture partners, this event along with the 4th Circuit vacatur and remand of the U.S. Forest Service right-of-way grant on January
25, 2022 caused NextEra Energy Resources to re-evaluate its investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline for further other-than-temporary
impairment, which evaluation coincided with the preparation of NEE's December 31, 2021 financial statements. As a result of this evaluation, it
was determined that the continued legal and regulatory challenges have resulted in a very low probability of pipeline completion. Accordingly ,
NextEra Energy Resour ces updated its fair value estimate using the same probability-weighte d EBITDA  multiple valuation technique using a
market participant view of the potential different outcomes for the investment as discussed above. Based on this fair value analysis, NextEra
Energy Resources recorded an impairment charge in the first quarter of 2022 of approximately $0.8 billion ($0.6 billion after tax). This impairment
charge resul ted in the complete write off of NextEra Energy Resources’  equity method investment carrying amount of approximately $0.6 billion,
as well as the recording of a liability of approximately $ 0.2 billion which reflects NextEra Energy Resources’  share of estimated future ARO costs.
5. Income Taxes
The components of income taxes are as follows:
NEE FPL
Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
(millions)
Federal:
Current $ (26)$ 105 $ 167 $ 85 $ 16 $ 390 
Deferred 311 (148) 115 545 474 (41)
Total federal 285 (43) 282 630 490 349 
State:       
Current (62) 18 23 1 32 50 
Deferred 125 69 143 207 156 85 
Total state 63 87 166 208 188 135 
Total income taxes $ 348 $ 44 $ 448 $ 838 $ 678 $ 484 
90
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
A reconciliation between the ef fective income tax rates and the applicable statutory rate is as follows:
 NEE FPL
 Years Ended December 31, Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Statutory federal income tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 % 21.0 %
Increases (reductions) resulting from:       
State income taxes – net of federal income tax
benefit 1.6 2.8 3.4 4.1 4.2 3.5 
Taxes attributable to noncontrolling interests 5.0 4.8 2.1 — — — 
PTCs and ITCs – NEER (10.3) (11.8) (7.2) — — — 
Amortization of deferred regulatory credit (4.4) (7.2) (6.2) (3.5) (4.9) (8.0)
Foreign operations 0.2 (2.4) — — — — 
Other – net (2.1) (5.4) (1.4) (0.9) (1.3) (0.4)
Effective income tax rate 11.0 % 1.8 % 11.7 % 20.7 % 19.0 % 16.1 %
_________________________
(a)NEE's 2019 amount reflects a valuation allowance of approximately $48 million related to deferred state tax credits.
(b)2019 reflects an adjustment of approximately $83 million recorded by FPL to reduce income tax expense for the cumulative amortization of excess deferred income taxes from
January 1, 2018 as a result of the FPSC's order in connection with its review of impacts associated with the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. One of the provisions of the order requires FPL to
amortize approximately $870 million of its excess deferred income taxes over a period not to exceed ten years.
(c)The 2020 gain on sale of the Spain solar projects was not taxable for federal and state income tax purposes (see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling
Ownership Interests).
The income tax ef fects of temporary dif ferences giving rise to consolidated deferred income tax liabilities and assets are as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2021 2020 2021 2020
(millions)
Deferred tax liabilities:
Property-related $ 10,018 $ 10,065 $ 7,831 $ 7,548 
Pension 564 437 425 394 
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures 2,783 2,238 3 3 
Other 2,092 1,730 1,232 862 
Total deferred tax liabilities 15,457 14,470 9,491 8,807 
Deferred tax assets and valuation allowance:
Decommissioning reserves 296 290 296 290 
Net operating loss carryforwards 330 299 2 3 
Tax credit carryforwards 4,646 3,859 182 4 
ARO and accrued asset removal costs 199 347 126 272 
Regulatory liabilities 1,421 1,380 1,397 1,356 
Other 733 755 351 363 
Valuation allowance (282) (289) — — 
Net deferred tax assets 7,343 6,641 2,354 2,288 
Net deferred income taxes $ 8,114 $ 7,829 $ 7,137 $ 6,519 
______________________
(a)Reflects valuation allowances related to deferred state tax credits and state operating loss carryforwards.(a)
(b)
(c)
(a)
91
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included on the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
NEE FPL
December 31, December 31,
2021 2020 2021 2020
(millions)
Noncurrent other assets $ 196 $ 191 $ — $ — 
Deferred income taxes – noncurrent liabilities (8,310) (8,020) (7,137) (6,519)
Net deferred income taxes $ (8,114)$ (7,829)$ (7,137)$ (6,519)
The compon ents of NEE's deferred tax assets relating to net operating loss carryforwards and tax credit carryforwards at December 31, 2021 are
as follows:
AmountExpiration
Dates
(millions)
Net operating loss carryforwards:
Federal $ 51 2034 – 2038
State 264 2022 – 2041
Foreign 15 2022 – 2041
Net operating loss carryforwards $ 330 
Tax credit carryforwards:  
Federal $ 4,296 2030 – 2041
State 345 2022 – 2046
Foreign 5 2035 – 2041
Tax credit carryforwards $ 4,646 
______________________
(a)Includes $49 million of net operating loss carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.
(b)Includes $191 million of ITC carryforwards with an indefinite expiration period.
6. Acquisitions
Gulf Power Company – On January 1, 2019, NEE acquired the outstanding common shares of Gulf Power Company , a rate-regulated electric
utility under the jurisdict ion of the FPSC, which served approximately 470,000  customers in eight  counties throughout northwest Florida, had
approximately 9,500  miles of transmission and distribution lines and owned approximately 2,300  MW of net generating capacity . The purchase
price included approximately $ 4.44 billion in cash consideration and the assumption of approximately $ 1.3 billion of Gulf Power debt.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed on January 1, 2019 based on their
fair value. The approval by the FPSC of Gulf Power's rates, which were intended to allow Gulf Power to collect from retail customers total
revenues equal to Gulf Power's costs of providing service, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital, was considered a
fundamental input in measuring the fair value of Gulf Power's assets and liabilities and, as such, NEE concluded that the carrying values of all
assets and liabilities recoverable through rates were representative of their fair values. As a result, NEE acquired assets of approximately $5.2
billion, prima rily relating to property , plant and equipment of $4.0 billion and regulatory assets of $494 million, and assumed liabilities of
approximately $3.4 billion, including $1.3 billion of long-term debt, $635 million of regulatory liabilities and $562 million of deferred income taxes.
The excess of the purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed resulted in approximately $2.7 billion of goodwill
which had been recognized on NEE's consolida ted balance sheet. The goodwill arising from the transaction represents expected benefits from
continued expansion of NEE's regulated businesses and the indefinite life of Gulf Power's service area franchise.
Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company  – On January  1, 2021, FPL and Gulf Power Comp any merged, with FPL as the surviving entity .
However , during 2021, FPL  continued to be regulated as two separate ratemaking entities in the former service areas of FPL  and Gulf Power . The
FPL segment and Gulf Power continued to be separate operating segments of NEE, as well as FPL, through 2021. See Note 16. Effective
January 1, 2022, FPL became regulated as one ratemaking entity with new unified rates and tariffs, and also became one operating segment of
NEE. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2022 through December 2025. As a result of the merger , FPL acquired
assets of approximately $6.7 billion, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, net of approximately $4.9 billion and regulatory assets of
$1.2 billion, and assumed liabilities of approximately $3.9 billion, including $1.8 billion of debt, primarily long-term debt, $729 million of deferred
income taxes and $566 million of regulatory liabilities. Additionally , goodwill of approximately $2.7 billion and purchase accounting adjustments
associated with the 2019 Gulf Power Company acquisition by NEE were transferred to FPL  from Corporate and(a)
(b)
92
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Other at NEE.  Goodwill associated with the Gulf Power Company acquisition is reflected within Corporate and Other at FPL and, for impairment
testing, is included in the Gulf Power reporting unit. The assets acquired and liabilities assumed by FPL were at carrying amounts as the merger
was between entities under common control.
Trans Bay Cable LLC – On July 16, 2019, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired the membership interests of Trans Bay Cable LLC (Trans
Bay), which owns and operates a 53-mile, high-voltage direct current underwater transmission cable system in California extending from
Pittsburg to San Francisco, with utility rates set by the FERC and revenues paid by the California Independent System Operator . The purchase
price included approximately $ 670 million in cash consideration and the assumption of debt of approximately $ 422 million.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their fair value. The
approval by the FERC of Trans Bay’s rates, which is intended to allow Trans Bay to collect total revenues equal to Trans Bay's costs for the
development, financing,  construction, operation and maintenance of Trans Bay, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital, is
considered a fundamental input in measuring the fair value of Trans Bay's assets and liabilities  and, as such, NEE concluded that the carrying
values of all assets and liabilities recoverable through rates are representative of their fair values. As a result, NEE acquired assets of
approximately $703 million, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, and assumed liabilities of approxim ately $643 million, primarily
relating to long-term debt. The excess of the purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed resulted in
approximately $610 million of goodwill which  has been recognized on NEE's consolidated balance sheet, of which approximately $572 million is
expected to be deductib le for tax purposes. Goodwill associated with the Trans Bay acquisition is reflected within NEER and, for impairment
testing, is included in the rate-regulated transmission reporting unit. The goodwill arising from the transaction represents expected benefits from
continued expansion of NEE's regulated businesses.
GridLiance – On March  31, 2021, a wholly owned subsidiary of NEET  acquired GridLiance Holdco, LP and GridLiance GP, LLC (GridLiance),
which owns and operates three  FERC-regulated transmission utilities with appro ximately 700 miles of high-voltage transmission lines across six
states, five in the Midw est and Nevada. The purchase price included approximately $502 million in cash consideration, and the assumption of
approximately $ 175 million of debt, excluding post-closing adjustments.
Under the acquisition method, the purchase price was allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based on their fair value. The
approval by the FERC of GridLiance's rates, which is intended to allow GridLiance to collect total revenues equal to GridLiance's costs for the
development, financing, construction, operation  and maintenance of GridLiance, including a reasonable rate of return on invested capital, is
considered a fundamental input in measuring the fair value of GridLiance's assets and liabilities  and, as such, NEE concluded that the carrying
values of all assets and liabilities recoverable through rates are representative of their fair values. As a result, NEE acquired assets of
approximately $384 million, primarily relating to property , plant and equipment, and assumed liabilities of approxim ately $210 million, primarily
relating to long-term debt. The acquisition agreements are subject to earn-out provisions for additional payments, valued at approximately
$264 million  at March 31, 2021, to be made upon the completion of capital expenditures for future development projects (see Note 4 – Contingent
Consideration). The excess of the purchase price over the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed resulted in approximately
$592 million of goodwill which has been recognize d on NEE's consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2021, of which approximately
$586 million is expected to be deductible for tax purposes. Goodwill associated with the GridLiance acquisition is reflected within NEER and, for
impairment testing, is included in the rate-regul ated transmission reporting unit. The goodwill arising from the transaction represents expected
benefits from continued expansion of NEE's regulated businesses. The valuation of the acquire d net assets is subject to change as additional
information related to the estimates is obtained during the measurement period.
7. Property, Plant and Equipment
Property , plant and equipment consists of the following at December 31:
NEE FPL
2021 2020 2021 2020
(millions)
Electric plant in service and other property $ 112,500 $ 105,860 $ 67,771 $ 62,963 
Nuclear fuel 1,606 1,604 1,170 1,143 
Construction work in progress 14,141 10,639 6,326 5,361 
Property, plant and equipment, gross 128,247 118,103 75,267 69,467 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (28,899) (26,300) (17,040) (15,588)
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 99,348 $ 91,803 $ 58,227 $ 53,879 
FPL – At December 31, 2021, FPL's gross investment in electric plant in service and other prope rty for the electric generation, transmission,
distribution and general facilities of FPL  represented approximately 46%, 13%, 35% and 6%, respectively; the
93
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
respective amounts at December 31, 2020 were 47%, 12%, 35% and 6%. Substantially all of FPL's properties are subject to the lien of FPL's
mortgage, which secures most debt securities issued by FPL. The weighted annual composite depreciation and amortization rate for FPL's
electric plant in service, including capitalized software, but excluding the effects of decommissioning, dismantlement and the depreciation
adjustments discussed in the following sentence, was approximately 3.8%, 3.8% and 3.9% for 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively . In accordance
with the 2016 rate agreement (see Note 1 – Rate Regulation – Base Rates Effective January 2017 through December 2021), FPL recorded
reserve amortization (reversal) of approximately $429 million, $(1) million and $(357) million in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively . During each of
2021, 2020 and 2019, the FPL segment capitalized AFUDC at a rate of 6.22%, which amounted to approximately $124 million, $79 million and
$80 millio n, respectively . During each of 2021, 2020 and 2019, Gulf Power capitalized AFUDC at a rate of 5.73%, which amounted to
approximately $ 53 million, $ 38 million and $ 6 million, respectively .
NEER  – At Dece mber 31, 2021, wind, solar and nuclear plants represented approximately 53%, 14% and 8%, respectiv ely, of NEER's
depreciable electric plant in service and other property; the respective amounts at December 31, 2020 were 55%, 13% and 8%. The estimated
useful lives of NEER's plants range primarily from 30 to 35 years for wind plants, 30 to 35 years for solar plants and 23 to 47 years for nuclear
plants. NEER's oil and gas production assets represented approximately 14% and 14% of NEER's depreciable electric plant in service and other
property at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . A number of NEER's generation, regulated transmission and pipeline facilities are
encumbered by liens securing various financings. The net book value of NEER's assets serving as collateral was approximately $13.5 billion at
December 31, 2021. Interest capitalized on construction projects amounted to approximately $139 million, $168 million and $135 million during
2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Jointly-Owned Electric Plants – Certain NEE subsidiaries own undivided interests in the jointly-owned facilities described below , and are entitled
to a proportionate share  of the output from those facilities. The subsidiaries are responsible for their share of the operating costs, as well as
providing their own finan cing. Accordingly , each subsidiary's proportionate share of the facilities and related revenues and expenses is included in
the appropri ate balance sheet and statement of income captions. NEE's and FPL's respective shares of direct expenses for these facilities are
included in fuel, purchased power and intercha nge expense, O&M expenses, depreciation and amortization expense and taxes other than
income taxes and other – net in NEE's and FPL's consolidated statements of income.
NEE's and FPL's proportionate ownership interest in jointly-owned facilities is as follows:
 December 31, 2021
 Ownership
InterestGross
InvestmentAccumulated
DepreciationConstruction
Work
in Progress
  (millions)
FPL:     
St. Lucie Unit No. 2 85 %$ 2,284 $ 1,044 $ 90 
Daniel Units Nos. 1 and 2 50 %$ 759 $ 274 $ 16 
Scherer Unit No. 3 25 %$ 449 $ 204 $ 3 
NEER:     
Seabrook 88.23 %$ 1,330 $ 453 $ 58 
Wyman Station Unit No. 4 91.19 %$ 30 $ 11 $ — 
Stanton 65 %$ 139 $ 19 $ — 
Transmission substation assets located in Seabrook, New Hampshire 88.23 %$ 114 $ 8 $ 22 
______________________
(a)Excludes nuclear fuel.
(b)FPL intends to retire its share of these units in 2024. Net book value is reflected in other property on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
(c)Together with its joint interest owner, FPL intends to retire this unit in 2028. Net book value is reflected in other property on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
8. Equity Method Investments
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE's equity method investments totaled approximately $6,159  million and $5,728  million, respectively . The
principal entities included in investment in equity method investees on NEE's consolidated balance sheets are NEP OpCo, Sabal Trail
Transmission, LLC (Sabal Trail) (see Note 15 – Contracts), Mountain Valley Pipeline (see Note 15 – Contracts), and Silver State South Solar ,
LLC. NEE's interest in these entities range from approximately 32% to 55%, and these entities own or are constructing natural gas pipelines or
own electric generation facilities.(a) (a)
(b)
(c)
94
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Summarized combined information for these principal entities is as follows:
 2021 2020
 (millions)
Operating revenue $ 1,469 $ 1,359 
Operating income $ 559 $ 538 
Net income $ 739 $ 516 
Total assets $ 29,537 $ 22,717 
Total liabilities $ 9,501 $ 6,612 
Partners'/members' equity $ 20,036 $ 16,105 
NEE's share of underlying equity in the principal entities $ 4,352 $ 3,927 
Difference between investment carrying amount and underlying equity in net assets 1,133 1,312 
NEE's investment carrying amount for the principal entities $ 5,485 $ 5,239 
______________________
(a)Reflects NEE's interest, as well as third-party interests, in NEP OpCo.
(b)Approximately $2.6 billion in 2021 and $2.8 billion in 2020 is associated with NEP OpCo, of which approximately 75% and 70%, respectively, relates to goodwill and is not being
amortized and the remaining balance is being amortized primarily over a period of 17 to 25 years. The difference for both years is net of an approximately $1.5 billion impairment
charge in 2020 related to NextEra Energy Resources' investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline. In the first quarter of 2022, NextEra Energy Resources recorded an additional
impairment charge to completely write off its investment in Mountain Valley Pipeline. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements for a discussion of the impairment
charges.
NextEra Energy Resour ces provides operational, management and administrative services as well as transportation and fuel management
services to NEP and its subsidiaries under various agreements (service agreements). NextEra Energy Resources is also party to a cash sweep
and credit support (CSC S) agreement with a subsidiary of NEP. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the cash sweep amounts (due to NEP and its
subsidiaries) held in accounts belonging to NextEra Energy Resources or its subsidiaries were approximately $57 millio n and $10 million,
respectively , and are included in accounts payable. Fee income related to the CSCS agreement and the service agreements totaled
approximately $148 million , $120 million  and $101 million  for the years ended December 31, 2021 , 2020 and 2019, respectively , and is included
in operating revenues in NEE's consolidated statements of income. Amounts due from NEP of approximately $113 million and $68 million are
included in other receivables and $40 millio n and $32 millio n are included in noncurrent other asse ts at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively . See also Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests for amounts due to NEP for
reimbursement of construction-related costs. NEECH or NextEra Energy Resources guaranteed or provided indemnifications, letters of credit or
surety bonds totaling approximately $3,778  millio n at December 31, 2021 primarily related to obligations on behalf of NEP's subsidiaries with
maturity dates ranging from 2022 to 2059, including certain project performance obligations, obligations under financing and interconnection
agreements and obligations, primarily incurred and future construction payables, associated with the December 2021 sale of projects to NEP
(see Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests). Payment guarantees and related contracts with
respect to unconsolidate d entities for which NEE or one of its subsidiaries are the guarantor are recorded on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheets
at fair value.  At December 31, 2021, approximat ely $41 million related to the fair value of the credit support provided under the CSCS agreement
is recorded as noncurrent other liabilities on NEE's consolidated balance sheet.
9. Variable Interest Entities (VIEs)
NEER  – At December 31, 2021, NEE consolidates a number of VIEs within the NEER segment. Subsidiaries within the NEER segment are
considered the primary beneficiary of these VIEs since they control the most significant activities of these VIEs, including operations and
maintenance, and they have the obligation to absorb expected losses of these VIEs.
Eight  indirect subsidiaries of NextEra Energy Resour ces have an ownership interest ranging from approximately 50% to 67% in entities which
own and operate solar facilities with the capabil ity of producing a total of approximately 772 MW. Each of the subsid iaries is considered a VIE
since the non-managing members have no subs tantive rights over the managing members, and is consolidated by NextEra Energy Resources.
These entities sell their electric output to third parties under power sales contracts with expiratio n dates ranging from 2035 through 2052. These
entities have  third-party debt which is secured by liens against the assets of the entities. The debt holders have no recourse to the general credit
of NextEra Energy Reso urces for the repayment of debt. The assets and liabilities of these VIEs were approximately $1,851  million and $1,258
million, respectively , at December 31, 2021. There were three  of these consolidated VIEs at December 31, 2020, and the assets and liabilities of
those VIEs at such date totaled approximately $751 million and $607 million, respectively . At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the assets and
liabilities of these VIEs consisted primarily of property , plant and equipment and long-term debt.
NEE consol idates a NEET  VIE that is constructing an approximately 280-mile electric ity transmission line. A NEET  subsidiary is the primary
beneficiary and controls the most significant activities during the construction period, includin g controlling the construction budget. NEET  is
entitled to receive 50% of the profits and losses of the entity . The assets and liabilities of the VIE totaled approxim ately $614 million  and $64
million, respectively , at December 31, 2021, and $ 423 million and $ 68 million,(a)
(b)
95
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
respectively , at December 31, 2020. At Decemb er 31, 2021 and 2020, the assets and liabilities of this VIE consisted primarily of property , plant
and equipment and accounts payable.
NextEra Energy Resources consolidates a VIE which has a 10% direct ownership interest in wind generation facilities and solar facilities which
have the capability of producing approximately 400 MW and 599 MW, respectively . These entities sell their electric output under power sales
contracts to third parties with expiration dates ranging from 2025 through 2040. These entities are also considered a VIE because the holders of
differential membership interests in these entitie s do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities. The assets and
liabilities of the VIE were  approximately $1,518  million  and $79 million , respectively , at December 31, 2021, and $1,572  million  and $393 million,
respectively , at December 31, 2020. At Decemb er 31, 2021 and 2020, the assets and liabilities of this VIE consisted primarily of property , plant
and equipment and accounts payable.
The other 33 NextEra Energy Resources VIEs that are consolidated primarily relate to certain subsidiaries which have sold differential
membership interests in entities which own and operate wind generation as well as solar and solar plus battery storage facilities with the
capability of producing a total of approximately 10,626  MW and 890 MW, respectively , and own wind generation as well as solar and solar plus
battery storage facilities that, upon completion of construction, which is anticipated in the first half of 2022, are expected to have a total capacity
of approximately 200 MW and 625 MW, respectively . These entities sell, or will sell, their electric output either under power sales contracts to third
parties with expiration dates ranging from 2024 through 2053 or in the spot market. These entities are considered VIEs because the holders of
differential membership interests do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities. NextEra Energy Resources has
financing obligations with respect to these entities, including third-party debt which is secured by liens against the generation facilities and the
other assets of these entities or by pledges of NextEra Energy Resources' ownership interest in these entities. The debt holders have no
recourse to the general credit of NEER for the repayment of debt. The assets and liabilities of these VIEs totaled approximately $17,419  million
and $1,480  millio n, respectively , at December 31, 2021, and $16,180  millio n and $1,741  millio n, respectively at December 31, 2020. At
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the assets and liabilities of these VIEs consisted primarily of property, plant and equipment and accounts payable.
At December 31, 2021, subsidiaries of NEE had guarantees related to certain obligations of two of these consolidated VIEs.
Other  – At December 31, 2021 and 2020, several NEE subsidiaries had investments totaling approxim ately $4,559  million ($3,799  million at FPL)
and $3,704  million ($3,124  million at FPL), respectively , which are included in special use funds and noncurrent other assets on NEE's
consolidated balance sheets and in special use funds on FPL's consolidated balance sheets. These investments represented primarily
commingled funds and mortgage-backed securities. NEE subsidiaries, including FPL, are not the primary beneficiaries and therefore do not
consolidate any of these entities because they do not control any of the ongoing activities of these entities, were not involved in the initial design
of these entities and do not have a controlling financial interest in these entities.
Certain subsidiaries of NEE have noncontrollin g interests in entities accounted for under the equity method, including NEE's noncontrolling
interest in NEP OpCo (see Note 8). These entities are limited partnerships or similar entity structures in which the limited partners or non-
managing members do not have substantive rights over the significant activities of these entities, and therefore are considered VIEs. NEE is not
the primary beneficiary because it does not have a controlling financial interest in these entities, and therefore does not consolidate any of these
entities. NEE’s investment in these entities totaled approximately $4,214  million and $3,932  million at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respec tively .
At December 31, 2021, subsidiaries of NEE had guarantees related to certain obligations of one of these entities, as well as commitments to
invest an additional approximately $110 million in several of these entities. See further discussion of such guarantees and commitments in Note
15 – Commitments and – Contracts, respectively .
10. Leases
NEE has operating and finance leases primarily related to purchased power agreements, land use agreements that convey exclusive use of the
land during the arrangem ent for certain of its renewable energy projects and substations, buildings and equipment. Operating and finance leases
primarily have fixed payments with expected expiration dates ranging from 2022 to 2083, with the exception of operating leases related to three
land use agreements with an expiration date of 2106, some of which include options to extend the leases up to 20 years and some have options
to terminate at NEE's discretion. At December 31, 2021, NEE’ s ROU assets  and lease liabilities  for operating leases totaled approximately $547
million and $555 million, respectively; the respective amounts at December 31, 2020 were $535 million and $541 million. At December 31, 2021,
NEE’ s ROU assets  and lease liabilit ies for finance leases totaled approximately $205 million and $200 million, respectively; the respective
amounts at December 31, 2020 were $128 million and $124 million. NEE’ s lease liabilities at December 31, 2021 and 2020 were calculated using
a weighted-average incremental borrowing rate at the lease inception of 3.57% and 3.81%, respectively , for operating leases and 3.52% and
3.50%, respectiv ely, for finance leases, and a weighte d-average remaining lease term of 39 years and 33 years, respectively , for operating leases
and 31 years and 25 years, respectively , for finance leases. At Dece mber 31, 2021, expected lease payments over the remaining terms of the
leases were  approximately $1.4 billion with no one year being material. NEE's operating lease cost for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 totaled approximately $92 million, $95 million and $91 million, respectively . During the year ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and
2019,
96
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's ROU  assets obtained in exchange for operating lease obligations totaled approximat ely $92 million, $121 million and $450 millio n,
respectively , and in 2019 primarily relate to leases acquired with the Gulf Power ($262 million at FPL) and Trans Bay acquisitions (see Note 6).
Other operating and finance lease-related amounts were not material to NEE's consolidated statements of income for the periods presented.
NEE has operating and sales-type leases primar ily related to a natural gas and oil electric gener ation facility and certain battery storage facilities
that sell their electric output under power sales agreements to third parties which provide the customers the ability to dispatch the facilities. At
December 31, 2021 and 2020, NEE recorded a net investment in sales-type leases of approxim ately $42 million and $47 million, respectively . At
December 31, 2021, the power sales agreements have expiration dates from 2024 to 2043 and NEE expects to receive approximately $843
million of lease paymen ts over the remaining terms of the power sales agreements with no one year being material. Operating and sales-type
lease-related amounts were not material to NEE's consolidated statements of income for the periods presented.
11. Asset Retirement Obligations
NEE's AROs  relate primarily to decommissionin g obligations of FPL's and NEER's nuclear units and to obligations for the dismantlement of
certain of NEER's wind and solar facilities. For NEE's rate-regulated operations, including FPL, the accounting provisions result in timing
differences in the recogn ition of legal asset retirement costs for financial reporting purposes and the method the regulator allows for recovery in
rates. See Note 1 – Rate Regulation and – Decommissioning of Nuclear Plants, Dismantlement of Plants and Other Accrued Asset Removal
Costs.
A rollforward of NEE's and FPL's AROs is as follows:
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2019 $ 3,506 $ 2,410 
Liabilities incurred 138 — 
Accretion expense 169 103 
Liabilities settled (53) (32)
Revision in estimated cash flows – net (594) (545)
Balances, December 31, 2020 3,166 1,936 
Liabilities incurred 79 7 
Accretion expense 141 78 
Liabilities settled (88) (15)
Revision in estimated cash flows – net (119) 101 
Balances, December 31, 2021 $ 3,179 $ 2,107 
______________________
(a)Primarily reflects the effect of revised cost estimates for decommissioning FPL's nuclear units consistent with the updated nuclear decommissioning studies filed with the FPSC in
December 2020.
(b)Includes the current portion of AROs as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 of approximately $97 million ($58 million for FPL) and $109 million ($65 million for FPL), respectively, which
are included in other current liabilities on NEE's and FPL's consolidated balance sheets.
(c)Includes approximately $35 million related to project sales to NEP as well as other sales of businesses and assets. See Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of
Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.
(d)The increase at FPL discussed in (e) was offset primarily by the effect of revised cost estimates and useful lives of NEER's solar facilities.
(e)Primarily reflects the effect of pending license extension requests of St. Lucie Units Nos. 1 and 2 for an additional 20 years.
Restricted funds for the payment of future expen ditures to decommission NEE's and FPL's nuclear units included in special use funds on NEE's
and FPL's consolidated balance sheets are presented below (see Note 4 – Special Use Funds). Duane Arnold is being actively decommissioned
and was granted an exemption from the NRC, which allows for use of the funds for certain other site restoration activities in addition to
decommissioning obligations recorded as AROs.
NEE FPL
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2021 $ 8,846 $ 6,082 
Balances, December 31, 2020 $ 7,703 $ 5,271 
NEE and FPL have identified but not recognize d ARO liabilities related to the majority of their electric transmission and distribution assets and
pipelines resulting from easements over property not owned by NEE or FPL. These easem ents are generally perpetual and only require
retirement action upon abandonment or cessation of use of the property or facility for its specified purpose. The related ARO liability is not
estimable for such easements as NEE and FPL intend to use these properties indefinitely . In the event NEE or FPL decide to abandon or cease
the use of a particular easement, an ARO liability would be recorded at that time.(a) (a)
(b) (b)
(c)
(d) (e)
(b) (b)
97
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
12. Employee Retirement Benefits
Employee Pension Plan and Other Benefits Plans – NEE sponsors a qualified noncontributory defined benefit pension plan for substantially all
employees of NEE and its subsidiaries. NEE also has a supplemental executive retirement plan (SERP), which includes a non-qualified
supplemental defined benefit pension componen t that provides benefits to a select group of management and highly compensated employees,
and sponsor s a contributory postretirement plan for other benefits for retirees of NEE and its subsidiaries meeting certain eligibility requirements.
The total accrued benefi t cost of the SERP  and postretirement plans is approximately $300 million ($139 million for FPL) and $323 million ($156
million for FPL) at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
Pension Plan Assets, Benefit Obligations and Funded Status – The changes in assets, benefit obligations and the funded status of the pension
plan are as follows:
 2021 2020
 (millions)
Change in pension plan assets:   
Fair value of plan assets at January 1 $ 5,314 $ 4,800 
Actual return on plan assets 627 723 
Benefit payments (253) (209)
Fair value of plan assets at December 31 $ 5,688 $ 5,314 
Change in pension benefit obligation:   
Obligation at January 1 $ 3,607 $ 3,363 
Service cost 90 85 
Interest cost 64 92 
Special termination benefit — 16 
Plan amendments — 1 
Actuarial losses (gains) – net (63) 259 
Benefit payments (253) (209)
Obligation at December 31 $ 3,445 $ 3,607 
Funded status:   
Prepaid pension benefit costs at NEE at December 31 $ 2,243 $ 1,707 
Prepaid pension benefit costs at FPL at December 31 $ 1,657 $ 1,550 
_________________________
(a)Reflects enhanced early retirement benefit.
(b)NEE's accumulated pension benefit obligation, which includes no assumption about future salary levels, at December 31, 2021 and 2020 was approximately $3,352 million and
$3,521 million, respectively.
(c)Reflects FPL's allocated benefits under NEE's pension plan.
NEE's unrec ognized amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) yet to be recognized as components of prepaid
pension benefit costs are as follows:
2021  2020
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service benefit (net of $1 tax expense and $1 tax expense, respectively) $ 2 $ 2 
Unrecognized gains (losses) (net of $7 tax expense and $24 tax benefit, respectively) 41 (60)
Total $ 43 $ (58)
NEE's unrecognized amounts included in regulatory assets (liabilities) yet to be recognized as components of net prepaid pension benefit costs
are as follows:
2021 2020
(millions)
Unrecognized prior service benefit $ (1)$ (1)
Unrecognized losses (gains) (80) 163 
Total $ (81)$ 162 (a)
(b)
(c)
98
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The following table provides the assumptions used to determine the benefit obligation for the pension plan. These rates are used in determining
net periodic pension income in the following year .
2021 2020
Discount rate 2.87 % 2.53 %
Salary increase 4.90 % 4.40 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.79 % 3.82 %
_________________________
(a)The method of estimating the interest cost component of net periodic benefit costs uses a full yield curve approach by applying a specific spot rate along the yield curve.
NEE's investment policy for the pension plan recognizes the benefit of protecting the plan's funded status, thereby avoiding the necessity of
future employer contributions. Its broad objectiv es are to achieve a high rate of total return with a prudent level of risk taking while maintaining
sufficient liquidity and diversification to avoid large losses and preserve capital over the long term.
The NEE pension plan fund's current target asset allocation, which is expected to be reached over time, is 45% equity investments, 32% fixed
income investments, 13% alternative investments and 10% convertible securities. The pension fund's investment strategy emphasizes traditional
investments, broadly diversified across the global equity and fixed income markets, using a combination of different investment styles and
vehicles. The pension fund's equity and fixed income holdings consist of both directly held securities as well as commingled investment
arrangements such as common and collective trusts, pooled separate accounts, registered investment companies and limited partnerships. The
pension fund's convertible security assets are principally direct holdings of convertible securities and include a convertible security oriented
limited partnership. The pension fund's alternativ e investments consist primarily of private equity and real estate oriented investments in limited
partnerships as well as absolute return oriented limited partnerships that use a broad range of investment strategies on a global basis.
The fair value measurements of NEE's pension plan assets by fair value hierarchy level are as follows:
December 31, 2021
Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
(millions)
Equity securities $ 1,977 $ 29 $ 2 $ 2,008 
Equity commingled vehicles — 889 — 889 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 131 6 — 137 
Corporate debt securities — 351 — 351 
Asset-backed securities — 386 — 386 
Debt security commingled vehicles — 219 — 219 
Convertible securities 91 489 — 580 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 2,199 $ 2,369 $ 2 4,570 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,118 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 5,688 
_____________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $927 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $169 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $109 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $5 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $41 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $220 million.(a)
(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
99
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
 December 31, 2020
 Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical Assets
or Liabilities
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
 (millions)
Equity securities $ 2,017 $ 10 $ 3 $ 2,030 
Equity commingled vehicles — 668 — 668 
U.S. Government and municipal bonds 169 8 — 177 
Corporate debt securities — 340 — 340 
Asset-backed securities — 375 — 375 
Debt security commingled vehicles — 201 — 201 
Convertible securities 64 453 — 517 
Total investments in the fair value hierarchy $ 2,250 $ 2,055 $ 3 4,308 
Total investments measured at net asset value 1,006 
Total fair value of plan assets $ 5,314 
______________________
(a)See Notes 3 and 4 for discussion of fair value measurement techniques and inputs.
(b)Includes foreign investments of $881 million.
(c)Includes foreign investments of $156 million.
(d)Includes foreign investments of $93 million.
(e)Includes foreign investments of $5 million.
(f)Includes foreign investments of $35 million.
(g)Includes foreign investments of $153 million.
Expected Cash Flows – The following table provides information about benefit payments expecte d to be paid by the pension plan for each of the
following calendar years (in millions):
2022 $ 204 
2023 $ 208 
2024 $ 209 
2025 $ 210 
2026 $ 214 
2027 – 2031 $ 1,033 
Net Periodic Income – The components of net periodic income for the plans are as follows:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
 (millions)
Service cost $ 90 $ 85 $ 80 $ 2 $ 1 $ 1 
Interest cost 64 92 114 4 8 9 
Expected return on plan assets (339) (321) (312) — — — 
Amortization of actuarial loss 24 18 — 5 3 — 
Amortization of prior service benefit (1) (1) (1) (15) (16) (15)
Special termination benefits — 16 19 — — — 
Net periodic income at NEE $ (162)$ (111)$ (100)$ (4)$ (4)$ (5)
Net periodic income allocated to FPL $ (108)$ (84)$ (61)$ (4)$ (4)$ (4)(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
(g)
100
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Other Comprehensive Income – The components of net periodic income recognized in OCI for the pension plan are as follows:
 2021 2020 2019
 (millions)
Net gains (losses) (net of $29 tax expense, $13 tax expense and $10 tax benefit, respectively) $ 95 $ 42 $ (36)
Amortization of unrecognized losses (net of $2 tax expense and $1 tax expense, respectively) 6 5 — 
Total $ 101 $ 47 $ (36)
Regulatory Assets (Liabilities) – The components of net periodic income recognized during the year in regulatory assets (liabilities) for the
pension plan are as follows:
 2021 2020
 (millions)
Prior service cost (benefit) $ (1)$ 1 
Unrecognized gains (226) (89)
Amortization of prior service benefit — 1 
Amortization of unrecognized losses (16) (12)
Total $ (243)$ (99)
The assumptions used to determine net periodic pension income for the pension plan are as follows:
 2021 2020 2019
Discount rate 2.53 % 3.22 % 4.26 %
Salary increase 4.40 % 4.40 % 4.40 %
Expected long-term rate of return, net of investment management fees 7.35 % 7.35 % 7.35 %
Weighted-average interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.83 % 3.88 %
______________________
(a)In developing the expected long-term rate of return on assets assumption for its pension plan, NEE evaluated input, including other qualitative and quantitative factors, from its
actuaries and consultants, as well as information available in the marketplace. NEE considered different models, capital market return assumptions and historical returns for a
portfolio with an equity/bond asset mix similar to its pension fund. NEE also considered its pension fund's historical compounded returns.
Employee Contribution Plan – NEE offers an employee retirement savings plan which allows eligible participants to contrib ute a percentage of
qualified compensation through payroll deductions. NEE makes matching contributions to participants' accounts. Defined contribution expense
pursuant to this plan was approximately $66 million, $64 million and $58 million for NEE ($42 million, $40 million and $40 million for FPL) for the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .(a)
101
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
13. Debt
Long-term debt consists of the following:
December 31,
2021 2020
Maturity
Date BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate BalanceWeighted-
Average
Interest Rate
(millions) (millions)
FPL:  
First mortgage bonds – fixed 2023 – 2051 $ 14,290 4.20 % $ 13,090 4.32 %
Pollution control, solid waste disposal and industrial development revenue bonds
– primarily variable 2022 – 2050 1,407 0.15 % 1,407 0.17 %
Senior unsecured notes – primarily variable 2022 – 2071 2,697 1.37 % 2,621 1.55 %
Other long-term debt – variable 2022 – 2046 307 0.82 % 300 0.70 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs and discount (191) (182)
Total long-term debt of FPL 18,510 17,236 
Less current portion of long-term debt 536 354 
Long-term debt of FPL, excluding current portion 17,974 16,882 
NEER:  
   NextEra Energy Resources:
  Senior secured limited-recourse long-term debt – variable 2024 – 2037 3,100 1.74 % 2,621 1.99 %
       Senior secured limited-recourse long-term loans – fixed 2028 – 2049 2,475 3.30 % 704 3.59 %
    Other long-term debt – primarily variable 2024 – 2048 785 2.50 % 450 2.72 %
    NEET – long-term debt – primarily fixed 2022 – 2049 1,151 2.69 % 937 3.09 %
 Unamortized debt issuance costs and premium (92) (65)
 Total long-term debt of NEER 7,419 4,647 
 Less current portion of long-term debt 664 239 
 Long-term debt of NEER, excluding current portion 6,755 4,408 
NEECH:  
Debentures – fixed 2023 – 2052 10,990 2.21 % 11,540 2.86 %
Debentures – variable 2022 – 2023 3,850 0.56 % 1,225 0.80 %
Debentures, related to NEE's equity units – fixed 2024 – 2025 6,000 1.46 % 6,000 1.46 %
Junior subordinated debentures – primarily fixed 2057 – 2082 3,723 4.54 % 3,693 4.78 %
Japanese yen denominated long-term debt – primarily variable 2023 – 2030 582 1.49 % 650 1.49 %
Australian dollar denominated long-term debt – fixed 2026 360 2.20 % 385 2.20 %
Other long-term debt – fixed 2022 186 0.92 % 221 0.92 %
Other long-term debt – variable 2023 – 2024 1,245 0.64 % 600 0.70 %
Unamortized debt issuance costs, premium (120) (115)
Total long-term debt of NEECH 26,816 24,199 
Less current portion of long-term debt 585 3,545 
Long-term debt of NEECH, excluding current portion 26,231 20,654 
Total long-term debt $ 50,960 $ 41,944 
______________________
(a)Includes variable rate tax exempt bonds that permit individual bondholders to tender the bonds for purchase at any time prior to maturity. In the event these variable rate tax exempt
bonds are tendered for purchase, they would be remarketed by a designated remarketing agent in accordance with the related indenture. If the remarketing is unsuccessful, FPL
would be required to purchase these variable rate tax exempt bonds. At December 31, 2021, these variable rate tax exempt bonds totaled approximately $1,375 million. All variable
rate tax exempt bonds tendered for purchase have been successfully remarketed. FPL's syndicated revolving credit facilities are available to support the purchase of the variable rate
tax exempt bonds. Variable interest rate is established at various intervals by the remarketing agent.
(b)At December 31, 2021, includes approximately $882 million of floating rate notes that permit individual noteholders to require repayment at specified dates prior to maturity. FPL’s
syndicated revolving credit facilities are available to support the purchase of the floating rate notes.
(c)Variable rate is based on an underlying index plus a specified margin.
(d)Interest rate contracts, primarily swaps, have been entered into with respect to certain of these debt issuances. See Note 3.
(e)Foreign currency contracts have been entered into with respect to these debt issuances. See Note 3.
As of December 31, 2021, minimum annual maturities of long -term debt for NEE are approximately $1,785  million, $8,394  million, $3,672  million,
$6,536  million and $1,322  million for 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2026, respectively . The respective amounts for FPL are approximately $536
million, $ 1,548  million, $ 646 million, $ 1,700  million and $ 0.2 million.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, short-term borrowings had a weighted-average interest rate of 0.39% (0.27% for FPL) and 0.35% (0.28% for
FPL), respec tively . Subs idiaries of NEE, including FPL, had credit facilities with available capacity at December 31, 2021 of approximately $12.1
billion ($ 4.6 billion for FPL), of which approximately $ 11.1 billion ($ 4.6 billion for FPL)(a)
(b)(c)
(c)
(c)(d)
(c)(d)
(d)
(d)
(c)
(d)
(c)(d)(e)
(e)
(c)
102
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
relate to revolving line of credit facilities and $1.0 billion  (none  for FPL) relate to letter  of credit facilities. Certain of the revolving line of credit
facilities provide for the issuance of letters of credit which at December 31, 2021 had available capacity of approximately $1.9 billion ($647 million
for FPL). The issuance of letters of credit under certain revolving line of credit facilities is subje ct to the aggregate commitment of the relevant
banks to issue letters of credit under the applicable facility .
NEE has guaranteed certain payment obligations of NEECH, including most of those under NEECH's debt, including all of its debentures and
commercial paper issuances, as well as most of its payment guarantees and indemnifications. NEECH has guaranteed certain debt and other
obligations of subsidiaries within the NEER segment.
In August 2019, NEECH  completed a remarketing of $1.5 billion  aggregate princip al amount of its Series I Debentures due September 1, 2021
(Series I Debentures) that were issued in August 2016 as components of equity units issued conc urrently by NEE (August 2016 equity units). The
Series I Debentures are fully and unconditionally  guaranteed by NEE. In connection with the remarketing of the Series I Debentures, the interest
rate on the Series I Debentures was reset to 2.403 % per year, and interest is payable on March 1 and September 1 of each year, commencing
September 1, 2019. In connection with the settlement of the contracts to purchase NEE commo n stock that were issued as components of the
August 2016 equity units, in the third quarter of 2019, NEE issued approximately 9.5 million shares of common stock (38.2 million shares after
giving ef fect to the four-for-one stock split of NEE common stock ef fective October 26, 2020 (2020 stock split) in exchange for $ 1.5 billion.
As a result of the 2020 stock split (and adjustments related to the dividend rate), the fixed settlement rates of NEE’ s three outstanding series of
Corporate Units have been adjusted as described below . In addition, the Corporate Units provid e that the applicable market value (as described
below) for each series of Corporate Units will also be adjusted (when determined) to give effect to the 2020 stock split and certain other anti-
dilution adjustments to determine the applicable settlement rate. However , for purposes of the presentation below , corresponding adjustments
were instead  made to the reference prices and the threshold appreciation prices for each series of Corporate Units to present the practical effect
of the antidilution adjustments as of December 31, 2021.
In September 2019, NEE sold $1.5 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amount of $50 and
consists of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided  beneficial ownership interest in a
Series J Debenture due September 1, 2024, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock purchase contract requires the
holder to purchase by no later than September 1, 2022 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in cash, a number of shares of NEE common
stock (subje ct to antidilution adjustments) base d on a price per share range described in the following sentence. If purchased on the final
settlement date, as of December 31, 2021, the number of shares issued per equity unit would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from
0.8973  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is less than or equal to $55.72  (the adjusted reference  price) to
0.7181  shares if the applicable market value of a share is equal to or greater than $69.66  (the adjuste d threshold appreciation price), with the
applicable market value to be determined using the average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period endin g August 29,
2022. Total annual distributions on the equity units are at the rate of 4.872 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (2.10% per year) and
payments under the stock purchase contracts (2.772 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after March 1,
2022. A holder of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures that are part of
its equity unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each Corporate Unit is pledged to
NEE to secure the holder's obligation to purcha se NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contract. If a successful remarketing
does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder  has not notified NEE of its intention to settle the
stock purchase contract with cash, the deben tures that are components of the Corporate Units will be used to satisfy in full the holders'
obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The debentures are fully and
unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
In February 2020, NEE sold $2.5 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amount of $50 and
consists of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided  beneficial ownership interest in a
Series K Debenture due March 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH. Each stock purchase contract requi res the holder to
purchase by no later than March 1, 2023 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in cash, a number of shares of NEE common stock (subject
to antidilution adjustments) based on a price per share range described in the following sentence . If purchased on the final settlement date, as of
December 31, 2021, the number of shares issued per equity unit would (subject to antidilutio n adjustments) range from 0.7104  shares if the
applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is less than or equal to $70.39  (the adjusted reference  price) to 0.5681  shares if the
applicable market value of a share is equal to or greater than $87.99  (the adjusted threshold appreciation price), with the applicable market value
to be determined using the average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period ending February 24, 2023. Total annual
distributions on the equity units are at the rate of 5.279 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (1.84% per year) and payments under the
stock purchase contracts (3.439 % per year). The interes t rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after September 1, 2022. A holder
of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures that are part of its equity unit.
The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each Corporate Unit is pledged to NEE to secure the
holder's obligation to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contract. If a successful remarketing does not occur on or
before the third
103
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder has not notified NEE of its intention  to settle the stock purchase contract with cash,
the debentures that are components of the Corporate Units will be used to satisfy in full the holders' obligations to purchase NEE common stock
under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The debentures are fully and unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
In September 2020, NEE sold $2.0 billion of equity units (initially consisting of Corporate Units). Each equity unit has a stated amount of $50 and
consists of a contract to purchase NEE common stock (stock purchase contract) and, initially , a 5% undivided  beneficial ownership interest in a
Series L Debenture due September 1, 2025, issued in the principal amount of $1,000  by NEECH . Each stock purchase contract requires the
holder to purchase by no later than September 1, 2023 (the final settlement date) for a price of $50 in cash, a number of shares of NEE common
stock (subje ct to antidilution adjustments) base d on a price per share range described in the following sentence. If purchased on the final
settlement date, as of December 31, 2021, the number of shares issued per equity unit would (subject to antidilution adjustments) range from
0.6776  shares if the applicable market value of a share of NEE common stock is less than or equal to $73.79  (the adjusted reference  price) to
0.5421  shares if the applicable market value of a share is equal to or greater than $92.24  (the adjuste d threshold appreciation price), with the
applicable market value to be determined using the average closing prices of NEE common stock over a 20-day trading period endin g August 29,
2023. Total annual distributions on the equity units are at the rate of 6.219 %, consisting of interest on the debentures (0.509 % per year) and
payments under the stock purchase contracts (5.710 % per year). The interest rate on the debentures is expected to be reset on or after March 1,
2023. A holder of an equity unit may satisfy its purchase obligation with proceeds raised from remarketing the NEECH debentures that are part of
its equity unit. The undivided beneficial ownership interest in the NEECH debenture that is a component of each Corporate Unit is pledged to
NEE to secure the holder's obligation to purcha se NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contract. If a successful remarketing
does not occur on or before the third business day prior to the final settlement date, and a holder  has not notified NEE of its intention to settle the
stock purchase contract with cash, the deben tures that are components of the Corporate Units will be used to satisfy in full the holders'
obligations to purchase NEE common stock under the related stock purchase contracts on the final settlement date. The debentures are fully and
unconditionally guaranteed by NEE.
Prior to the issuance of NEE’ s common stock, the stock purchase contracts, if dilutive, will be reflected in NEE’ s diluted earnings per share
calculations using the treasury stock method. Under this method, the number of shares of NEE common stock used in calculating diluted
earnings per share is deemed to be increased by the excess, if any, of the number of shares that would be issued upon settlement of the stock
purchase contracts over the number of shares that could be purchased by NEE in the market, at the average market price during the period,
using the proceeds receivable upon settlement.
In January 2022, FPL sold $1.5 billion principal amount of its First Mortgage Bonds, 2.45% Series due February 3, 2032 and sold $1.0 billion
principal amount of its Floating Rate Notes, Series due January 12, 2024.
14. Equity
Earnings Per Share  – The reconciliation of NEE's basic and diluted earnings per share attributable to NEE is as follows:
 Years Ended December 31,
 2021 2020 2019
 (millions, except per share amounts)
Numerator – net income attributable to NEE $ 3,573 $ 2,919 $ 3,769 
Denominator:    
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding – basic 1,962.5 1,959.0 1,927.9 
Equity units, stock options, performance share awards and restricted stock 9.7 9.8 14.0 
Weighted-average number of common shares outstanding – assuming dilution 1,972.2 1,968.8 1,941.9 
Earnings per share attributable to NEE:   
Basic $ 1.82 $ 1.49 $ 1.95 
Assuming dilution $ 1.81 $ 1.48 $ 1.94 
______________________
(a)Calculated using the treasury stock method. Performance share awards are included in diluted weighted-average number of common shares outstanding based upon what would be
issued if the end of the reporting period was the end of the term of the award.
Common shares issuable pursuant to equity units, stock options and/or performance share awards, as well as restricted stock which were not
included in the denominator above due to their antidilutive effect were approximately 30.5 million , 27.1 million  and 3.0 million  for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
On September 14, 2020, NEE's board of directors approved a four-for-one split of NEE common stock effective October 26, 2020. NEE's
authorized common stock increased from 800 million to 3.2 billion shares. All share and share-based data included in NEE's consolidated
financial statements reflect the ef fect of the 2020 stock split.(a)
104
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Potentially Dilutive Securities at NEP – NEP senior unsecured convertible notes, when outstanding, are potentially dilutive securities  to NEE. In
June 2021 and Decemb er 2020, NEP issued $500 million and $600 million, respectively , principal amount of new senior unsecured convertible
notes. Holde rs of these notes may convert all or a portion of the notes in accordance with the related indenture. Upon conversion, NEP will pay
cash up to the principal amount of the notes to be converted and pay or deliver , as the case may be, cash, NEP common units or a combination
of cash and common units, at NEP's election, in respect of the remainder , if any, of NEP's conversion obligation in excess of the principal amount
of the notes being converted.
Common Stock Dividend Restrictions  – NEE's charter does not limit the dividends that may be paid on its common stock. FPL's mortgage
securing FPL's first mortgage bonds contains provisions which, under certain conditions, restrict the payment of dividends and other distributions
to NEE. These restrictions do not currently limit FPL's ability to pay dividends to NEE.
Stock-Based Compensa tion – Net income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 includes approximately $119 million, $107
million and $100 million, respectively , of compensation costs and $19 million, $21 million and $17 million, respectively , of income tax benefits
related to stock-based compensation arrangements. Compensation cost capitalized for the years  ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was
not material. At December 31, 2021, there were approximately $148 million of unrecognized compensation costs related to
nonvested/nonexercisable stock-based compensation arrangements. These costs are expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period
of 2.8 years.
At December 31, 2021, approximately 84 million shares of common stock were authorized for awards to officers, employees and non-employee
directors of NEE and its subsidiaries under NEE's: (a) 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan, (b) 2017 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan and (c)
earlier equity  compensation plans under which shares are reserved for issuance under existing grants, but no additional shares are available for
grant under the earlier plans. NEE satisfies restricted stock and performance share awards by issuing new shares of its common stock or by
purchasing shares of its common stock in the open market. NEE satisfies stock option exercises by issuing new shares of its common stock. NEE
generally grants most of its stock-based compensation awards in the first quarter of each year .
Restricted Stock and Performance Share Award s – Restricted stock typically vests within three years after the date of grant and is subject to,
among other things, restrictions on transferability prior to vesting. The fair value of restricted stock is measured based upon the closing market
price of NEE common stock as of the date of grant. Performance share awards are typically payable at the end of a three-year  performanc e
period if the specified performance criteria are met. The fair value for the majority of performa nce share awards is estimated based upon the
closing mark et price of NEE common stock as of the date of grant less the present value of expected dividends, multiplied by an estimated
performance multiple which is subsequently trued up based on actual performance. 
The activity in restricted stock and performance share awards for the year ended December 31, 2021 was as follows:
Shares/UnitsWeighted-
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
Per Share/Units
Restricted Stock:
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2021 1,674,242 $ 50.26 
Granted 1,013,039 $ 82.69 
Vested (835,919)$ 48.06 
Forfeited (33,630)$ 69.63 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2021 1,817,732 $ 68.09 
Performance Share Awards:   
Nonvested balance, January 1, 2021 1,938,608 $ 47.46 
Granted 1,297,680 $ 54.82 
Vested (1,738,904)$ 37.53 
Forfeited (85,235)$ 64.84 
Nonvested balance, December 31, 2021 1,412,149 $ 61.22 
The weighte d-average grant date fair value per share of restricted stock granted for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 was $68.25
and $46.64  respectively . The weighted-average grant date fair value per share of performance share awards granted for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019 was $ 46.09  and $ 34.75 , respectively .
The total fair value of restricted stock and perfor mance share awards vested was $186 million, $177 million and $125 million for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
105
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Options – Options typically vest within three years  after the date of grant and have a maximum term of ten years . The exercise price of each
option granted equals the closing market price of NEE common stock on the date of grant. The fair value of the options is estimated on the date
of the grant using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model and based on the following assumptions:
 2021 2020 2019
Expected volatility 17.32 – 17.75% 14.63 – 16.31% 14.20 – 14.31%
Expected dividends 2.30 – 2.44% 2.50 – 2.72% 2.85 – 2.93%
Expected term (years) 7.0 7.0 7.0
Risk-free rate 0.80 – 1.27% 0.49 – 1.52% 2.24 – 2.54%
______________________
(a)Based on historical experience.
(b)Based on historical exercise and post-vesting cancellation experience adjusted for outstanding awards.
Option activity for the year ended December 31, 2021 was as follows:
 Shares
Underlying
OptionsWeighted-
Average
Exercise
Price
Per ShareWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term
(years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(millions)
Balance, January 1, 2021 9,618,204  $ 38.32    
Granted 1,220,265  $ 83.33    
Exercised (738,516 )$ 20.08    
Forfeited (86,641 )$ 71.19    
Balance, December 31, 2021 10,013,312  $ 44.87  6.0 $ 486 
Exercisable, December 31, 2021 7,235,572  $ 35.35  5.0 $ 420 
The weighted-average grant date fair value of options granted was $9.82, $7.08 and $5.01 per share for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019, respectively . The total intrinsic value of stock options exercised was approximately $49 million, $71 million and $81 million for the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Cash receiv ed from option exercises was approximately $15 million , $30 million  and $34 million  for the years ended December 31, 2021 , 2020
and 2019, respectively . The tax benefits realized from options exercised were approximately $11 million, $17 million and $19 million for the years
ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Preferred Stock – NEE's charter author izes the issuance of 100 million shares of serial  preferred stock, $0.01 par value, none  of which are
outstanding. FPL's charter authorizes the issuance of 10,414,100  shares of preferred stock, $100 par value, 5 million shares of subor dinated
preferred stock, no par value, and 5 million shares of preferred stock, no par value, none  of which are outstanding.(a)
(b)
106
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  – The components of AOCI, net of tax, are as follows:
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Net Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Cash Flow
HedgesNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Available for
Sale SecuritiesDefined Benefit
Pension and
Other Benefits
PlansNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on Foreign
Currency
TranslationOther
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
Related to Equity
Method Investees Total
(millions)
Balances, December 31, 2018 $ (55) $ (7) $ (65) $ (63) $ 2 $(188)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications — 20 (46) 22 1 (3)
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 29 (2) (3) — — 24 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 29 18 (49) 22 1 21 
Less other comprehensive income attributable
to noncontrolling interests — — — 1 — 1 
Acquisition of Gulf Power (see Note 6) (1) — — — — (1)
Balances, December 31, 2019 (27) 11 (114) (42) 3 (169)
Other comprehensive income before
reclassifications — 12 37 13 1 63 
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 12 (3) 2 — — 11 
Net other comprehensive income 12 9 39 13 1 74 
Less other comprehensive income attributable
to noncontrolling interests — — — 7 — 7 
Impact of disposal of a business 23 — — (13) — 10 
Balances, December 31, 2020 8 20 (75) (49) 4 (92)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications — (11) 95 (1) 1 84 
Amounts reclassified from AOCI 6 (4) 5 — — 7 
Net other comprehensive income (loss) 6 (15) 100 (1) 1 91 
Less other comprehensive loss attributable to
noncontrolling interests — — — (1) — (1)
Balances, December 31, 2021 $ 14 $ 5 $ 25 $ (49) $ 5 $ — 
Attributable to noncontrolling interests $ — $ — $ — $ 6 $ — $ 6 
______________________
(a)Reclassified to interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 – Income Statement Impact of Derivative Instruments.
(b)Reclassified to gains on disposal of investments and other property – net in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(c)Reclassified to other net periodic benefit income in NEE's consolidated statements of income.
(d)Reclassified to gains on disposal of businesses/assets – net and interest expense in NEE's consolidated statements of income. See Note 3 – Income Statement Impact of Derivative
Instruments and Note 1 – Disposal of Businesses/Assets and Sale of Noncontrolling Ownership Interests.(a) (b) (c)
(a) (b) (c)
(d) (d)
(a) (b) (c)
107
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
15. Commitments and Contingencies
Commitments  – NEE and its subsidiaries have made commitments in connection with a portion of their proje cted capital expenditures. Capital
expenditures at FPL include, among other things, the cost for construction of additional facilitie s and equipment to meet customer demand, as
well as capital improvements to and maintenan ce of existing facilities. At NEER, capital expe nditures include, among other things, the cost,
including capitalized interest, for construction and development of wind and solar projects, the procurement of nuclear fuel and the cost to
maintain existing rate-regulated transmission facilities, as well as equity contributions to a joint venture for the development and construction of a
rate-regulated transmission facility . Also see Note 4 – Contingent Consideration.
At December 31, 2021, estimated capital expenditures for 2022 through 2026  were as follows:
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Total
(millions)
FPL:       
Generation:       
New $ 1,825 $ 1,670 $ 1,635 $ 1,210 $ 995 $ 7,335 
Existing 1,605 1,465 1,220 685 750 5,725 
Transmission and distribution 4,035 3,760 3,870 4,760 5,075 21,500 
Nuclear fuel 155 110 145 145 120 675 
General and other 875 625 715 740 665 3,620 
Total $ 8,495 $ 7,630 $ 7,585 $ 7,540 $ 7,605 $ 38,855 
NEER:
Wind $ 2,630 $ 240 $ 50 $ 35 $ 30 $ 2,985 
Solar 3,445 1,010 170 25 10 4,660 
Battery storage 270 120 — — 5 395 
Nuclear, including nuclear fuel 200 150 200 210 210 970 
Rate-regulated transmission 220 85 55 30 30 420 
Other 440 85 95 60 70 750 
Total $ 7,205 $ 1,690 $ 570 $ 360 $ 355 $ 10,180 
______________________
(a)Includes AFUDC of approximately $75 million, $85 million, $60 million, $50 million and $40 million for 2022 through 2026, respectively.
(b)Includes land, generation structures, transmission interconnection and integration and licensing.
(c)Includes AFUDC of approximately $50 million, $45 million, $40 million, $15 million and $0 million for 2022 through 2026, respectively.
(d)Represents capital expenditures for which applicable internal approvals and also, if required, regulatory approvals have been received.
(e)Consists of capital expenditures for new wind projects, repowering of existing wind projects and related transmission totaling approximately 2,852 MW.
(f)Includes capital expenditures for new solar projects (including solar plus battery storage projects) and related transmission totaling approximately 5,946 MW.
The above estimates are subject to continuin g review and adjustment and actual capital expenditures may vary significantly from these
estimates.
In addition to guarantees  noted in Note 8 with regards to NEP, NEECH has guaranteed or provided indemnifications or letters of credit related to
third parties, including certain obligations of investments in joint ventures accounted for under the equity method, totaling approximately
$484 million at December 31, 2021. These obligation s primarily related to guaranteeing the residual value of certain financing leases. Payment
guarantees and related contracts with respect to unconsolidated entities for which NEE or one of its subsidiaries are the guarantor are recorded
at fair value  and are included in noncurrent other liabilities on NEE’ s consolidated balance sheets. Management believes that the exposure
associated with these guarantees is not material.
Contracts  – In addition to the commitments made in connection with the estimated capital expenditures included in the table in Commitments
above, FPL  has firm commitments under long-term contracts primarily for the transportation of natural gas with expiration dates through 2042.
At Decembe r 31, 2021, NEER has entered into contracts with expiration dates through 2033 primarily for the purchase of wind turbines, wind
towers and solar modu les and related construction and development activities, as well as for the supply of uranium, and the conversion,
enrichment and fabrication of nuclear fuel, and has made commitments for the construction of a rate-regulated transmission facility .
Approximately $4.3 billion of related commitments are included in the estimated capital expenditures table in Commitments above. In addition,
NEER has contracts primarily for the transportation and storage of natural gas with expiration dates through 2040.(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
(f)
108
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The required capacity and/or minimum paymen ts under contracts, including those discussed above at December 31, 2021, were estimated as
follows:
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter
(millions)
FPL $ 1,025 $ 980 $ 955 $ 900 $ 825 $ 8,570 
NEER $ 4,400 $ 365 $ 185 $ 85 $ 65 $ 570 
_______________________
(a)Includes approximately $415 million, $410 million, $410 million, $405 million, $400 million and $5,960 million in 2022 through 2026 and thereafter, respectively, of firm commitments
related to the natural gas transportation agreements with Sabal Trail and Florida Southeast Connection, LLC. The charges associated with these agreements are recoverable
through the fuel clause and totaled approximately $419 million, $386 million and $316 million for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively, of which $105
million, $108 million and $108 million, respectively, were eliminated in consolidation at NEE.      
(b)Excludes commitments related to equity contributions and a 20-year natural gas transportation agreement (approximately $70 million per year) with a joint venture, in which NEER
has a 31.9% equity investment, that is constructing a natural gas pipeline. These commitments are subject to the completion of construction of the pipeline which has a very low
probability of completion. See Note 4 – Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements.
(c)Includes approximately $370 million of commitments to invest in technology and other investments through 2031. See Note 9 – Other.
(d)Includes approximately $610 million, $20 million, $5 million, $5 million, $0 million and $5 million for 2022 through 2026 and thereafter, respectively, of joint obligations of NEECH and
NEER.
Insurance  – Liability for accidents  at nuclear power plants is governed by the Price-Anderson Act, which limits the liability of nuclear reactor
owners to the amount of insurance available from both private sources and an industry retrospective payment plan. In accordance with this Act,
NEE maintains $450 million of private liability insurance per site, which is the maximum obtainable, except at Duan e Arnold which obtained an
exemption from the NRC  and maintains a $100 million private liability insurance limit. Each site, except Duane Arnold, participates in a secondar y
financial protection system, which provides up to $13.1 billion of liability insurance coverage per inciden t at any nuclear reactor in the U.S. Under
the seconda ry financial protection system, NEE is subject to retrospective assessments of up to $963 million ($550 million for FPL), plus any
applicable taxes, per incident at any nuclear reactor in the U.S., payable at a rate not to exceed $143 million  ($82 million  for FPL) per incident per
year. NextEra Energy Resources and FPL are contractually entitled to recover a proportionate share of such assessments from the owners of
minority interests in Seabrook and St. Lucie Unit No. 2, which approximates $16 million and $20 million, plus any applicable taxes, per incident,
respectively .
NEE participates in a nuclear insurance mutual company that provides $2.75 billion of limited insurance coverage per occurrence per site for
property damage, decontamination and premature decommissioning risks at its nuclear plants and a sublimit of $1.5 billion  for non-nuclear perils,
except for Duane Arnold which has a limit of $50 million for property damage, decontamination risks and non-nuclear perils. NEE participates in
co-insurance of 10% of the first $400 million of losses per site per occurrence, exce pt at Duane Arnold. The proceeds from such insurance,
however , must first be used for reactor stabilizati on and site decontamination before they can be used for plant repair . NEE also participates in an
insurance program that provides limited coverag e for replacement power costs if a nuclear plant is out of service for an extended period of time
because of an accident. In the event of an accident at one of NEE's or another participating insured's nuclear plants, NEE could be assessed up
to $163 million ($104 million for FPL), plus any applicable taxes, in retrospective premiums in a policy year. NextEra Energy Resources and FPL
are contractually entitled to recover a proportion ate share of such assessments from the owners  of minority interests in Seabrook, Duane Arnold
and St. Lucie Unit No. 2, which approximates $ 2 million, $ 2 million and $ 4 million, plus any applicable taxes, respectively .
Due to the high cost and limited coverage available from third-party insurers, NEE does not have property insurance coverage for a substantial
portion of either its transmission and distribution property or natural gas pipeline assets. If FPL's  future storm restoration costs exceed the storm
and property  insurance reserve, such storm restoration costs may be recovered, subject to prudence review by the FPSC, through surcharges
approved by the FPSC or through securitization provisions pursuant to Florida law. See Note 1 – Storm Funds, Storm Reserves and Storm Cost
Recovery .
In the event of a loss, the amount of insurance available might not be adequate to cover property damage and other expenses incurred.
Uninsured losses and other expenses, to the extent not recovered from customers in the case of FPL, would be borne by NEE and FPL and
could have a material adverse ef fect on NEE's and FPL's financial condition, results of operations and liquidity .
16. Segment Information
The tables below prese nt information for NEE's and FPL's reportable segments. NEE's segm ents include its reportable segments, the FPL
segment, a rate-regulated utility business, and NEER, which is comprised of competitive energy  and rate-regulated transmission businesses, as
well as an operating segment of NEE, Gulf Power , a rate-regulated utility business. FPL's reporta ble segments include the FPL segment and Gulf
Power . See Note 6 – Merger of FPL and Gulf Power Company . Corporate and Other for each of NEE and FPL represents other business
activities, such as purch ase accounting adjustments for Gulf Power Company , includes eliminating entries, and may include the net effect of
rounding. See Note 2 for information regarding NEE's and FPL's operating revenues.(a)
(b)(c)(d)
109
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
NEE's segment information is as follows:
2021
FPL Segment Gulf Power NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 12,600 $ 1,503 $ 3,053 $ (87)$ 17,069 
Operating expenses – net $ 8,418 $ 1,170 $ 4,434 $ 211 $ 14,233 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ 1 $ — $ 78 $ (2)$ 77 
Interest expense $ 588 $ 28 $ 367 $ 287 $ 1,270 
Depreciation and amortization $ 1,968 $ 297 $ 1,576 $ 83 $ 3,924 
Equity in earnings of equity method investees $ — $ — $ 666 $ — $ 666 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 767 $ 71 $ (395)$ (95)$ 348 
Net income (loss) $ 2,935 $ 271 $ (147)$ (232)$ 2,827 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,935 $ 271 $ 599 $ (232)$ 3,573 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear
fuel purchases $ 6,785 $ 782 $ 8,363 $ 147 $ 16,077 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 52,728 $ 5,499 $ 40,900 $ 221 $ 99,348 
Total assets $ 68,197 $ 7,209 $ 62,113 $ 3,393 $ 140,912 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ — $ 6,150 $ 9 $ 6,159 
2020
FPL Segment Gulf Power NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 11,662 $ 1,398 $ 5,046 $ (109)$ 17,997 
Operating expenses – net $ 7,862 $ 1,081 $ 4,125 $ 166 $ 13,234 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ — $ — $ 363 $ (10)$ 353 
Interest expense $ 600 $ 41 $ 659 $ 650 $ 1,950 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,246 $ 281 $ 1,460 $ 65 $ 4,052 
Equity in losses of equity method investees $ — $ — $ (1,351)$ — $ (1,351)
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 610 $ 67 $ (416)$ (217)$ 44 
Net income (loss) $ 2,650 $ 238 $ (19)$ (500)$ 2,369 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,650 $ 238 $ 531 $ (500)$ 2,919 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear
fuel purchases $ 6,680 $ 1,012 $ 6,893 $ 25 $ 14,610 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 48,933 $ 4,946 $ 37,842 $ 82 $ 91,803 
Total assets $ 61,610 $ 6,725 $ 55,633 $ 3,716 $ 127,684 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ — $ 5,713 $ 15 $ 5,728 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)NEER includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 – Income Taxes.(a)
(b)
(a)
(b)
110
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. AND FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
2019
FPL Segment Gulf Power NEERCorp. and
OtherNEE
Consolidated
(millions)
Operating revenues $ 12,192 $ 1,487 $ 5,639 $ (114)$ 19,204 
Operating expenses – net $ 8,895 $ 1,216 $ 4,037 $ 109 $ 14,257 
Gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net $ 5 $ — $ 402 $ (1)$ 406 
Interest expense $ 594 $ 55 $ 873 $ 727 $ 2,249 
Depreciation and amortization $ 2,524 $ 247 $ 1,387 $ 58 $ 4,216 
Equity in earnings (losses) of equity method investees $ — $ — $ 67 $ (1)$ 66 
Income tax expense (benefit) $ 441 $ 42 $ 162 $ (197)$ 448 
Net income (loss) $ 2,334 $ 180 $ 1,426 $ (552)$ 3,388 
Net income (loss) attributable to NEE $ 2,334 $ 180 $ 1,807 $ (552)$ 3,769 
Capital expenditures, independent power and other investments and nuclear
fuel purchases $ 5,755 $ 729 $ 6,505 $ 4,473 $ 17,462 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 45,074 $ 4,763 $ 32,042 $ 131 $ 82,010 
Total assets $ 57,188 $ 5,855 $ 51,516 $ 3,132 $ 117,691 
Investment in equity method investees $ — $ — $ 7,453 $ — $ 7,453 
_________________________
(a)Interest expense allocated from NEECH is based on a deemed capital structure of 70% debt and differential membership interests sold by NextEra Energy Resources' subsidiaries.
Residual NEECH corporate interest expense is included in Corporate and Other.
(b)NEER includes PTCs that were recognized based on its tax sharing agreement with NEE. See Note 1 – Income Taxes.
FPL's segment information is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
FPL
SegmentGulf
PowerCorp.
and
OtherFPL
Consoli-
datedFPL
SegmentGulf
PowerCorp.
and
OtherFPL
Consoli-
datedFPL
SegmentGulf
PowerCorp.
and
OtherFPL
Consoli-
dated
(millions)
Operating revenues $12,600 $1,503 $ (1)$14,102 $11,662 $1,398 $ — $13,060 $12,192 $1,487 $ 1 $13,680 
Operating expenses – net $ 8,418 $1,170 $ (2)$ 9,586 $ 7,862 $1,081 $ (3)$ 8,940 $ 8,895 $1,216 $ (10)$10,101 
Interest expense $ 588 $ 28 $ (1)$ 615 $ 600 $ 41 $ — $ 641 $ 594 $ 55 $ — $ 649 
Depreciation and amortization$ 1,968 $ 297 $ 1 $ 2,266 $ 2,246 $ 281 $ (1)$ 2,526 $ 2,524 $ 247 $ — $ 2,771 
Income tax expense $ 767 $ 71 $ — $ 838 $ 610 $ 67 $ 1 $ 678 $ 441 $ 42 $ 1 $ 484 
Net income $ 2,935 $ 271 $ — $ 3,206 $ 2,650 $ 238 $ 2 $ 2,890 $ 2,334 $ 180 $ 5 $ 2,519 
Capital expenditures,
independent power and
other investments and
nuclear fuel purchases $ 6,785 $ 782 $ 3 $ 7,570 $ 6,680 $1,012 $ (13)$ 7,679 $ 5,755 $ 729 $ 1 $ 6,485 
Property, plant and equipment
– net $52,728 $5,499 $ — $58,227 $48,933 $4,946 $ — $53,879 $45,074 $4,763 $ — $49,837 
Total assets $68,197 $7,209 $2,661 $78,067 $61,610 $6,725 $2,666 $71,001 $57,188 $5,855 $2,647 $65,690 
_________________________
(a)FPL's income statement line for total operating expenses – net includes gains (losses) on disposal of businesses/assets – net.(a)
(b)
(a)
111
Table of Contents
Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None
Item 9A.  Controls and Procedures
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
As of Dece mber 31, 2021, each of NEE and FPL had performed an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of its
management, including NEE's and FPL's chief executive officer and chief financial officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of each
company's disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)). Based upon
that evaluation, the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of each of NEE and FPL concluded that the company's disclosure controls
and procedures were ef fective as of December 31, 2021.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
(a) Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(b) Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
See Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
(c) Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
NEE and FPL are contin uously seeking to impro ve the efficiency and effectiveness of their operations and of their internal controls. This
results in refinements to processes throughout NEE and FPL. However , there has been no change in NEE's or FPL's internal control
over financial reporting (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) that occurred during NEE's
and FPL's most recent fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, NEE's or FPL's internal
control over financial reporting.
Item 9B.  Other Information
None
Item 9C.  Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
Not applicable
112
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10.  Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The informa tion required by this item will be included under the headings "Business of the Annual Meeting," "Information About NextEra Energy
and Management" and "Corporate Governance and Board Matters" in NEE's Proxy Statement which will be filed with the SEC in connection with
the 2022 Annual Meeting  of Shareholders (NEE's Proxy Statement) and is incorporated herein by reference, or is included in Item 1. Business –
Information About Our Executive Of ficers.
NEE has adopted the NextEra Energy , Inc. Code of Ethics for Senior Executive and Financial Officers (the Senior Financial Executive Code),
which is applicable to the chief executive officer, the chief financial officer, the chief accounting  officer and other senior executive and financial
officers. The Senior Financial Executive Code is available under Corporate Governance in the Investor Relations section of NEE’ s internet
website at www .nexteraenergy .com. Any amendments or waivers of the Senior Financial Execu tive Code which are required to be disclosed to
shareholders under SEC rules will be disclosed on the NEE website at the address listed above.
Item 11.  Executive Compensation
The information required by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the headings "Executive Compensation" and "Corporate
Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The informa tion required by this item relating to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management will be included in NEE's Proxy
Statement under the heading "Information About NextEra Energy and Management" and is incorporated herein by reference.
Securities Authorized For Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
NEE's equity compensation plan information at December 31, 2021 is as follows:
Plan CategoryNumber of
securities to be
issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(b)Number of securities
remaining available
for future issuance
under equity
compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column
(a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by security holders 15,231,663 $ 44.87 66,846,051 
Equity compensation plans not approved by security holders — — — 
Total 15,231,663 $ 44.87 66,846,051 
______________________
(a)Includes an aggregate of 10,013,312 outstanding options, 3,451,310 unvested performance share awards (at maximum payout), 1,016,262 deferred fully vested performance shares,
344,760 deferred stock awards and 359,843 unvested restricted stock units (including future reinvested dividends) under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan
and former LTIPs, and 46,176 fully vested shares deferred by directors under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan, and its predecessors the FPL
Group, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan and the FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan.
(b)Relates to outstanding options only.
(c)Includes 65,008,350 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan and 1,837,701 shares under the NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-Employee Directors
Stock Plan.
Item 13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
The informa tion required by this item, to the extent applicable, will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Corporate
Governance and Board Matters" and is incorporated herein by reference.(a)
(a) (b) (c)
113
Table of Contents
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
NEE – The information required by this item will be included in NEE's Proxy Statement under the heading "Audit-Related Matters" and is
incorporated herein by reference.
FPL – The following table presents fees billed for professional services rendered by Deloitte & Touche LLP, the member firms of Deloitte Touche
Tohmatsu, and their respective affiliates (collect ively, Deloitte & Touche) for the fiscal years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020. The amounts
presented below reflect allocations from NEE for FPL's portion of the fees, as well as amounts billed directly to FPL.
 2021 2020
Audit fees $ 3,834,000  $ 3,613,000 
Audit-related fees 752,000  1,150,000 
Tax fees 404,000  486,000 
All other fees 57,000  6,000 
Total $ 5,047,000  $ 5,255,000 
______________________
(a)Amounts have been retrospectively adjusted to include fees paid by Gulf Power Company.
(b)Audit fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of FPL's and NEE's annual consolidated financial statements for the fiscal year, the reviews of the
financial statements included in FPL's and NEE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q during the fiscal year and the audit of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting,
comfort letters, and consents.
(c)Audit-related fees consist of fees billed for assurance and related services that are reasonably related to the performance of the audit or review of FPL's and NEE's consolidated
financial statements and are not reported under audit fees. These fees primarily relate to audits of subsidiary financial statements and attestation services.
(d)Tax fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for tax compliance, tax advice and tax planning. These fees primarily relate to research and development tax credit
advice and planning services.
(e)All other fees consist of fees for products and services other than the services reported under the other named categories. In 2021 and 2020, these fees relate to training, and in
2021 also relate to advisory services for development of a request for proposal on financial systems implementation services.
In accordance with the requirements of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the Audit Committee Charter and the Audit Committee's pre-approval
policy for services provid ed by the independent  registered public accounting firm, all services performed by Deloitte & Touche are approved in
advance by the Audit Committee, except for audits of certain trust funds where the fees are paid by the trust. Permitted services specifically
identified in an appendix  to the pre-approval policy are pre-approved by the Audit Committee each year. This pre-approval allows management to
request the specified permitted services on an as-needed basis during the year, provided any such services are reviewed with the Audit
Committee at its next regularly scheduled meeting. Any permitted service for which the fee is expected to exceed $500,000, or that involves a
service not listed on the pre-approval list, must  be specifically approved by the Audit Committee prior to commencement of such service. The
Audit Committee has delegated to the Chair of the committee the right to approve audit, audit-related, tax and other services, within certain
limitations, between meetings of the Audit Committee, provided any such decision is present ed to the Audit Committee at its next regularly
scheduled meeting. At each Audit Committee meeting (other than meetings held to review earnings materials), the Audit Committee reviews a
schedule of services for which Deloitte & Touche has been engaged since the prior Audit Committee meeting under existing pre-approvals and
the estimate d fees for those services. In 2021 and 2020, none of the amounts presented above  represent services provided to NEE or FPL by
Deloitte & Touche that were approved by the Audit Committee after services were rendered pursuant to Rule 2-01(c)(7)(i)(C) of Regulation S-X
(which provides for a waiver of the otherwise applicable pre-approval requirement if certain conditions are met).(a)
(b)
(c)
(d)
(e)
114
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Page(s)
(a) 1. Financial Statements
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 56
Attestation Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 57
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID 34) 58
NEE:
Consolidated Statements of Income 60
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 61
Consolidated Balance Sheets 62
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 63
Consolidated Statements of Equity 64
FPL:
Consolidated Statements of Income 65
Consolidated Balance Sheets 66
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 67
Consolidated Statements of Common Shareholder's Equity 68
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 69 – 111
2. Financial Statement Schedules – Schedules are omitted as not applicable or not required.
3. Exhibits (including those incorporated by reference)
Certain exhibits listed below refer to "FPL  Group " and "FPL  Group Capital," and were effective prior to the change of the name FPL
Group, Inc. to NextEra Energy , Inc., and of the name FPL  Group Capital Inc to NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., during 2010.
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*2(a) Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of December 18, 2020, between Gulf Power Company and
Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit  2 to Form 8-K dated December 18, 2020 , File No.
2-27612 )x
*3(i)a Restated Articles of Incorporation of NextEra Energy , Inc. (filed as Exhibit 3(i) to Form 8-K dated
October 26, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(i)b Restated Articles of Incorporation of Florida Power & Light Company (filed as Exhibit 3(i)b to Form
10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, File No. 2-27612)x
*3(i)c Articles of Merger of Florida Power & Light Company and Gulf Power Company  (filed as Exhibit 3(i)
(c) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, File No. 2-27612)x
*3(ii)a Amended and Restated Bylaws of NextEra Ener gy, Inc., effective October 14, 2016 (filed as Exhibit
3(ii)(b) to Form 8-K dated October 14, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*3(ii)b Amended and Restated Bylaws of Florida Power & Light Company , as amend ed through
October 17, 2008 (filed as Exhibit 3(ii)b to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2008,
File No. 2-27612)x
115
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(a) Mortgage and Deed of Trust dated as of January 1, 1944, as amended, between Florida Power &
Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trustee (filed as Exhibit B-3, File No.
2-4845; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7126; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7523; Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-7990;
Exhibit 7(a), File No. 2-9217; Exhibit 4(a)-5, File No. 2-10093; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-11491; Exhibit
4(b)-1, File No. 2-12900; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13255; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-13705; Exhibit
4(b)-1, File No. 2-13925; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-15088; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-15677; Exhibit
4(b)-1, File No. 2-20501; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-22104; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-23142; Exhibit
2(c), File No. 2-24195; Exhibit 4(b)-1, File No. 2-25677; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-27612; Exhibit 2(c),
File No. 2-29001; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-30542; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-33038; Exhibit 2(c), File No.
2-37679; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-39006; Exhib it 2(c), File No. 2-41312; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
44234; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-46502; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-48679; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-49726;
Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-50712; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-52826; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-53272; Exhibit
2(c), File No. 2-54242; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-56228; Exhibits 2(c) and 2(d), File No. 2-60413;
Exhibits 2(c) and 2(d), File No. 2-65701; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-66524; Exhibit 2(c), File No. 2-
67239; Exhib it 4(c), File No. 2-69716; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-70767; Exhibit 4(b), File No. 2-71542;
Exhibit 4(b), File No. 2-73799; Exhibits 4(c), 4(d) and 4(e), File No. 2-75762; Exhibit 4(c), File No. 2-
77629; Exhib it 4(c), File No. 2-79557; Exhibit 99(a) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 5 to Form S-8,
File No. 33-18669; Exhibit 99(a) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 33-46076;
Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 1995, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 1996, File No. 1-3545 ; Exhibit 4(o), File No. 333-102169 ;
Exhibit 4(k) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(l) to
Post-Ef fective Amendme nt No. 2 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(m) to Post-Ef fective
Amendment No. 3 to Form S-3, File No. 333-102172 ; Exhibit 4(f) to Amendment No. 1 to Form S-3,
File No. 333-125275 ; Exhibit 4(y) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 2 to Form S-3, File Nos. 333-
116300, 333-116300-01  and 333-116300-02 ; Exhibit 4(z) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 3 to
Form S-3, File Nos. 333-116300, 333-116300-01 and 333-116300-02 ; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2006, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated April 17, 2007,
File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated January 16, 2008, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated March 17, 2009, File No. 2-276 12; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated February 9, 2010 ,
File No. 2-27612; Exhibi t 4 to Form 8-K dated December 9, 2010, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(a) to
Form 8-K dated June 10, 2011, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated December 13, 2011,
File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated December 20, 2012, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 5, 2013, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2014, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
September 10, 2014, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated November 19, 2015, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit
4(a) to Form 10-Q for the quarte r ended March 31, 2018, File No. 2-27612 ; Exhibit 4(j), File Nos.
333-226056, 333-226056-01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(k), File Nos. 333-22605 6, 333-226056-
01 and 333-226056-02 ; Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2019, File No. 2-
27612 ; Exhibit 4(f) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 2-27612 ;
Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 2-27612 ; and Exhibit 4(b)
to Form 10-K  for the year ended December 31, 202 0, File No. 2-27612)x x
4(b) One Hundred Thirty-Third Supplemental Indentu re dated as of November 1, 2021 between Florida
Power & Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trusteex x
4(c) One Hundred Thirty-Fourth Supplemental Inden ture dated as of January 1, 2022 between Florida
Power & Light Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, Trusteex x
*4(d) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of November 1, 2017, between Florida Power
& Light Com pany and The Bank of New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K
dated November 6, 2017, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(e) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated June 15, 2018, creating the Floating
Rate Notes, Series due June 15, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 15, 2018, File No.
2-27612)x x
116
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(f) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated November 14, 2018, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due November 14, 2068 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated November
14, 2018, File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(g) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Com pany , dated March 27, 2019, creating the Floating
Rate Notes, Series due March 27, 2069 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated March 27, 2019,
File No. 2-27612)x x
*4(h) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Com pany , dated March 13, 2020, creating the Floating
Rate Notes, Series due March 13, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March 13, 2020, File
No. 2-27612)x x
*4(i) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Com pany , dated August 24, 2020, creating the Floating
Rate Notes, Series due August 24, 2070 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated August 24, 2020, File
No. 2-27612)x x
*4(j) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated March 1, 2021, creating the Floating
Rate Notes, Series due March 1, 2071 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March 1, 2021, File No.
2-27612)x x
*4(k) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated May 10, 2021, creating the Floating
Rate Notes,  Series due May 10, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 10, 2021, File No.
2-27612)x x
4(l) Officer's Certificate of Florida Power & Light Company , dated January 14, 2022, creating the
Floating Rate Notes, Series due January 12, 2024x x
*4(m) Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities), dated as of June 1, 1999, between FPL Group Capital
Inc and The Bank of New York Mellon  (as Trustee ) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated July 16,
1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(n) First Supplemental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Debt Securities) dated as of June 1,
1999, dated as of September 21, 2012, betwee n NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and The
Bank of New York Mellon, as Trustee (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(o) Guarantee Agreement, dated as of June 1, 1999 , between FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The
Bank of New York Mellon (as Guarantee Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated July 16,
1999, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(p) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 28, 2017, creating the
3.55% Debentures, Series due May 1, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated April 28, 2017, File
No. 1-8841)x
*4(q) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 27, 2019, creating the
Floating Rate Debentures, Series due February  25, 2022 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated
February 27, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(r) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated April 4, 2019, creating the 3.50%
Debentures, Series due April 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated April 4, 2019, File No.
1-8841)x
*4(s) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 9, 2019, creating the
Series J Debentures due September 1, 2024 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(t) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated October 3, 2019, creating the
2.75% Debentures, Series due November 1, 2029 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated October 3,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(u) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 21, 2020, creating the
Series K Debentures due March 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(v) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated May 12, 2020, creating the
2.25% Debentures, Series due June 1, 2030 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated May 12, 2020,
File No. 1-8841)x
*4(w) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated September 18, 2020, creating
the Series L Debentures  due September 1, 2025 (filed as Exhibit 4(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(x) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated February 22, 2021, creating the
Floating Rate Debentures, Series due Februar y 22, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
February 22, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
117
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(y) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated March 17, 2021, creating the
0.65% Debentures, Series due March 1, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4(ak), File Nos. 333-254632, 333-
254632-01 and 333-254632-02)x
*4(z) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated March 17, 2021, creating the
Floating Rate Debentures, Series due March 1, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4(al), File Nos. 333-254632,
333-254632-01 and 333-254632-02)x
*4(aa) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital  Holdings, Inc., dated June 8, 2021, creating the
1.90% Debentures, Series due June 15, 2028 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated June 8, 2021,
File No. 1-8841)x
*4(bb) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated November 3, 2021, creating  the
Floating Rate Debentur es, Series due Novemb er 3, 2023 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated
November 3, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(cc) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021, creating
the 1.875% Debentures, Series due January 15, 2027 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated
December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(dd) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021, creating
the 2.440% Debentures, Series due January 15, 2032 (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated
December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ee) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 13, 2021, creating
the 3.000 % Debentur es, Series due January 15, 2052 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated
December 13, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ff) Indenture (For Unsecure d Subordinated Debt Securities relating to Trust Securities), dated as of
March 1, 2004, among FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The Bank of
New York Mellon (as Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(au) to Post-Ef fective Amendment No. 3 to Form S-
3, File Nos. 333-102173, 333-102173-01, 333-102173-02 and 333-102173-03)x
*4(gg) Indenture (For Unsecure d Subordinated Debt Securities), dated as of September 1, 2006, among
FPL Group Capital Inc, FPL Group, Inc. (as Guarantor) and The Bank of New York Mellon (as
Trustee) (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(hh) First Supple mental Indenture to Indenture (For Unsecured Subordinated Debt Securities) dated as
of Septembe r 1, 2006, dated as of November 19, 2012, between NextEra Energy Capital Holdin gs,
Inc., NextEra Energy , Inc. as Guarantor , and The Bank of New York Mellon, as Trustee (filed as
Exhibit 2 to Form 8-A  dated January 16, 2013, File No. 1-33028)x
*4(ii) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated September 19, 2006,
creating the Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to
Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(jj) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated Septem ber 19, 2006, by FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL
Group, Inc. relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentu res
due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 8-K dated September 19, 2006, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(kk) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated September 19,
2006, by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group Capital Holdings Inc)
and NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.), relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's
Series B Enhanced Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2066 (filed as Exhibit 4(cc) to Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ll) Officer's Certificate of FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group, Inc., dated June 12, 2007, creating the
Series C Junior Subord inated Debentures due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated
June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(mm) Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June 12, 2007, by FPL Group Capital Inc and FPL Group,
Inc. relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed  as
Exhibit 4(b) to Form 8-K dated June 12, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x  
*4(nn) Amendment, dated November 9, 2016, to the Replacement Capital Covenant, dated June 12, 2007
by NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. (forme rly known as FPL Group Capital Holdings Inc) and
NextEra Energy , Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.), relating to FPL Group Capital Inc's
Series C Junior Subordinated Debentures due 2067 (filed as Exhibit 4(hh) to Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x
118
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*4(oo) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
September 29, 2017, creating the Series L Junior Subordinated Debentures due September 29,
2057 (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 8-K dated September 29, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(pp) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
November 2, 2017, creating the Series M Junior Subordinated Debentures due December 1, 2077
(filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 8-K dated November 2, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(qq) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
March 15, 2019, creating  the Series N Junior Subordinated Debentures due March 1, 2079 (filed  as
Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K dated March 15, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(rr) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc. and NextEra Energy , Inc., dated
April 4, 2019, creating the Series O Junior Subordinated Debentures due May 1, 2079 (filed  as
Exhibit 4(e) to Form 8-K dated April 4, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ss) Officer's Certificate of NextEra Energy Capital Holdings, Inc., dated December 14, 2021, creating
the Series P Junior Subordinated Debentures due March 15, 2082 (filed as Exhibit 4 to Form 8-K
dated December 14, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(tt) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2019, between NextEra Energy , Inc. and
The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(uu) Pledge Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2019, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities Intermediary , and The
Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 2019, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(vv) Purchase Contract Agre ement, dated as of February 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc. and
The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(a) to Form 10-Q  for
the quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(ww) Pledge Agre ement, dated as of February 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities Intermediary , and The
Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(b) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(xx) Purchase Contract Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc. and
The Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(yy) Pledge Agreement, dated as of September 1, 2020, between NextEra Energy , Inc., Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas, as Collateral Agent, Custodial Agent and Securities Intermediary , and The
Bank of New York Mellon, as Purchase Contract Agent (filed as Exhibit 4(d) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended September 30, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
*4(zz) Senior Note Indenture dated as of January 1, 1998, between Florida Power & Light Company (as
successor to Gulf Power Company) and Computershare Trust Company , N.A., as Succes sor
Trustee, and certain indentures supplemental thereto (filed as Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K dated June
17, 1998, File No. 0-2429 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated September 9, 2010, File No. 1-31737 ;
Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2012, File No. 1-31737; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated June
10, 2013, File No. 1-31737 ; Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated September 16, 2014, File No. 1-31737 ;
Exhibit 4.2 to Form 8-K dated May 15, 2017, File No. 1-31737 ; and Exhibit 4(ddd) to Form 10-K for
the year ended December 31, 202 0, File No. 2-27612 )x x
4(aaa) Description of Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 x
*10(a) FPL Group, Inc. Supplem ental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective April 1,
1997 (SERP ) (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1999, File No. 1-
8841)x x
*10(b) FPL Group, Inc. Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan, amended and restated effective
January 1, 2005 (Restated SERP) (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 8-K dated December 12, 2008, File
No. 1-8841)x x
119
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(c) Amendment Number 1 to the Restated SERP  changing name to NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental
Executive Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2010,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(d) Appendix A1 (revised as of March 16, 2016) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental Executive
Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(e) Appendix A2 (revised as of October 1, 2017) to the NextEra Energy , Inc. Supplemental Executive
Retirement Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-K dated December 31, 2017, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f) Supplement to the Restated SERP  relating to a special credit to certain executive officers and other
officers effective February 15, 2008 (filed as Exhibit 10(g) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2007, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(g) NextEra Energy, Inc. (formerly known as FPL Group, Inc.) Amended and Restated Long-T erm
Incentive Plan, most recently amended and restated on May 22, 2009 (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(h) NextEra Energy, Inc. Amended and Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(c)
to Form 8-K dated March 16, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(i) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(j) Form of Restricted Stock  Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated
2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(k) Form of Restricted Stock Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated 2011
Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(l) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement unde r the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated
2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(m) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement unde r the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated
2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(n) Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement unde r the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated
2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(o) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(f) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(p) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(g) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(q) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(r) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(s) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(f) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(t) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(g) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(u) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and
Restated 2011 Long Term Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(h) to Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(v) NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10 to Form 8-K dated May 20,
2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
120
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(w) Form of Non-Qualified Stock Option Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long Term
Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10‑Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(x) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long Term
Incentive Plan for certain executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(y) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the NextEra Energy , Inc. 2021 Long Term
Incentive Plan for certa in executive officers (filed as Exhibit 10(d) to Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2021, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(z) Form of FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated  Long-T erm Incentive Plan Amended and Restated
Deferred Stock Award Agreement effective February 12, 2010 between FPL Group, Inc. and James
L. Robo (filed as Exhibit 10(dd) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-
8841)x x
*10(aa) Form of Deferred Stock Award Agreement under NextEra Energy , Inc. Amended and Restated 2011
Long Term Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(a) to Form 8-K dated March 16, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(bb) NextEra Energy , Inc. 2013 Executive Annual Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10(c) to Form 8-K dated
October 11, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(cc) NextEra Energy, Inc. Deferred Compensation Plan effective January 1, 2005 as amended and
restated through February 11, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(h) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March
31, 2016, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(dd) FPL Group, Inc. Deferred Compensation Plan, amended and restated effective January 1, 2003
(filed as Exhibit 10(k) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2002, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ee) FPL Group, Inc. Executive Long-T erm Disability Plan effective January 1, 1995 (filed as Exhibit 10(g)
to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 1995, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(f f) FPL Group, Inc. Amended and Restated Non- Employee Directors Stock Plan, as amended and
restated October 13, 2006 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30,
2006, File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(gg) FPL Group, Inc. 2007 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan (filed as Exhibit 99 to Form S-8, File No.
333-143739)x  
*10(hh) NextEra Energy, Inc. 2017 Non-Employee Directors Stock Plan, as amended and restated as of
May 18, 2017 (filed as Exhibit 10 to Form 10-Q  for the quarter ended June 30, 2017, File No. 1-
8841)x
*10(ii) NextEra Energy, Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary effective January 1, 2021
(filed as Exhibit 10(bb) to Form 10-K for the year ended December  31, 2020, File No. 1-8841)x
10(jj) NextEra Energy , Inc. Non-Employee Director Compensation Summary ef fective January 1, 2022 x
*10(kk) Form of Amended and Restated Executive Retention Employment Agreement effective
December 10, 2009 between FPL Group, Inc. and each of James L. Robo and Charles E. Sieving
(filed as Exhibit 10(nn) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ll) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Eric E. Silagy dated
as of May 2, 2012 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2012, File No.
1-8841)x x
*10(mm) Form of 2012 409A  Amendment to NextEra Energy , Inc. Executive Retention Employm ent
Agreement effective October 11, 2012 between NextEra Energy , Inc. and each of James L. Robo,
Eric E. Silagy and Char les E. Sieving (filed as Exhibit 10(ddd) to Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(nn) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Deborah H. Caplan
dated as of April 23, 2013 (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2013,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(oo) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Miguel Arechabala
dated as of January 1, 2014 (filed as Exhibit 10(bbb) to Form 10‑K for the year ended December 31,
2013, File No. 1-8841)x x
121
Table of Contents
Exhibit
Number Description NEE FPL
*10(pp) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and John W. Ketchum
dated as of March 4, 2016 (filed as Exhibit 10(i) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(qq) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Rebecca J. Kujawa
dated as of March 1, 2019 (filed as Exhibit 10(b) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(rr) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Ronald Reagan
dated as of January 1, 2020 (filed as Exhibit 10(tt) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2019, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(ss) Executive Retention Employment Agreement between NextEra Energy , Inc. and Robert P. Coffey
dated as of June 14, 2021 (filed as Exhibit 10(e) to Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2021,
File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(tt) NextEra Energy , Inc. Executive Severance Benefit Plan effective February 26, 2013 (filed as Exhibit
10(eee) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2012, File No. 1-8841)x x
*10(uu) Guarantee Agreement between FPL Group, Inc. and FPL Group Capital Inc, dated as of October 14,
1998 (filed as Exhibit 10(y) to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001, File No. 1-8841)x  
*10(vv) NextEra Energy Partners, LP 2014 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.8 to Form 8-K
dated July 1, 2014, File No. 1-36518)x
*10(ww) Form of Restricted Unit Award Agreement under  the NextEra Energy Partners, LP 2014 Long-T erm
Incentive Plan (filed as Exhibit 10.17 to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2017, File No.
1-36518)x
21 Subsidiaries of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
22 Guaranteed Securities x
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm x x
31(a) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x  
31(b) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
31(c) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Florida Power & Light Company x
31(d) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Florida Power & Light Company x
32(a) Section 1350 Certification of NextEra Energy , Inc. x
32(b) Section 1350 Certification of Florida Power & Light Company x
101.INS XBRL  Instance Document – the instance docu ment does not appear in the Interactive Data File
because its XBRL  tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL  documentx x
101.SCH Inline XBRL  Schema Document x x
101.PRE Inline XBRL  Presentation Linkbase Document x x
101.CAL Inline XBRL  Calculation Linkbase Document x x
101.LAB Inline XBRL  Label Linkbase Document x x
101.DEF Inline XBRL  Definition Linkbase Document x x
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101) x x
______________________
* Incorporated herein by reference
NEE and FPL agree to furnish to the SEC upon request any instrument with respect to long-te rm debt that NEE and FPL have not filed as an
exhibit pursuant to the exemption provided by Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Regulation S-K.
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
Not applicable
122
Table of Contents
NEXTERA ENERGY, INC. SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
NextEra Energy , Inc.
JAMES L. ROBO
James L. Robo
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer
and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 17, 2022
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the
registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 17, 2022:
REBECCA J. KUJAWA  JAMES M. MAY
Rebecca J. Kujawa
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer) James M. May
Vice President, Controller and Chief Accounting
Officer
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Directors:
SHERRY S. BARRATDAVID L. PORGES
Sherry S. Barrat  David L. Porges
JAMES L. CAMAREN RUDY E. SCHUPP
James L. Camaren  Rudy E. Schupp
KENNETH B. DUNN  JOHN L. SKOLDS
Kenneth B. Dunn  John L. Skolds
NAREN K. GURSAHANEY LYNN M. UTTER
Naren K. Gursahaney  Lynn M. Utter
KIRK S. HACHIGIAN DARRYL L. WILSON
Kirk S. Hachigian  Darryl L. Wilson
AMY B. LANE
Amy B. Lane
123
Table of Contents
FLORIDA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be
signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Florida Power & Light Company
ERIC E. SILAGY
Eric E. Silagy
President and Chief Executive Of ficer and Director
(Principal Executive Of ficer)
Date: February 17, 2022
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the
registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Signature and Title as of February 17, 2022:
REBECCA J. KUJAWA KEITH FERGUSON
Rebecca J. Kujawa
Executive V ice President, Finance
and Chief Financial Of ficer and Director
(Principal Financial Of ficer) Keith Ferguson
Controller
(Principal Accounting Of ficer)
Director:
JAMES L. ROBO
James L. Robo
Supplemental Information to be Furnished With Reports Filed Pursuant to Section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by
Registrants Which Have Not Registered Securities Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
No annual report, proxy  statement, form of proxy or other proxy soliciting material has been sent to security holders of FPL during the period
covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021.
124
